,job_title,company,location,salary,description,counts,city
0,Technical Security Analyst/Tempest Analyst,National Security Agency,"Fort Meade, MD","$72,750 - $113,362 a year","Job Summary
Technology Security Analysts detect and mitigate close access technical attacks of intentional Technical Surveillance Countermeasures (TSCM), or Wireless Security (WISEC), and unintentional (TEMPEST) threats emanating from secure facilities and equipment.
Qualifications
Salary Range: $49,157- $78,167 (Entry/Developmental)
*The qualifications listed are the minimum acceptable to be considered for the position. Salary offers are based on candidates' education level and years of experience relevant to the position and also take into account information provided by the hiring manager/organization regarding the work level for the position.
(U) Entry is with a high school diploma or GED plus 4 years of relevant experience, or an Associate's degree plus 2 years of relevant experience, or a Bachelor's degree and no experience, OR successful completion of the Interagency Training Certification (TEMPEST or TSCM) as a military member, DoD contractor, or DoD civilian employee and no experience.
(U) Degree in any field is acceptable.
(U) Relevant experience must be in signals analysis, physical security, TEMPEST, counterintelligence, electrical/electronics, technical surveillance countermeasures, telecommunications, wireless security, packet analysis, information assurance, construction/facilities, or related.
Salary Range: $72,750 - $113,362 (Full Performance)
*The qualifications listed are the minimum acceptable to be considered for the position. Salary offers are based on candidates' education level and years of experience relevant to the position and also take into account information provided by the hiring manager/organization regarding the work level for the position.
Entry is with a high school diploma or GED plus 7 years of relevant experience, or an Associate's degree plus 5 years of relevant experience, or a Bachelor's degree plus 3 years of relevant experience, or a Master's degree plus 1 year of relevant experience, or a Doctoral degree and no experience, OR successful completion of the Interagency Training Certification (TEMPEST or TSCM) as a military member, DoD contractor, or DoD civilian employee and 3 years of relevant experience.
Degree in any field is acceptable.
Relevant experience must be in signals analysis, physical security, TEMPEST, counterintelligence, electrical/electronics, technical surveillance countermeasures, telecommunications, wireless security, packet analysis, information assurance, construction/facilities, or related.
Salary Range: $103,690- $159,286 (Senior)
*The qualifications listed are the minimum acceptable to be considered for the position. Salary offers are based on candidates' education level and years of experience relevant to the position and also take into account information provided by the hiring manager/organization regarding the work level for the position.
(U) Entry is with a high school diploma or GED plus 10 years of relevant experience, or an Associate's degree plus 8 years of relevant experience, or a Bachelor's degree plus 6 years of relevant experience, or a Master's degree plus 4 years of relevant experience, or a Doctoral degree plus 2 years of relevant experience, OR successful completion of the Interagency Training Certification (TEMPEST or TSCM) as a military member, DoD contractor, or DoD civilian employee and 6 years of relevant experience.
(U) Degree in any field is acceptable.
(U) Relevant experience must be in signals analysis, physical security, TEMPEST, counterintelligence, electrical/electronics, technical surveillance countermeasures, telecommunications, wireless security, packet analysis, information assurance, construction/facilities, or related.
Competencies
The ideal candidate is someone with a desire for continual learning, and strong communication (oral and written), problem-solving, analytic, interpersonal skills who is:
-accountable
-detail-oriented
-adaptable
-customer and results-oriented
-able to manage multiple tasks with competing timelines and deliverables
-able to work effectively (independently and/or within teams) across functional areas in a collaborative environment
For some positions, a TEMPEST Professional Level I or II certification with at least 10 years of TEMPEST testing and/or TEMPEST manufacturing experience is required.
Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
This is a full-time position, Monday through Friday.
How to apply
To apply for this position, please click the 'Apply' button located at the top right of this posting. After completing the application for the first time, or reviewing previously entered information, and clicking the 'Submit' button, you will receive a confirmation email. Please ensure your spam filters are configured to accept emails from noreply@intelligencecareers.gov.
***PLEASE NOTE: U.S. Citizenship is required for all applicants. Reasonable accommodations provided to applicants with disabilities during the application and hiring process where appropriate. NSA is an equal opportunity employer and abides by applicable employment laws and regulations. All applicants and employees are subject to random drug testing in accordance with Executive Order 12564. Employment is contingent upon successful completion of a security background investigation and polygraph.
This position is a Defense Civilian Intelligence Personnel System (DCIPS) position in the Excepted Service under 10 U.S.C. 1601. DoD Components with DCIPS positions apply Veterans' Preference to eligible candidates as defined by Section 2108 of Title 5 USC, in accordance with the procedures provided in DoD Instruction 1400.25, Volume 2005, DCIPS Employment and Placement. If you are a veteran claiming veterans' preference, as defined by Section 2108 of Title 5 U.S.C., you may be asked to submit documents verifying your eligibility.
Please note that you may be asked a series of questions depending on the position you apply for. Your responses will be used as part of the screening process of your application and will assist in determining your eligibility for the position. Be sure to elaborate on experiences in your resume. Failure to provide the required information or providing inaccurate information will result in your application not being considered for this position. Only those applicants who meet the qualifications for the position will be contacted to begin employment processing.
Please Note: Job Posting could close earlier than the closing date due to sufficient number of applicants or position no longer available. We encourage you to apply as soon as possible.
DCIPS Disclaimer
The National Security Agency (NSA) is part of the DoD Intelligence Community Defense Civilian Intelligence Personnel System (DCIPS). All positions in the NSA are in the Excepted Services under 10 United States Codes (USC) 1601 appointment authority.
arrow_upwardBack to Top",3804,Washington
1,Linguist/Language Analyst,National Security Agency,"Fort Meade, MD",None,"Job Summary
As a language analyst, you will use your passion for foreign language and strong oral communication, written communication, and critical thinking skills to research, translate, transcribe, report, and analyze foreign intelligence. Your foreign language and English skills will provide key decision makers with a complete and accurate picture of the context within which the decision is being made (i.e. provide an understanding of the nuance, context, cultural overtones, and dialect in which the communication occurred). Another way to use your foreign language skills at NSA is to work as a scientific linguist. Scientific linguists support the mission by designing, developing, evaluating, and/or integrating products to enhance the understanding of mission critical foreign languages or materials by applying linguistic knowledge (e.g. syntax, morphology, phonetics, semantics) to address operational problems.
Qualifications
Salary Range: Entry/Developmental
NSA Washington: $49,157 - $78,167
NSA Hawaii: $45,043 - $71,625
NSA Texas: $43,992 - $69,953
NSA Georgia: $43,683 - $69,462
NSA Utah: $43,683 - $69,462
*The qualifications listed are the minimum acceptable to be considered for the position. Salary offers are based on candidates' education level and years of experience relevant to the position and also take into account information provided by the hiring manager/organization regarding the work level for the position.
Entry is with a high school diploma or equivalent and no experience.
Experience in the target foreign language for which the applicant is being considered is desired. Professional language-related work experience and/or immersion-like experience is preferred. Applicant must have a minimum language proficiency of Interagency Roundtable (ILR) level 2/2 in reading and listening in the target foreign language for which the applicant is being considered.
Exceptions to the ILR Level 2/2 requirement for new hires are handled via a waiver request process from the hiring manager.
Salary Range: Full Performance
NSA Washington: $72,750 - $113,362
NSA Hawaii: $66,662 - $103,875
NSA Texas: $65,106 - $101,451
NSA Georgia: $64,649 - $100,739
NSA Utah: $64,649 - $100,739
*The qualifications listed are the minimum acceptable to be considered for the position. Salary offers are based on candidates' education level and years of experience relevant to the position and also take into account information provided by the hiring manager/organization regarding the work level for the position.
Entry is with a high school diploma or equivalent plus 3 years of relevant experience or an Associate's degree plus 1 year of relevant experience.
Degree in Language, Regional/Area Studies, International Relations or Studies, International Security, International Affairs, Global Studies, Security & Intelligence Studies, Political Science, History, or topical studies such as counter-proliferation, counterterrorism, international crime, finance/economics, chemistry/biology, telecommunications, computer science, space or weapons systems, or cyber security is preferred.
Relevant experience must be performing professional language-related work in the target foreign language for which the applicant is being considered, preferably language-related signals intelligence. Applicant must have a minimum language proficiency of Interagency Roundtable (ILR) level 3/2 or 2/3 in reading and listening in the target foreign language for which the applicant is being considered.
In special cases (e.g., hard to fill positions in critical or less-common languages/dialects) where no viable applicants are available with the minimum language proficiency level or years of experience required, applicants with less than the minimum will be considered. Applicants with less than the minimum language proficiency will require additional language training to reach ILR Level 3 in at least one mode (reading or listening) within 2-3 years.
Salary Range: Senior
NSA Washington: $103,690 - $159,286
NSA Hawaii: $95,012 - $145,955
NSA Texas: $92,795 - $142,549
NSA Georgia: $92,143 - $141,548
NSA Utah: $92,143 - $141,548
*The qualifications listed are the minimum acceptable to be considered for the position. Salary offers are based on candidates' education level and years of experience relevant to the position and also take into account information provided by the hiring manager/organization regarding the work level for the position.
Entry is with a high school diploma or equivalent plus 6 years of relevant experience or an Associate's degree plus 4 years of relevant experience, or a Bachelor's degree plus 2 years of relevant experience.
Degree in Language, Regional/Area Studies, International Relations or Studies, International Security, International Affairs, Global Studies, Security & Intelligence Studies, Political Science, History, or topical studies such as counter-proliferation, counterterrorism, international crime, finance/economics, chemistry/biology, telecommunications, computer science, space or weapons systems, or cyber security is preferred.
Relevant experience must be performing professional language-related work in the target foreign language for which the applicant is being considered, preferably language-related signals intelligence. Applicant must have a minimum language proficiency of Interagency Roundtable (ILR) level 3/3 in reading and listening in the target foreign language for which the applicant is being considered.
In special cases (e.g., hard to fill positions in critical or less-common languages/dialects) where no viable applicants are available with the minimum language proficiency level required, applicants with less than the minimum will be considered. Applicants with less than the minimum language proficiency will require additional language training to reach ILR Level 3/3 within 2-3 years.
Competencies
The ideal candidate is intellectually curious, has a desire for continual learning, and is:
- Proficient (reading and listening) in one or more critical foreign languages, including Russian, Chinese, Arabic, Somali, Persian Farsi, Korean, Turkish and other languages as missions and needs evolve
- Well organized and able to handle multiple assignments
- A strong written and oral communicator
- Able to synthesize information to solve complex problems
- Able to provide timely and accurate customer service
Coursework, knowledge, and experience in one or more of the following is desired:
- Target development
- Social network analysis
- Metadata analysis
- Research methodology
- Topical or Regional studies relevant to national security
- Quantitative/Statistical analysis
- Data modeling, mining, or science
- Cyber security
- Computer science or networking
- Telecommunications
Relevant Internships, extracurricular activities, and/or foreign study are also considered.
Prior military without a degree but with language analysis cryptologic experience will be considered.
In most cases, Experienced Level Language Analysts at NSA will have substantial experience in one or more of the following areas:
- Performing language quality control;
- Serving as an established Subject Matter Expert (SME);
- Authoring and releasing reports;
- Mentoring, coaching, and leading other Language Analysts;
- Ensuring the technical health of the mission;
- Mastering and coaching others on the use of a variety of internal tools;
- Testing at Interagency Language Roundtable (ILR) 3/3 levels for one or more mission languages; and
- Displaying a broad knowledge of the Intelligence Community and how various elements work together to prosecute mission.
**NOTE 1: You will be sent a link for an Unproctored Test which measures cognitive ability, motivation, and English proficiency. Following application submission, you will immediately be sent a test link to your provided email with further instructions. You may also access the link through the Applicant Portal via your Dashboard. While this test is not mandatory, it is highly encouraged. The test link expires after 14 days so please check your Spam folder just in case the email landed there instead of your Inbox. If you do not receive a test link within a few business days after applying to this position, please contact 1-844-IC-HIRES (1-844-424-4737) so we can review your submission.
**NOTE 2: If you are selected to process further, you will be required to 1) take the Defense Language Proficiency Test which measures language proficiency and 2) complete an online interview. Following receipt of email interview link, you will be sent a separate link to your provided email with test scheduling instructions. Please check your Spam folder just in case these emails landed there instead of your Inbox. Please be sure to schedule as soon as you can, as this information will be used as part of the selection decision, with processing hindered until test results are recorded. If you do not receive a test link within a few business days after receiving an email to complete your interview, please contact 1-844-IC-HIRES (1-844-424-4737) so we can review your submission.
Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
On-the-job training, internal NSA courses, and external training will be made available based on the need and experience of the selectee.
Monday - Friday, with basic 8hr/day work requirements between 0600 and 1800 (flexible).
NSA hires for a variety of locations, to include: Maryland, Georgia, Hawaii, Texas, Utah, and other locations.
How to apply
To apply for this position, please click the 'Apply' button located at the top right of this posting. After completing the application for the first time, or reviewing previously entered information, and clicking the 'Submit' button, you will receive a confirmation email. Please ensure your spam filters are configured to accept emails from noreply@intelligencecareers.gov.
***PLEASE NOTE: U.S. Citizenship is required for all applicants. Reasonable accommodations provided to applicants with disabilities during the application and hiring process where appropriate. NSA is an equal opportunity employer and abides by applicable employment laws and regulations. All applicants and employees are subject to random drug testing in accordance with Executive Order 12564. Employment is contingent upon successful completion of a security background investigation and polygraph.
This position is a Defense Civilian Intelligence Personnel System (DCIPS) position in the Excepted Service under 10 U.S.C. 1601. DoD Components with DCIPS positions apply Veterans' Preference to eligible candidates as defined by Section 2108 of Title 5 USC, in accordance with the procedures provided in DoD Instruction 1400.25, Volume 2005, DCIPS Employment and Placement. If you are a veteran claiming veterans' preference, as defined by Section 2108 of Title 5 U.S.C., you may be asked to submit documents verifying your eligibility.
Please note that you may be asked a series of questions depending on the position you apply for. Your responses will be used as part of the screening process of your application and will assist in determining your eligibility for the position. Be sure to elaborate on experiences in your resume. Failure to provide the required information or providing inaccurate information will result in your application not being considered for this position. Only those applicants who meet the qualifications for the position will be contacted to begin employment processing.
Please Note: Job Posting could close earlier than the closing date due to sufficient number of applicants or position no longer available. We encourage you to apply as soon as possible.
DCIPS Disclaimer
The National Security Agency (NSA) is part of the DoD Intelligence Community Defense Civilian Intelligence Personnel System (DCIPS). All positions in the NSA are in the Excepted Services under 10 United States Codes (USC) 1601 appointment authority.
arrow_upwardBack to Top",3804,Washington
2,Policy Analyst,Government of the District of Columbia,"Washington, DC","$76,126 - $97,375 a year","This position is in the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Education (DME). The incumbent is a core member of the Policy Team whose focus is on K-12 education and creating strong enabling environments to support education for all District residents. The Policy Analyst is responsible for supporting various education policy and legislation issues. The work involves planning and policy development; coordinating tracking and priority initiatives in the area of K-12 education; and carrying out vital legislative and policy related functions.
Duties and Responsibilities
Conducts research and statistical analysis of policy issues. Presents findings and recommendations on education policy and legislation, and their effect on the mission and activities of DME. Assesses, complies and reviews data in order to develop policies, legislation, procedures and/or systems for establishing, operating, and assessing the effectiveness of programmatic and administrative control systems. Identifies researches and develops short- and long-range policy priorities to assist in the formulation of the annual policy and budget proposals. Analyzes existing policies, programs, plans, etc. to identify policy gaps or inconsistencies; and to make recommendations to the supervisor. Analyzes and evaluates policies, plans and legislation submitted by subordinate agencies to ensure that they are consistent with priorities articulated in the policy agenda, Citywide Strategic Plan, etc.
Assists the supervisor in monitoring the status of proposals under consideration. Develops memoranda and notices to advise agency heads, and other senior executive staff of any potential impact on education policies, procedures, laws and regulations in the District of Columbia. Performs data-gathering studies, designed and integrated, to provide an assessment of the impact of legislative or regulatory changes in education rules and regulation. Prepares written narrative, analytical reports, research work plans, memoranda, summaries and research findings; and prepares and presents PowerPoint presentations. Builds support for Mayoral policy agenda among constituents and partner organizations. Coordinates policy development and reviews with subordinate agencies and he staff of DME to ensure that the appropriate objectives are taken into consideration.
Qualifications and Education
Graduate Education: Master's degree in economics, statistics, mathematics, applied sciences, law, or other fields related to the position is qualifying for CS-11 research positions. Total undergraduate and graduate study must have included at least 9 semester hours in mathematics and statistics and 9 semester hours in economics. Degree work must have included independent study or research in regulatory impact. Theory courses, without independent study or research, are not sufficient to demonstrate ability to per-form at the CS-11 level.
OR
Individuals must possess one (1) year of specialized experience equivalent to the Grade 11 level, or its non-District equivalent. Specialized experience is experience which is in or directly related to the line of work of this position and has equipped the applicant with the knowledge, skills, and abilities to successfully perform the duties of this position.
Experience that demonstrated knowledge, skill, and technical competence in the use of statistical and mathematical theories applicable to regulatory impact, policy analysis, professional methods of scientific inquiry and analysis in the solution of problems in determining economic and other impact on regulatory programs. Such experience must have involved extensive inquiry into or use of basic data; structuring of problems for systematic analysis; adaptation or development of scientific techniques; construction and use of analytical or mathematical models; formulation of recommendations for action; or planning, monitoring, or directing the above activities.
Licenses and Certifications
None
Working Conditions/Environment
Work is typically performed in an office setting, and the work area is adequately lighted, heated, and ventilated.
Other Significant Facts
Tour of Duty: 9:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Monday - Friday
Pay Plan, Series and Grade: CS-0301-12
Salary Range: $76,126-$97,375; based on funding
Collective Bargaining Unit: This position is not in a collective bargaining unit.
Promotion Potential: No known promotion potential
Position Designation: This position has been designated as security-sensitive therefore the incumbent of this position will be subject to enhanced suitability screening pursuant to Chapter 4 of DC Personnel Regulations, Suitability and as such, incumbents of this position shall be subject to criminal background checks, background investigations, and mandatory drug and alcohol testing, as applicable.
EEO Statement: The District of Columbia Government is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified candidates will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, family responsibilities, matriculation, physical handicap, or political affiliation.",3804,Washington
3,"Intelligence Analyst, Senior",US U.S. Postal Service,"Washington, DC","$81,470 - $118,170 a year","Duties
Summary
The mission of the U.S. Postal Inspection Service is to support and protect the U.S. Postal Service and its employees, infrastructure, and customers; enforce the laws that defend the nation's mail system from illegal or dangerous use; and ensure public trust in the mail. The Analytics and Cybercrime Group supports all Inspection Service investigations to include narcotics, workplace violence, cybersecurity investigations and mail theft amongst others.
Responsibilities
Performs oversight, coordination, training, and evaluation of headquarters intelligence development, investigative analyses, and audit activities; develops methods and practices governing the development and distribution of strategic and tactical analytic services and products. Oversees investigative analyst training programs, including monitoring and evaluation of career progression program, and the development of performance standards and certification processes.

DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES

Collaborates with headquarters and field personnel in the development of quantitative and qualitative standards for use in the collection, evaluation and reporting of intelligence data and investigative analyses.
Provides direction to field analytic units for the development of data gathering methods, analytic product metrics, and procedures for the dissemination of information and intelligence.
Monitors and evaluates investigative analyst initiatives, programs, and projects to ensure appropriate utilization and allocation of analytical resources at the field and headquarters level.
Develops and implements analytic performance indicators, targets in support of strategic planning, forecasting, training, and operational performance.
Participates in the planning, coordination, and implementation of comprehensive special studies, national criminal forecast and profiles, and inter-agency intelligence research to support decision making.
Designs and develops formal communications related to national and global strategic trends, forecasts of investigative and audit activities, and emerging criminal patterns and networks.
Oversees the development of headquarters and field information technology system requirements for data collection, research, and intelligence formulation and validation.
Oversees the planning and coordination of analyst training and development initiatives, and develops procedures to monitor and assesses the effectiveness of internal and external training and development programs.
Provides technical advice, program guidance, and testimonial services to federal, state, and local law enforcement communities on intelligence development and analytic initiatives; serves on inter-agency, national, and global task groups addressing current and emerging criminal trends and recommend solutions.
Develops intelligence data and analysis through the use of software or data mining tools.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - Occasional domestic and international travel may be required.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
23 - EAS-23.
Job family (Series)
0132 Intelligence
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S. Citizen.
Qualifications
Knowledge of information technology sufficient to research and communicate with internal and external secure electronic databases.
Ability to design quantitative and qualitative evaluative methods to ensure integrity, quality, and reliability of intelligence data and analytic products.
Ability to implement analytic performance indicators, targets, and metrics related to organizational strategies and information technology requirements.
Ability to effectively communicate both orally and in writing to clearly convey information, findings, and recommendations to varied audiences, both internal and external about strategic trends, patterns, and networks.
Ability to plan, coordinate, and implement special studies, national criminal forecast and profiles, and inter-agency research to increase organizational effectiveness and decision-making.
Ability to plan, coordinate, and analyze training initiatives and programs.
Ability to oversee and coordinate the work of others to achieve program or project objectives, including monitoring performance, facilitating the flow of work-related information, and providing technical guidance.
Knowledge of investigative, security, and preventative activities relating to the mission, role and various jurisdictions of law enforcement.
DESIRABLE QUALIFICATIONS: Experience with conducting cryptocurrency analysis; Experience with internet investigations, including internet research and analysis across the dark and clear web; Technical Certifications: Network+, Security+, CySA+, CEH, CISSP; Experience in providing presentations to various levels of leadership and audiences to include Executive Leadership; Experience with using SQL or scripts to analyze data and draw conclusions from that data

Qualified applicant must successfully pass a drug screening.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
BENEFITS:

The salary will be based on previous experience, and current postal pay policies. We offer excellent benefits including health and life insurance, retirement plan, savings/investment plan with employer contribution, flexible spending, flextime scheduling of core work hours, annual and sick leave.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
We will review your resume and supporting documents to ensure you meet the basic qualification requirements. We will evaluate each applicant who meets the basic qualifications on the information provided and evaluate your relevant professional, educational, and work experiences as it relates to fundamental competencies, identified in the Qualifications section above, required for this position.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Top Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Required Documents

Required Documents
Please read the ""How To Apply"" section.
Benefits

Benefits
Review our benefits
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
Applicants must be a U.S. citizen or have permanent resident alien status. Current career Postal Service employees are ineligible to apply to this posting.",3804,Washington
4,Senior Intelligence Analyst,ZeroFOX,"Washington, DC",None,"OPPORTUNITY OVERVIEWThe Senior Intelligence Analyst at ZeroFOX will be responsible for working on a wide range of customer-facing investigations based on information obtained through open, closed, and internal sources, with a focus on cyber security. The Senior Intelligence Analyst will have a background in computer sciences, experience with investigating various types of abuse, excellent writing skills, and exceptional analytic prowess in trend analysis and pattern recognition. Discretion, teamwork, and a creative spirit are a must.Key ResponsibilitiesWorking on a wide range of customer-focused threat investigations, often with competing deadlines.Supporting ad hoc customer requests of varying complexities and engaging with customers across the investigation cycle, from initial scoping to final delivery.Identifying and tracking fraud and cyber crime trends; attribution of bad actors.Required ExperienceExperience in the field of cyber threat intelligence or threat research, typically obtained in 3+ years.Knowledge of one or more scripting languages for automation and complex searches.Creativity in leveraging OSINT techniques and methods.Knowledge of operation security tradecraft.The ability to determine the credibility, value, significance, and relevancy of information from different data sources to produce clear, concise, and timely analytic products.Strong writing skills, the ability to think critically and qualify assessments, and solid communication skills.Proven track record of managing and executing on short-term and long-term projects with minimal direction or oversight.Preferred ExperienceExpertise in dark and deep web research and collection; knowledge of criminal marketplace operations; and competence in identifying new sources and developing threat actor profiles.Experience in conducting risk and vulnerability assessments.Use of data visualization tools/libraries and scrapping tools.Ability to work on call rotations to support incident response activities.Experience in briefing decision-makers and senior leaders.Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent experience.Regional knowledge and or/foreign language skills.Do you want to love where you work?Amazing Product: ZeroFOX is creating paradigm shifting cyber security productRecently raised a $74 million Series D led by Intel Capital, and joined by some of the most respected VCs in the country, like NEA and Redline Capital.Bragging Rights: Named the #1 startup in Baltimore and #2 startup in Maryland by the Tech TribuneAwesome Culture: ZeroFOX is a community – most describe our team as a group of close-knit, incredibly talented, and highly caffeinated people. Behind ZeroFOX’s numerous accolades lies a vibrant ecosystem where team members have fun and are rewarded for continual innovation, disruption, and taking ownership in their work.Get Things Done: Innovation is woven into the fabric of our organization. Every aspect of our operations is purposeful; enabling us to research, develop and innovate faster than the competition.Benefits: In addition to competitive compensation, full-time employees can participate in our health insurance plans, retirement, and more.Interested?Ready to apply? Visit us at https://www.zerofox.com/careers to find out more and join the best team in the security industry.Not ready to apply? Email careers_at_zerofox_dot_com to speak with a member of the team!ABOUT ZEROFOXZeroFOX, the market leader in digital visibility and protection, safeguards modern organizations from dynamic security, brand and physical risks across social, mobile, web and collaboration platforms. Using diverse data sources and artificial intelligence-based analysis, the ZeroFOX Platform identifies and remediates targeted phishing attacks, credential compromise, data exfiltration, brand hijacking, executive and location threats and more. The patented ZeroFOX SaaS technology processes and protects millions of posts, messages and accounts daily across the social and digital landscape, spanning LinkedIn, Facebook, Slack, Twitter, Instagram, Pastebin, YouTube, mobile app stores, the deep & dark web, domains and more.**ZeroFOX is an Equal Opportunity Employer and participates in e-Verify**Job Type: Full-time",3804,Washington
5,POLICY ANALYST,US Citizenship and Immigration Services,"Camp Springs, MD","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in the Office of Policy and Strategy

As a Policy Analyst you will serve as the principal subject matter expert responsible for implementing immigration policy objectives within the Office of Policy and Strategy.

Responsibilities
As a member of the Business and Foreign Workers Division, Humanitarian Affairs Division, Residence and Naturalization Division, Security and Public Safety Division, or Policy Development and Coordination Division:
Develops and drafts new immigration policies and regulations based on available data and internal and external input to ensure effective coordination and integration with USCIS goals and objectives.
Serves as a spokesperson for the office and agency with interested internal and external stakeholders on various immigration programs, policies, and positions.
Leads inter- and intra-agency working groups on a range of immigration issues and provides recommendations to achieve agency policy objectives.
Develops and delivers oral and written briefings, talking points, and other publications for supervisors and senior leadership to address complex immigration issues that may impact USCIS and DHS senior level leadership decisions.
Conducts research and balanced assessments on immigration policies, statutes, directives, and regulations to support the development of policy guidance.
Analyzes and devises solutions to resolve and mitigate risks and benefits of various immigration policy proposals.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Similar jobs
Development Managers
Directors, Employee Development
Employee Development Directors
Managers, All Other
Managers, Development
Managers, Training
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S. Citizen or U.S. National to apply for this position
Successfully pass a Background Investigation including financial disclosure
You must pass a drug screening
You must submit resume and supporting documentation
Males born after 12/31/1959 must be registered with the Selective Service
Political appointees may require OPM approval before on-boarding
The qualifications for this position must be met by 11:59 PM (Eastern Time) on the closing date of this announcement.

Current Federal employees must have served 52 weeks at the lower grade or equivalent grade band in the Federal service. The Time-in-Grade requirement must be met by 11:59 PM (Eastern Time) on the closing date of this announcement.

This position is in the bargaining unit.

This position is not considered ""essential"" for purposes of reporting to work when the facility might otherwise be closed.

Residency Requirement: There is a residency requirement for all applicants not currently employed by U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services. This residency requirement states that candidates must have, for three of the last five years immediately prior to applying for this position; (1) resided in the United States; OR (2) worked for the United States Government as an employee overseas in a Federal or Military capacity, OR (3) been a dependent of a U.S. Federal or Military employee serving overseas.

Background Investigation: To ensure the accomplishment of our mission, DHS requires every employee to be reliable and trustworthy. To meet those standards, all selected applicants must undergo and successfully pass a background investigation. This may include a review of financial issues such as delinquency in the payment of debts, child support and/or tax obligations, as well as certain criminal offenses and illegal use or possession of drugs. The background investigation process is initiated after a selection is made. For more information visit the OPM Mythbuster Page.

If a SECRET or TOP SECRET clearance is needed or the position is designated a Sensitive National Security position, all selected candidates must meet the requirements for these clearances or Sensitive National Security position prior to placement AND maintain that level of clearance or national security eligibility while encumbering the position.

Probationary Period: You may be required to serve a probationary period of 1 year.
Qualifications
The USCIS Office of Policy and Strategy was created pursuant to the Homeland Security Act of 2002 to serve as the principal policy advisor for the Director and USCIS, as well as perform research and analysis on immigration issues and program evaluations. In addition, OP&S leads and moderates the Senior Policy Council, manages the USCIS Policy Manual, and oversees the regulatory development process to ensure compliance with the policy goals of USCIS, DHS, and the Administration.

GS-14: You qualify at the GS-14 level if you possess one (1) year of specialized experience, which is equivalent to at least the GS-13 level in the federal government, that equipped you with the skills needed to successfully perform the duties of the position. You must have experience performing the following duties:

Interpreting and applying the Immigration and Nationality Act (INA), regulations, and policies relating to national immigration issues;
Assessing and evaluating various immigration policies and initiatives related to immigration benefit programs;
Interpreting and providing guidance on various immigration policy matters related to immigration benefit programs;
Acting as an organizational representative with other government officials or organizations to explain policy positions and elicit feedback and input;
Leading a team or project to develop and implement complex immigration policies.

The assessments for this job will measure:

Policy and Program Review
Leadership
Written Communication
Attention to Detail
Customer Service
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Problem Solving
Self-Management
Teamwork
Technology Application
Writing

Please read the following important information to ensure you submit everything we need to consider your application: It is your responsibility to ensure that you submit your responses and appropriate documentation prior to the closing date. Your resume serves as the basis for qualification determinations and must highlight your most relevant and significant experience and education (if applicable), as it relates to this job opportunity announcement. USCIS will only review the first 5 pages of your resume to determine your initial eligibility/qualifications for a position. As such, please be sure to include content to support your eligibility/qualifications for this position within the first 5 pages. Please note that your full resume will be made available to the hiring manager if you are referred. Be clear and specific when describing your work history since Human Resources cannot make assumptions regarding your experience. Your application will be rated and ranked based on your responses to the online questions.

Please ensure EACH work history includes ALL of the following information:

Job Title (include series and grade if Federal Job)
Duties (be specific in describing your duties)
Employer's name and address
Supervisor name and phone number
Start and end dates including month, day and year (e.g. June 18 2007 to April 05 2008)
Start and end dates for each grade/pay level if you've held a federal position.
Full-time or part-time status (include hours worked per week)
Salary

Determining length of General or Specialized Experience is dependent on the above information and failure to provide the above information may result in a finding of ineligible.

Note: Overstating your qualifications and/or experience in your application materials or application questionnaire may result in your removal from consideration.

Federal Experience: If you are using current or prior federal experience as a basis for qualifying for this position, the grade levels and length of employment (mm/dd/year) at each grade level must be listed in your work history. This information will be further validated if selected for this position.

The Office of Personnel Management (OPM) must authorize employment offers made to current or former political appointees. If you are currently, or have been within the last 5 years, a political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee in the Executive Branch, you must disclose this information to the Human Resources Office

National Service Experience (i.e., volunteer experience): Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build criteria competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer service. Please provide the dates and amount of time/hours worked earning this experience.
Education
EDUCATIONAL SUBSTITUTION: There is no educational substitution at this grade level.
Additional information
Special Employment Consideration: The Department of Homeland Security encourages persons with disabilities to apply, to include persons with intellectual, severe physical or psychiatric disabilities, as defined by 5 CFR § 213.3102(u), and/or Disabled Veterans with a compensable service-connected disability of 30 percent or more as defined by 5 CFR § 315.707. Veterans, Peace Corps, VISTA volunteers, and persons with disabilities possess a wealth of unique talents, experiences, and competencies that can be invaluable to the DHS mission. If you are a member of one of these groups, you may not have to compete with the public for federal jobs. To determine your eligibility for non-competitive appointment and to understand the required documentation, click on the links above or contact the Servicing Human Resources Office listed at the bottom of this announcement.

Any offers of employment made pursuant to this announcement will be consistent with all applicable authorities, including Presidential Memoranda, Executive Orders, interpretive U.S. Office of Personnel Management guidance and U.S. Office of Management and Budget plans and policies concerning hiring. These authorities are subject to change.

Additional Information:

USCIS uses E-Verify, an Internet-based system, to confirm the eligibility of all newly hired employees to work in the United States. Learn more about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities.

If you receive a conditional offer of employment for this position, you will be required to complete an Optional Form 306, Declaration for Federal Employment, and to sign and certify the accuracy of all information in your application, prior to entry on duty. False statements on any part of the application may result in withdrawal of offer of employment, dismissal after beginning work, fine, or imprisonment.

It is our responsibility to eliminate any risks to national security, public health, and public safety that could be posed by individuals who use illegal drugs. This position may be subject to random testing as a condition of employment. A positive drug test or refusal to be tested will result in disciplinary action, up to and including removal from Federal service.

Note: If you previously retired from the Federal service and are receiving an annuity, your salary may be offset by the amount of your annuity.

Applying to this announcement certifies that you give permission for DHS to share your application with others in DHS for similar positions.

Common definitions for hiring terms found in this announcement.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated for this position based upon information reflected in your resume. Your resume must support your responses to the job specific assessment questionnaire, level of education claimed, experience, and/or training. To remain in consideration for this position, please ensure your resume covers this requirement and that your resume has been successfully submitted as part of your on-line application package.

Creation of this package includes completing the on-line assessment questionnaire, uploading your resume, and uploading any required supporting documents.

NOTE: Your resume and supporting documentation will be verified. If you rated yourself higher than what is supported by your application material, you may be excluded from consideration for this job. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating or consideration for employment.

If you are found best qualified, you may be referred to the hiring manager for consideration and may be called for an interview.

Veterans: Certain veterans are eligible to apply as a status candidate under the Veterans Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA). View Feds Hire vets for more information.

 Agency Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or the Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP) Eligible: If you have never worked for the federal government, you are not CTAP/ICTAP eligible. View information about CTAP or ICTAP eligibility on OPM's Career Transition Resources website. To be considered well qualified under CTAP/ ICTAP, you must be placed in the Well-Qualified category for this position, as described above. In addition, you must submit the supporting documents listed under the required documents section of this job announcement.

Note: Applicants who are referred to the hiring office for selection consideration may be required to complete a writing sample and/or other writing exercise as part of the interview/selection process. If the hiring office decides to request a writing sample and/or other writing exercise as part of its selection process, a designated contractor or Agency representative will contact you to: (1) inform you of this requirement; and (2) provide further instructions.

Conditions of Employment Reminder: If you fail to meet the conditions of employment or any other pre-employment requirements, such as missing any of the scheduled appointments, the hiring agency may rescind their tentative offer of employment.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
Yes
Required Documents

Required Documents
Resume: You must submit a resume that clearly demonstrates you have experience that meets the requirements of this position as outlined in the “Qualifications” section. USCIS’ Human Resources Office will only review the first 5 pages of your resume to determine your eligibility/qualifications.

In order to ensure that you include all necessary information within the first 5 pages of your resume, you are highly encouraged to save and submit your resume as a PDF instead of submitting it through Resume Builder or a word-processing program such as Word or Google Docs.

Your responses to the job questionnaire. (submitted through the on-line application process in USA Jobs. Responses DO NOT need to be attached as an additional document to your application)

Are you a veteran? You must provide acceptable documentation of your preference or appointment eligibility. The member 4 copy of your DD214, ""Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty,"" is preferable. If claiming 10 point preference, you will need to submit a Standard Form (SF-15), ""Application for 10-point Veterans' Preference."" If applying based on eligibility under the Veterans Opportunity to Work (VOW) Act, you must submit certification from the Armed Forces that you will be discharged or released from active duty within 120 days from the date on the certification. This must indicate your dates of service, your rank, and confirm that you will be separated under honorable conditions. View more veterans’ information.

Are you a current or former Federal employee? Submit a copy of your official SF-50 (no text version) or other official ""Notification of Personnel Action"" document that shows the following information:

your appointment in the competitive service
tenure
grade and step
full performance level

If your SF-50(s) does not provide the information needed to make a final determination for qualification, you will be found ineligible for the position. SF-50B print screens from NFC are not official documents and are not acceptable. This includes USCIS employees as well. All current DHS employees can print their own SF-50's by accessing the DHS eOPF website. If you have forgotten your user name or password, eOPF offers a self-service feature to assist you.

If you are a current CIS employee and need access information to eOPF, contact USCIS.EOPF@uscis.dhs.gov. For all other agencies please see your servicing Human Resources Office.

You may be asked to provide a copy of your recent performance appraisal and or incentive awards. If you are a Federal employee and have received a current performance rating, it is strongly encouraged that a copy accompanies your application submission. Doing so allows the selecting official access to all information surrounding your potential to fulfill the duties and responsibilities commensurate of the position being considered for. Failure to provide may impede the selecting official's understanding of the qualifications and experience that you possess.

Are you claiming special priority selection rights under the Agency Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or the Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP)? Submit:

a copy of your agency notice,
a copy of your most recent performance rating, and
a copy of your most recent SF-50, Notification of Personnel Action, noting your current position, grade level, and duty location.

Are you a current or former political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee? Submit a copy of your applicable SF-50, along with a statement that provides the following information regarding your most recent appointment:

Position title
Type of appointment (Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES, or Presidential Appointee)
Agency
Beginning and ending dates of appointment

If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
DHS offers competitive salaries and an attractive benefits package, including: health, dental, vision, life, and long-term care insurance; retirement plan; Thrift Savings Plan [similar to a 401(k)]; Flexible Spending Account; Employee Assistance Program; personal leave days; and paid federal holidays. Other benefits may include: flexible work schedules; telework; tuition reimbursement; transportation subsidies; uniform allowance; health and wellness programs; and fitness centers. DHS is committed to employee development and offers a variety of employee training and developmental opportunities. For more information, go to the DHS Careers website and select ""Benefits."" Disabled veteran leave will be available to any Federal employee hired on or after November 5, 2016, who is a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 30 percent or more.
Review our benefits
Help
This job is open to
Individuals with disabilities
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Internal to an agency
Current federal employees of this agency.
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Current Federal Employees with competitive status, Reinstatement, OPM Interchange Agreement, VEOA, Schedule A and Surplus/Displaced eligibles.",3804,Washington
6,"Research Analyst, Middle East",United States Institute of Peace,"Washington, DC",$19 - $25 an hour,"Who We Are
Peace is our commitment. The United States Institute of Peace represents the American people’s shared values and commitment to peace around the world. We know that Peace is Security – it advances both U.S. and international security by preventing, managing, and mitigating violent conflict.
We are an independent, non-partisan institution and are actively engaged with peacebuilding efforts around the world. Together we tackle the toughest problems and hold fast to the possibility of a more peaceful world. (To learn more about USIP programs and job openings, go to https://www.usip.org/about/careers.
If you have a passion for making the world a better place and want to have a front-row seat on the world stage, USIP is the place for you.
JOB BRIEF
The Research Analyst (Scope of Work contractor) provides research, analysis, and administrative support for the “Agents, Actors and Ideas of Conflict in the Middle East and Africa” program, primarily “The Iran Primer” and “The Islamists” websites. Conducts research on Islamist movements, Iran, and the Middle East.
This is a scope of work contract with the flexibility of remote work. The approximate hourly range is $19 to $25 an hour—the rate to be determined depending on education and experience.""
Up to 20 hours per week during regular business hours starting as soon as possible through September 2021 with the possibility of extension.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Program and Administrative Support:
Help generate content for two Middle East websites – The Iran Primer and The Islamists.
Conduct research on relevant topics for both sites and the senior fellow
Monitor current events closely in Iran and the wider Middle East
Update existing resources, including timelines and profiles
Provide web layout support by creating infographics and finding photographs and other media
Help promote websites online, including through the use of social media
Provide programmatic and administrative support for the program
Completes special assignments as needed.
QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor’s degree in international relations required. A major in Middle East studies preferred.
One (1) or more years related business or administrative experience to become familiar with general personnel practices, accounting and budgeting principles and coordination of major office activities preferred.
Strong working knowledge of the Middle East required, with demonstrated enthusiasm for subject matter. Knowledge of the full cast of characters in the region.
Excellent writing and communications skills preferred.
Ability to work independently and as part of a team; excellent organizational skills; flexibility; strong detail orientation.
Familiarity with standard office software, online research databases and social media platforms preferred.
Strong time management skills with the ability to prioritize work and meet deadlines.
All USIP contract and employee positions are contingent upon the favorable completion of a suitability background investigation.
HOW TO APPLY
To be considered for this position, please submit a complete application package consisting of:
1. Completed employment application including titles, dates of hire and salary requirements.
2. Cover letter
3. Resume


For questions about this position please email recruitment@usip.org. Do not send resumes or attachments to this email address.
Only those applicants that are selected for further discussions will be contacted.
No Phone Calls. Interviews will be scheduled by appointment only.
USIP is an equal opportunity employer. It is the policy and practice of USIP to offer equal employment opportunities to all qualified applicants and employees without regard to race, color, age, religion, national origin, sex, marital status, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, HIV/AIDS status, political affiliations or belief, pregnancy, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3804,Washington
7,Procurement Analyst,Direct Client,"Washington, DC 20049 (Downtown area)",$35 - $38 an hour,"Job Title: Procurement Analyst 100% REMOTE ROLE Procurement Analyst is responsible for assisting in the procurement process by coordinating the purchase of equipment, services, supplies and materials for contracts already in place.Advise and assist in the preparation of contracts which include procurement proposals, qualifications and verification of information. Work closely with the senior director, the COP team, central offices, legal staff, outside attorneys, Corporate Counsel, vendors, and others as assigned.Must have SW licensing agreement and PeopleSoft experience.Work with Legal and Security (data and privacy issues).Job Type: ContractPay: $35.00 - $38.00 per hourSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayExperience:SW licensing agreement and PeopleSoft: 1 year (Preferred)Work Remotely:YesSpeak with the employer+91 5555555555",3804,Washington
8,Junior Information Security Analyst REMOTE,"Data Systems Analysts, Inc.","Fairfax, VA 22030",None,"Data Systems Analysts, Inc. is searching for an Information Security Analyst for a remote opening in the DC area. This contract supports the US Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).
U.S. Citizenship and ability to obtain a public trust is required.
The Information Security Analyst will be an integral part of a team responsible for supporting the development and maturation of an Agency-wide information security (InfoSec) program for a large civilian Federal agency. The ideal candidate will have strong data analysis and written and verbal communication skills. The candidate will possess in-depth knowledge of applying, selecting and testing the NIST family of security controls. The candidate will serve as a subject matter expert with regards to the Risk Management Framework (RMF) and all associated information security policies and procedures and should possess in-depth knowledge of applying, selecting and testing the NIST family of security controls.
Primary Responsibilities:

• Advising stakeholders on InfoSec initiatives including compliance, awareness and training, and security operations.
Leading Independent Validation and Verification (IV&V) efforts on security authorization/ATO packages to ensure compliance to agency requirements.Leveraging the existing Governance, Risk, and Compliance (GRC) tool, Telos Xacta (or an alternate like CSAM or RSA Archer), to track and reconcile findings from assessments, audits, and vulnerability scans.Coordinating government data calls (FISMA, FMFIA, BDR, etc.) and monthly reports. Client CyberScope experience a plus.Assessing the effectiveness of the InfoSec and privacy training program and leading the collection, analyzation, and presentation of enterprise-level InfoSec performance metrics.Managing InfoSec Program POA&Ms, including advising on remediation efforts.Providing administrative support to Xacta (or equivalent GRC tool) users and authoring operational procedures.Working closely with senior agency security officials, system owners, information system security officers (ISSOs) and other stakeholders to advise and implement security solutions.Advising CDM implementation efforts.Identifying opportunities for efficiencies in work process and innovative approaches.Participating in team problem solving efforts and offer ideas to solve client issues.Conducting relevant research, data analysis, and developing reports.Preparing and assisting in the development of policy and procedures for program-level management and promoting consistency in program management best practices.Implementing processes and procedures to monitor risk across programs / projects.Preparing briefings to executive team to debrief the results of studies, analyses, and plans.Assist in proposal development, as requested.
Minimum Qualifications:
• US Citizenship.
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, Business, or other related scientific or technical discipline is required. Four (4) additional years of experience in IA/Information Security will be an acceptable substitute for a Bachelor's degree.
• Strong written and oral communication skills including the ability to communicate complex technical issues to stakeholders and non-technical staff.
Knowledge and understanding of integrating the security lifecycle into the system development lifecycle (SDLC).Experience working with Federal Information Security Modernization Act (FISMA) requirements, and NIST guidelines.Demonstrated ability to prioritize and manage competing work assignments in a time sensitive environment.Ability to weigh business risks and enforce appropriate information security measures.Keen attention to detail and the ability to solve problems using best practices and systematic approach.
Desired Skills:
Preferred Tool Experience:
ForeScoutBigFixTenable NessusTelos Xacta IA Manager (or similar tool like CSAM, RSA Archer, etc.)CDM DashboardSharePointQlik Sense
Required/ Desired Education and Certifications:
• Intermediate or Advanced security certifications (e.g., CISA, CISSP, CISM or equivalent).
Interest in learning the concepts of business development and capturing new business.
Salary and Benefits include but not limited to:
The hours for this role are Full-time, Regular - Start and End times are dependent on customer requirements
Leave benefits include Paid holidays, Vacation, Sick and Bereavement
Retirement benefits include 401K with 20% match to employee contribution, and Employee Stock Ownership Shares provided by DSA.
Insurance benefits include customizable Medical, Dental, Health, Company Paid Life and Disability Insurance, Health savings, Vision and Domestic Partner Coverage
Miscellaneous benefits include Tuition assistance and Technical 100% Paid Training and Family Tuition Assistance.

Founded in 1963, Data Systems Analysts, Inc. (DSA) has been providing Defense and Federal Government customers' business-driven Information Technology and consulting solutions and services for more than 50 years. DSA's people excel in helping our customers achieve sensitive, mission-critical business goals and objectives. DSA is a 100 percent employee-owned company: every employee has a stake in the success of our company and our customers.Our culture embraces training and development opportunities that include leadership programs, employee networks, continued education, and much more. We recognize that building expertise in your profession benefits everyone. DSA's leadership and training programs help employees better manage their projects, inspire coworkers and customers and reinforce DSA's guiding principles since 1963.

We also value the unique combination of skills, abilities, aspirations, and backgrounds of every individual our diversity makes us stronger. We are 100 percent employee-owned through an Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP).DSAemployees receive customizable benefits that are highly competitive in each local market that include a Vanguard 401K.DSA provides equal employment opportunity for employees and applicants without regard to an individual's protected status; race/ethnicity, color, national origin, ancestry, sex/gender, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, marital/parental status, pregnancy/childbirth or related condition, religion, creed, age, disability, genetic information, veteran status, or any other protected status.

DSA will provide necessary reasonable accommodation to ensure that an individual with a disability who is not able to fully utilize DSA's online job application system is provided with equal opportunity to apply and be considered for all jobs. If you need an accommodation to complete the application process, please email HR @dsainc.com or call 1-877-422-4372.

DSA recognizes that the global spread of COVID-19 is a challenging time for everyone. Our #1 priority is the health and safety of our workforce, guests and candidates, and we provide the necessary supplies to maintain safety in the work place. Due to the current situation surrounding COVID-19, our response time and scheduling of interviews may increase. DSA is looking to fill various positions despite the COVID-19 and are managing our workforce within the compliance of all state requirements.
#DSA209",3804,Washington
9,"Policy Analyst, Security and Foreign Affairs",US United States-China Economic and Security Revie...,"Washington, DC","$49,000 - $88,000 a year","Duties
Summary
Under the direction of the Director for Security and Foreign Affairs or Executive Director, the position is responsible for policy and issue analysis primarily in the fields of security and foreign affairs.
Responsibilities
This position requires the ability to:

Monitor, investigate, and assess developments relevant to the Security and Foreign Affairs Team's portfolio including, but not limited to, the topics identified in ""requirements and qualifications"" below.
Draft detailed written and oral analyses and assessments of issues within the Security and Foreign Affairs Team's portfolio.
Work with designated hearing co-chairs, senior staff, and team members to plan and organize Commission hearings.
Serve as a subject matter expert and advisor on Chinese security and foreign affairs issues and U.S. policy responses for Commissioners, Members of Congress and their staffs, and Congressional committees.
Draft assigned portions of the Commission's Annual Report.
Draft Congressional testimony, talking points, editorials, and other communications for Commissioners to a wide variety of audiences and represent the staff at conferences and with government, academia, and private sector groups.
Develop and sustain a professional network with China analysts in the U.S. government, private sector, and academia
Perform other duties as assigned.

Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Applicants must be eligible for a security clearance. Upon appointment, the selectee will be required to undergo a background investigation, and during the employment period may also be required to obtain and hold a Federal security clearance up to the Top Secret/SCI level. An active clearance is not a prerequisite for applying for or initiating employment.
Qualifications
REQUIREMENTS AND QUALIFICATIONS
Superior ability to present information clearly and concisely through both written and oral reports.
Superior research, analytical, and evaluative skills, including the ability to synthesize and analyze large amounts of disparate data on emerging and/or controversial issues.
Demonstrated knowledge of China's foreign relations, particularly in the Indo-Pacific and with the United States, including an understanding of the drivers, actors, and conduct of China's foreign policy.
Demonstrated knowledge of Chinese security issues, including China's military strategy, how China uses its military to advance its national interests, the capabilities of the People's Liberation Army, and domestic security concerns.
Demonstrated knowledge of U.S. foreign policy related to China and the Indo-Pacific (including U.S. alliances and other partnerships in the region) and U.S. military strategy, capabilities, and activities in the Indo-Pacific.
Bachelor's degree or higher.
HIGHLY DESIRED QUALIFICATIONS:
(Not required, but may be considered in the selection process)
Experience working on Capitol Hill (relevant work in a Member's office, on Committee staff, or related work with regular duties interacting with Congress).
Graduate degree in a relevant field, such as Asian Studies, International Relations, Political Science, Security Studies, or Asian History.
Experience living and/or working in China, Taiwan, or Hong Kong.
Ability to speak and read Mandarin Chinese, to include ability to effectively utilize sources of electronic and print information.
Education
Bachelor's degree or higher.
Additional information
BENEFITS

The Federal Government offers a comprehensive benefits package. See Additional Information in this announcement for benefits you are eligible for. Explore the major benefits offered to most Federal employees at: https://www.opm.gov/healthcare-insurance/Guide-Me/New-Prospective-Employees/.

OTHER INFORMATION

The U.S.-China Economic and Security Review Commission is an EEO employer and does not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of that individual's protected characteristics, including: race, color, religion, sex (including gender identity, gender expression, pregnancy and childbirth), national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, uniformed service, or sexual orientation.

The Commission will provide reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities as appropriate. Determinations on requests for reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis.

If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, you must certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System, or are exempt from having to do so under the Selective Service Law as described in 5 USC 3328. If you misrepresent your experience or education, or provide false or fraudulent information, it may be grounds for not hiring you or dismissing you after you start. Making false or fraudulent statements can be punishable by fine or imprisonment.

As federal government employees, Commission employees are eligible to participate in federal employee benefits programs, to include: health insurance (multiple carriers & multiple options); life insurance (FEGLI-multiple options); retirement (FERS or CSRS if applicable); and the Thrift Savings Program (TSP-multiple options), the federal government's tax-deferred savings program. Employees accrue and may use annual and sick leave in accord with Commission policies and procedures.

Please send any questions regarding this position or application process to: Opportunities@uscc.gov.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
The Commission will conduct an internal evaluation based on applicants' cover letter, resume, and writing sample, to include qualifications and relevant experience. The Director for Security and Foreign Affairs, Executive Director, and appropriate staff will interview the top candidates. The Chairman and/or Vice Chairman may interview the final candidates. The final hiring decision will be made by the Executive Director.

Interviews will consist of two parts: 1) interviews with the Director for Security and Foreign Affairs, Executive Director, and appropriate staff; and 2) a writing test.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Sensitive Compartmented Information
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
Cover letter containing responses to qualifications, and resume.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
Review our benefits
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
Open to all qualified U.S. Citizens. Administratively Determined, Term-Appointed Position (The initial term of appointment is one year and is renewable at the Commission's option. The position is not covered by provisions of 5 USC that apply to Executive Branch employees regarding appointment, termination, competitive service selection, and pay related rules and regulations).",3804,Washington
10,Senior Cyber Crime Intelligence Analyst (technical) - (Remote US),"FireEye, Inc.","Arlington, VA","$110,000 a year","Company Description

FireEye is the intelligence-led security company. Working as a seamless, scalable extension of customer security operations, FireEye offers a single platform that blends innovative security technologies, nation-state grade threat intelligence, and world-renowned Mandiant® consulting. With this approach, FireEye eliminates the complexity and burden of cyber security for organizations struggling to prepare for, prevent, and respond to cyber attacks. Learn more about FireEye's world-class solutions and global footprint at https://www.fireeye.com/company.html.

Job Description
Mandiant Intelligence’s Financial Crime team identifies, tracks, and reports on financially-motivated threat actors impacting organizations across the globe. This work supports corporate and government intelligence clients as well as other divisions of FireEye. The Technical Analyst will play an important role on our team, leading the investigation and analysis of these operators. An emphasis will be placed on the identification of novel and impactful malware campaigns and intrusion activity. The successful candidate is a seasoned analyst capable of interpreting vast quantities of data from various sources and communicating those findings to both internal and external stakeholders. We encourage giving back to the community and strongly support sharing of expertise by authoring whitepapers and speaking at conferences.
Responsibilities
Identify, assess, and track the tactics, techniques, and procedures of financially motivated threat actors using the unique data produced across all of FireEye and via your own independent research
Perform technical analysis on malicious or suspicious artifacts, attacker infrastructure, and forensic data sourced from organizations impacted by some of the world’s most capable cyber criminals
Stay current on new malware families, new capabilities and public reporting on these issues
Support the creation of custom analytic products for internal and external stakeholders based on conclusions and judgments derived from FireEye’s proprietary datasets and the analyst’s independent research
Work independently and collaborate with individuals throughout the FireEye organization to develop and coordinate the production of intelligence product

Qualifications
Strong understanding of cyber crime threats and the cyber criminal ecosystem
Understanding of the tools and tactics used to distribute malware
Experience analyzing malicious binaries, office files, pdf and jar files, reviewing automated sandbox reports, and reviewing network packet captures
Comfortable with scripting languages (e.g. Python, Ruby, or other)
Ability to write Yara and Snort signatures for the purpose of identifying and classifying malware
Ability to communicate complex technical concepts to non-technical people
Preferred:
Possesses deep subject matter expertise on several different cybercrime malware families and/or threat actors, including how they have evolved over time
Practical experience as an intelligence analyst
History of participation in industry or technology information sharing groups, formal or informal
Understanding of monetization and fraud strategies employed by cyber threat actors
Comfortable independently interacting with external audiences
4+ years experience working with malware or exploits, or engaged in either threat research or incident handling
Experience interpreting and analyzing telemetry data produced by endpoint, network, and email security infrastructure
Foreign language skills in Russian, Chinese, Arabic, Farsi, and/or other major European languages
Additional Information
At FireEye we are committed to our #OneTeam approach combining diversity, collaboration, and excellence. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or on the basis of disability.
(For candidates applying from Colorado, the following applies*)
Minimum Salary: $110,000. Final salary will be determined commensurately with cost of living, experience level, and/or any other legally permissible considerations.
Incentive Compensation: Eligibility for annual bonus subject to individual and company performance; eligibility for award of Restricted Stock Units subject to eligibility requirements, approval from FireEye’s Compensation Committee, and vesting terms
Benefits: Employer subsidized benefits include Medical, Dental, Vision, Life, and Disability Insurance. Subject to eligibility requirements, FireEye also offers the ability to participate in 401(k), Flexible Spending Accounts, Health Savings Accounts, Dependent Care Spending Accounts, and Employee Stock Purchase Program. FireEye also provides Paid Time Off, Flexible Paid Sick Time, and Paid Holidays.Disclosure as required by sb19-085 (8-5-20)",3804,Washington
11,"Administrative Analyst, Junior – Navy Programs",Strategic Insight LTD,"Washington, DC",None,"Strategic Insight, Ltd. is seeking a Junior Administrative Analyst with experience in the Navy Enlisted Surface Warfare Specialty (ESWS) or US Marine Corps Administrative MOS for Navy program management and administrative services support to our Navy client from our office located in S.E. Washington, D.C.Strategic Insight, Ltd., established 1985, is committed to sustaining excellence and quality growth across our workforce as we strive to improve our clients services and products. Strategic Insight staff members enjoy opportunities for growth and are provided with robust benefits from healthcare and 401K, to merit bonuses. This position will give you the opportunity to make a positive impact within a collaborative team environment.**SummaryThis position requires working 43 hours a week at our office located at 300M Street S.E., Washington, D.C., in support of our Navy client located at the Washington Navy Yard, in routine 8.5-hour day within a 0800-1800 operating environment.**Responsibilities include but are not limited to: Provided Government administrative support to include Schedule/Calendar ManagementProvide Action item tracker supportDeveloping and briefing PowerPoint presentations to mid/senior staff.Conducting Navy program related research as directed by staff.Drafting, editing, and proof-reading documents and correspondence.Responsible for correspondence management.Assists with maintenance of records management systems to ensure records are accurately documented and stored.Generate records management reports.Success for working in this position requires: Proficiency with MS Office (Outlook, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint), to include the ability to create spreadsheets, presentations, and prepare specialized reports.Knowledge of DoD processes and organizations.Digital office experience a plusNAVSEA MAC/SAAR experience desiredExcellent understanding of data and records management.High degree of attention to detail and accuracy in completing assignments, including good sense of design, proof reading, grammar, and analytical skills.Ability to effectively communicate and work with others at all levels, as a team member.Ability to work with sensitive and confidential information.Self-starter, goal-oriented individual who provides timely feedback on progress made on assignments.Excellent organizational skills; ability to prioritize and coordinate multiple tasks, handle complex assignments, and work in a fast-paced environment.Excellent oral and written communication skills.Education and ExperienceHS diploma; any college is a plus.Navy enlisted shipboard experience either in a technical or administrative rating strongly desired.Enlisted Surface Warfare Specialist (ESWS) qualification desired.US Marine Corps Admin MOS also acceptable.Mandatory Requirement:  Applicants selected for this position may be subject to a Government Security Investigation and must meet eligibility for access to classified information at the Secret clearance level. Can start with Interim Secret clearance.The above information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees in this classification. It is not designed to contain or to be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of the employee assigned to this job.Strategic Insight, Ltd. is an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to providing equal opportunity to all applicants and employees in full compliance with all applicable state and federal laws prohibiting discrimination on the basis of race, color, age, gender, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other class protected by applicable state or federal law.Job Type: Full-time",3804,Washington
12,Management and Program Analyst,US Federal Aviation Administration,"Washington, DC","$73,336 - $113,677 a year","Duties
Summary
Due to the Pandemic and individual states with different phases of reopening, the selectee’s report date to the official duty station/facility may be delayed until such time as employees are allowed to report to the workplace. The person selected may telework up to the maximum extent possible, up to and including full time, until it is determined by state and Federal officials that employees are allowed to report to the workplace where this position is located, on a regular basis.

Responsibilities
The PMO provides program and acquisition management for the systems and capabilities that modernize and sustain the National Airspace System (NAS) to advance NAS programs from concept to operation while providing technical support for air traffic control automation and decision support systems. Selectees will be assigned to one of the following organizations within the PMO: Integrated Services and Analysis, AJM-1; Air Traffic Systems, AJM-2; Enterprise Services, AJM-3; and Surveillance Services Directorate, AJM-4.
The incumbent applies quantitative and qualitative analysis to define the utility basic tenets and guidelines for preparing the Master Integrated Program Schedule. He/she uses skill applying fact-finding and investigative techniques to define program requirements and to assist in the development of program briefs for working papers. He/She will assist senior analysts in the development and execution of the Integrated logistics Support Plan (ILSP). Identifies and assists in the implementation of alternative logistics support practices. Performs multiple and varying assignments under the limited direction of a manager, project/program manager, team leader, and/or more experienced professional.
The incumbent supports senior specialists by assembling and reviewing acquisition packages, requests for proposals, bids, or quotations by checking documents for errors and ensuring that standard or special provisions comply with applicable policies and regulations. The incumbent participating on acquisition strategy or source selection panels to determine if a written source selection plan is necessary and to document strategy. He/She will provides market research data to senior management. The incumbent identifies market place requirements to identify supply or service sources. He/She maintaining automated tracking systems, assists with financial analysis and reporting to include analyzing budgets assigned to large-scale technical aviation programs and services to record, reconcile, validate and track data; identify discrepancies and conduct various analytical studies.
Incumbent applies experience using advanced automated tools and financial systems, such as macros, pivot tables, advanced filtering, etc. to create graphics and charts for inclusion in presentations to senior officials. The incumbent participates as an active team member in planning, monitoring, and conducting special projects, studies, and initiatives. The incumbent analyze problems, identifies significant factors, gathers and interprets pertinent data, and applies established rules and procedures in order to recommend effective solutions. Contacts are typically internal and external to the PMO to share information and to explain the applications of policies and procedures. The incumbent may have frequent contact throughout the PMO and other customers on routine matters such as data gathering, explaining processes and project status. The incumbent mentors more junior analysts.
The incumbent uses considerable discretion when selecting approaches, established policies and procedures are available for most assignments. The incumbent resolves most problems and work issues without the assistance of a more experienced professional or manager and refers problems and work issues that require additional attention. The Team Manager periodically reviews work at major milestones and al completion, for policy compliance and alignment with the requirements of projects and/or other work activities.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Travel Required
25% or less - The job may require up to 25% travel.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
NA
Job family (Series)
0343 Management And Program Analysis
Similar jobs
Enterprise Data Manager
Information Systems Managers
Logistics Managers
Managers, Information Systems
Managers, Logistics
Managers, Operations
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
US Citizenship is required.
Selective Service Registration is required for males born after 12/31/1959.
Must submit an SF50 (See Required Documents)
Qualifications
TO QUALIFY AT THE FV-H (GS/FG 12) level Candidates must have one year (52 weeks) of SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE equivalent to at least the next lower grade level (FV-G or FG/GS-11) that is typically related to the line of work of the position to be filled and which has equipped the applicant with the particular knowledge, skills, and abilities to successfully perform the duties of the position. To be creditable, specialized experience must have been at least equivalent to the next lower level in the normal line of progression for the occupation in the organization.
SPECIALIZE EXPERIENCE is defined as:
Experience assembling and reviewing acquisition packages, requests for proposals, bids, or quotations; OR
Experience using advanced automated tools and financial systems, such as macros, pivot tables, advanced filtering, etc. to create graphics and charts for inclusion in presentations to senior officials.
You should include relevant examples of the specialized experience in your work history. Errors or omissions may impact your rating or may result in you not being considered.
Eligible applicants meeting the minimum qualification requirements and/or selective placement factor(s) (SPF) may be further evaluated on the Leadership & Management Dimensions and/or Technical Requirements listed in the announcement. Based on this evaluation, applicants will be placed in one of the following categories: (1) score order; (2) category grouping; or (3) alphabetical; or (4) priority grouping referred to the selecting official for selection consideration.
Answer all questions to the best of your ability. DO NOT ASSUME THAT BECAUSE YOU HOLD, OR HAVE HELD THIS POSITION, YOU WILL AUTOMATICALLY BE FOUND ELIGIBLE. You may be asked to provide evidence or documentation that you have this type of experience later in the selection process. Your responses are subject to verification through job interviews, or any other information obtained during the application process. Any exaggeration of your experience or any attempt to conceal information can result in disqualification.
Applicants who fail to demonstrate possession of any of the above criteria AND who do not provide the required documentation will receive no further consideration for this position.
Applicants may be asked to verify information on your application for employment with the FAA.
All qualification requirements must be met by the closing date of this vacancy announcement.
Education
Education cannot be substituted for experience.
Preview Job Questionnaire
Make sure your resume includes detailed information to support your qualifications and answers to the job questionnaire.
Additional information
We may use this vacancy to fill other similar vacant positions.
Position may be subject to a background investigation.
A one-year probationary period may be required.

The person selected for this position may be required to file a financial disclosure statement within 30 days of entry on duty. FAA policy limits certain outside employment and financial investments in aviation-related companies. www.faa.gov/jobs/working_here/financial_disclosure_requirements

The U.S. Department of Transportation strives to ensure that equity, transparency, accountability, collaboration, and communication permeate all that we do for the betterment of the Department, the traveling public, and our nation. As such, DOT values a highly diverse workforce of persons who promote a culture of belonging by respecting the personal dignity and worth of each individual and fostering a positive environment where all feel safe and welcome. If these commitments coincide with your personal ideals and professional aspirations, please consider joining the DOT family.
NOTES:
As a part of the Federal-Wide Hiring Reform Initiative (streamlining the hiring process), the FAA is committed to eliminating the use of Knowledge, Skills and Ability (KSA) narratives from the initial application in the hiring process for all announcements. Therefore, as an applicant, you are NOT required to provide a narrative response in the text box listed below each KSA.
In lieu of providing a KSA narrative response in the text box listed below each KSA section, in your work history, please include information that provides specific examples of how you meet the response level or answer you chose for each KSA. Your work history examples should be specific and clearly reflect the highest level of ability. Your KSA answers will be evaluated further to validate whether the level that you selected is appropriate based on the work history and experience you provided. Your answers may be adjusted by a human resource specialist as appropriate.
This Level (Low Risk) position requires favorable adjudication of a National Agency Check and Inquiries (NACI) background investigation prior to appointment.
This position is covered by the FAA Core Compensation plan. Additional information about core compensation is available on the following website: http://jobs.faa.gov/FAACoreCompensation.htm.
Some, all, or none of the referred candidates may be interviewed.
This announcement is also being advertised under VA# AWA-AJM-21-0029RJ-72689. Please review both vacancy announcements before making application to determine your eligibility to apply.
This is a bargaining unit position.

Links to Important Information: Locality Pay , COLA

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.


IMPORTANT: Applicants may be rated on the extent and quality of experience, education, and training relevant to the duties of the position(s). All answers provided in the on-line process must be substantiated. Ensure that your application package/resume supports your responses.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
ALL applicants MUST submit the following:

(1) resume with complete work history; and

(2) a copy of your most recent SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action).

For guidance on how to create a Federal resume, visit http://www.archives.gov/careers/jobs/forms/resume-guide.pdf.

Failure to submit all required documents by the closing date will result in a finding of ineligible. We are not responsible for incomplete, illegible or missing documents.

Please DO NOT email your application documents. We cannot accept documents received via the email system. Documents sent via email will NOT receive consideration.

Applicants claiming eligibility for the Expanded Veterans Hiring Opportunity (EVHO), MUST submit a DD Form 214 reflecting character of service to verify eligibility by the closing date of the announcement as requested by the Human Resource Office. Eligibility for EVHO will be considered based on applicable documentation submitted by the closing date.

If you are a current or former Federal employee (including a current FAA employee), you MUST provide a copy of your SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) containing information in Blocks 15, 17, 18, 19, 22, and 24 so it can be used to verify your position title, series, grade, tenure, and organization of record by the closing date of the announcement. You may fax your SF-50 or upload it into the on-line application. If faxing the SF-50, please ensure you include the vacancy announcement number on the faxed copy.

If you are a current Federal employee and need a current copy of your SF-50, please contact your personnel office. If you are an FAA employee, you can access and print your SF-50 from the eOPF system https://eopf.opm.gov/dot/. If you are a former Federal employee, you can obtain a copy of your SF-50 by writing the National Personnel Records Center Annex, 1411 Boulder Boulevard, Valmeyer, IL 62295. Additional information is available from this link: http://www.archives.gov/st-louis/civilian-personnel/.

Expanded Veterans Hiring Opportunity (EVHO) are those veterans who are honorably discharged from the Armed Forces after completing at least three (3) years of continuous active service. Applicants claiming eligibility for EVHO, MUST submit a DD Form 214 reflecting character of service to verify eligibility by the closing date of the announcement as requested by the Human Resource Office. Eligibility for EVHO will be considered based on applicable documentation submitted by the closing date.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Federal employees - Excepted service
Current excepted service federal employees.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Also open to former permanent excepted service federal employees eligible under an interchange agreement. Current or former permanent federal employees must have met a one year probationary period or trial period in the competitive or excepted service. Applications will also be accepted from preference eligibles and veterans who are honorably discharged from the Armed Forces after completing at least 3 years of continuous active duty service.",3804,Washington
13,Junior Analyst,"Koniag, Inc.","Washington, DC 20024 (Southwest Waterfront area)",None,"Arlluk Technology Solutions (ATS) is seeking a Junior Analyst to work with our client in Washington, DC. ATS is looking for an excellent communicator. Our ideal candidate is logical and proactive, thinks through their activities and understands how their work contributes to KGS value to the client. The candidate must demonstrate excellent written and oral communications skills, be self-driven, and work collaboratively with the members on the project team. The ideal candidate will demonstrate excellent listening skills, be able to capture and present ideas articulately as well as numerous smaller administrative and customer support initiatives.
This is a direct, full-time position supporting KGS and our client.
We offer competitive compensation and an extraordinary benefits package including health, dental and vision insurance, 401K with company matching, flexible spending accounts, 11 paid holidays, 3 weeks paid time off, and more.
Essential Functions, Responsibilities & Duties may include, but are not limited to:
Support the continued improvement and enhancement of the Records Management Team including but not limited to responding to feedback from staff, meeting minutes, research, verbal and written communications
Work closely with the government management staff in order to identify customer needs and establish ways upon which customer needs can be met for their maximum benefit and satisfaction
Help document and preparing reports that can be used for improving services within the team
Communicate program goals within the team
Conduct research exercises to gain insight into the use and implementation of records management conversion

Requirements:
Creating project documentation and presentation materials
Experience working with and tracking and managing requests from senior management
Very strong communications skills including; communications, meeting minutes and memos
Ability to plan, organize, and structure work.
Highly skilled in Excel, Word, and other word processing software programs
Showcase good analytical and evaluative skills in tasks
Showcase good written and oral communication skills
Ability to multitask
Have good interpersonal skills

Education:
High school education is required. Some college education desirable, but not required

Work Experience, Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:
Candidates must be a US Citizen with the ability to obtain a Public Trust security clearance, per government requirements
Experience supporting a senior management staff
Excellent communication, customer service and organizational skills
Must be fully fluent in MS Office applications, including Outlook, Word and Excel
Must have incredible attention to detail
Demonstrated abilities including but not limited to:
Creating a positive environment for the team
Exceeding client expectations
Taking responsibility for delivering work on time

Working Environment & Conditions
This position is primarily indoors, consistent with a standard office position and has a noise level of mostly low to moderate. The incumbent is required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear. The work load may require the incumbent to stand for extended periods of time. The incumbent must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 lbs. Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.
Our Equal Employment Opportunity Policy
The company is an equal opportunity employer. The company shall not discriminate against any employee or applicant because of race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender or gender identity (except where gender is a bona fide occupational qualification), national origin, age, disability, military/veteran status, marital status, genetic information or any other factor protected by law. We are committed to equal employment opportunity in all decisions related to employment, promotion, wages, benefits and all other privileges, terms and conditions of employment.
The company is dedicated to seeking all qualified applicants. If you require an accommodation to navigate or to apply to a position on our website, please contact Heaven Wood via e-mail at accommodations@koniag-gs.com to request accommodations. This contact information is used for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire on a status of your application.",3804,Washington
14,Military Analyst,Central Intelligence Agency,"Washington, DC 20505 (Foggy Bottom area)","$58,070 - $159,286 a year","Military Analysts provide U.S. policymakers and military leaders analysis and briefings on foreign military forces, their structure, capabilities, doctrine, and tactics.

Full time
Starting salary: $58,070 - $159,286
Bachelor’s or master’s degree
Foreign language bonus eligible

About the Job

As a Military Analyst at CIA, you’ll provide U.S. policymakers with analysis of foreign military forces, their structure, capabilities, doctrine, and tactics. Analysts frequently provide briefings and written analysis to senior military leaders. You’ll work closely with other CIA analysts and Intelligence Community members to produce timely and accurate all-source analysis.

Opportunities exist for foreign and domestic travel, language training, analytic and management training and assignments to other offices in the Agency and throughout the US Government.

Who You’ll Work With

At the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA), we recognize our Nation’s strength comes from the diversity of its people. People from a broad range of backgrounds and viewpoints work at CIA, and our diverse teams are the reason we can keep our country safe.

Read more about diversity and inclusion

What You’ll Get

Our benefits support every aspect of a working professional’s life, including health and wellness, time off, family, finances, and continuing education. Our programs include highly sought-after government health benefits, flexible schedules, sick leave, and childcare. In some cases, we also offer sign-on incentives and cover moving expenses if you relocate.

As a CIA employee, you’ll also get the satisfaction of knowing your work is part of something bigger than yourself. Our work is driven by one mission: to keep our Nation safe. Every day is an opportunity to enhance U.S. national security.

Learn more about working at CIA

Minimum Qualifications

Bachelor’s or master’s degree in one of the following fields:
History
International Relations
Political Science
War Studies
At least a 3.0 GPA on a 4-point scale preferred
Strong critical thinking and problem-solving skills
Ability to meet the minimum requirements for joining CIA, including U.S. citizenship and a background investigation
Desired Qualifications
Interest in international affairs
Awareness of U.S. national security interests
Foreign language capability
Strong verbal presentation skills
Demonstrated ability to write clear, concise text
Research experience in international affairs
Ability to work in a team environment
Interest in a career that requires regular writing assignments
Previous military experience as a Military Analyst or Foreign Area Specialist/Officer (FAO)
Experience in order of battle – database development
Interest in military history
What You’ll Need to Apply
Resume
Unofficial transcripts for all degrees
A cover letter specifying your qualifications for one or more analytic positions. Please address why you want to work as an analyst and what differentiates you from other applicants.
Two (2) different writing samples, three to five pages (3-5) each, single-spaced PDF. Submit papers that showcase your writing style, research abilities and critical thinking skills. Subject matter should focus on your current areas of expertise that relate to your interest in positions at the CIA. You can excerpt longer papers.",3804,Washington
15,Sr Cyber Security Analyst,Raytheon Intelligence & Space,"Washington, DC 20590 (Southwest Federal Center area)",None,"Businesses Raytheon Intelligence & Space
Clearance type None / Not Required
Relocation eligible No
Ability to Telecommute No telecommuting
Job ID 182025BR
Most Recent Date Posted 06/15/2021
City Washington
State DC
Country United States
Raytheon Technologies has an opening for a Sr. Level Cyber Security Analyst in Washington, DC. The qualified Personnel will be able to analyze alerts/security events/logs for threats such as computer viruses, exploits, and malicious attacks; Use critical thinking to bring together information from multiple sources to determine if a threat is present; Be able to effectively notate work completed during an investigation; Track incoming alerts from multiple clients, and sources effectively.

This position requires a minimum of 7 years of applicable experience.

This position requires 100% onsite Customer support.
THIS POSITION IS CONTINGENT UPON CONTRACT AWARD.

Selected candidates will work any of the following 4 day 10 hour shifts based on customer need:
Sunday-Wednesday
5a-3p

12p-10p

8p-6a


Wednesday-Saturday
5a-3p

12p-10p

8p-6a

Required Skills:
The qualified Personnel will be able to analyze alerts/security events/logs for threats such as computer viruses, exploits, and malicious attacks;
Use critical thinking to bring together information from multiple sources to determine if a threat is present;
Utilize knowledge of attack vectors and attack progression to perform root cause analysis;
Perform dynamic malware analysis to determine the exact nature of a threat.

Any one of the following Certifications:
GCIACEHSANS 504Security+Network+A+Or related entry level certification
Preferred Education:
B.S./B.A. in Engineering, Science, or Mathematics is preferred. However, work experience may be used in lieu of education/degree.
This position requires a U.S. Citizenship.182025

Raytheon Technologies is An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status, age or any other federally protected class.",3804,Washington
16,Procurement Analyst,Direct Client,"Washington, DC 20049 (Downtown area)",$35 - $38 an hour,"Job Title: Procurement Analyst 100% REMOTE ROLE Procurement Analyst is responsible for assisting in the procurement process by coordinating the purchase of equipment, services, supplies and materials for contracts already in place.Advise and assist in the preparation of contracts which include procurement proposals, qualifications and verification of information. Work closely with the senior director, the COP team, central offices, legal staff, outside attorneys, Corporate Counsel, vendors, and others as assigned.Must have SW licensing agreement and PeopleSoft experience.Work with Legal and Security (data and privacy issues).Job Type: ContractPay: $35.00 - $38.00 per hourSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayExperience:SW licensing agreement and PeopleSoft: 1 year (Preferred)Work Remotely:YesSpeak with the employer+91 5555555555",3804,Washington
17,Sr. Information Security Analyst (Remote),Parsons,"Centreville, VA 20120",None,"Minimum Clearance Required to Start:
Not Applicable/None
Job Description:
Sr. Information Security Analyst (Remote)
Your talent for collaboration sparks new ideas
You enjoy putting your head together with colleagues to build on ideas. Your collaborative spirit encourages others to feel that they’re being heard and acknowledged. You participate fully in analyzing possible scenarios and considering different solutions. Your acceptance of new perspectives cultivates relationships in an environment of respect. We invite you to apply.
Summary:
The focus for the Senior Information Security Analyst covers information security, information assurance, and compliance design, integration, implementation, modification, and coordination of the installation, testing, operation, and disposition of hardware and software systems. Functions may include conducting analyses, developing functional and technical requirements and specifications, documentation, monitoring the availability, serviceability, and recoverability of installed technology security systems, implementing information security procedures and tools, maintaining systems configuration, managing the installation and integration of system patches updates, and enhancements, and ensuring the rigorous application of information security/information assurance policies, principles, and practices.
SPECIFIC RESPONSIBILITIES:
The Senior Information Security Analyst proactively evaluates the system and network enterprise environments and uses technical knowledge and analytical skill to determine the optimum mix of technology, policy, procedures and education to implement effective information security programs and strategies.
The Senior Information Security Analyst determines security controls, configurations, procedures, and policies based off industry standards, best practices, federal, and state regulations, and contractual requirements.
The Senior Information Security Analyst establishes and manages program control processes, compliance assessments to determine deviations from acceptable configurations, policy, or standards, and provides expertise in compliance requirements for internal and external reviews of requirements
Senior Information Security Analyst assists with the identification and mitigation of risk posed to the confidentially, integrity, and availability of information systems.
The Senior Information Security Analyst fully masters and explains to others the information security requirements for legal and regulatory compliance including DFARS 48 CFR § 252.204-7012 (Safeguarding covered defense information and cyber incident reporting) and 252.204-7021 Cybersecurity Maturity Model Certification Requirements, NIST SP 800-171 (Protecting Controlled Unclassified Information in Nonfederal Systems and Organizations), HIPAA (Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act), ISO-27001 Information Security Management system, and other federal regulations and statutes.
Performs Continuous monitoring of system where they are responsible for monitoring and tracking system vulnerabilities and compliance issues.
Generates Plans of Action & Milestones (POA&M) to track the mitigation of vulnerabilities and compliance issues.
Responds to data calls, scan requests and weekly and monthly reporting.
Generates security artifacts such as System Security Plans, Security Control Traceability Matrices, Configuration Plans and Self-Assessment Test Plans.
Develops techniques and procedures for conducting information security risk assessments and compliance audits; evaluation and testing of hardware, firmware and software for possible impact on system security
Conducts technical and policy-based information security risk reviews of third-party vendors.
Reviews RFPs to ensure information security requirements are fully and correctly stated
Monitors and follows up to ensure that appropriate mitigation and remediation actions have been taken on risk- assessment findings.
Gathers, creates and presents information security metrics to middle, senior and executive management levels using appropriate visualization techniques.
Reviews Change Requests for security impacts and technical documentation from a security perspective.
Participates in Agile Planning Events to provide technical input in addition to risk assessments for software, systems and services, etc.
Have the support that frees you to excel
In a workplace where people from diverse backgrounds willingly offer help when it’s needed… where you feel included, recognized, and supported by management … where your efforts are encouraged and your accomplishments rewarded… you’re certain to do your best work. Come get and give the support that counts.
QUALIFICATIONS:
5+ years of experience as a security professional and developing security policies.
5+ years of experience working in a Microsoft environment.
Experience with Cloud Security systems, processes and tools (ex., CloudWatch)
Knowledge and experience with Cloud Computing relating to Microsoft Azure and/or AWS architectures.
Strong understanding of policy, compliance, and best practice security principles.
Previous experience with vulnerability assessments and testing.
Excellent written and communication skills.
Strong work ethic, demonstrated self-starter, ability to work in a team-oriented environment.
Strong organizational skills.
CERTIFICATIONS:
One of the following is preferred: CySA+, Security+, Certified in Risk and Information Systems Control (CRISC), ISO27001 Certified ISMS Lead Implementer, ISO27001 Certified ISMS Lead Auditor.
Tell us where you’re going. We’ll help you plot the route!
Let us be your “tour guide” on your path to even greater success. We’ll work with you to structure your goals, set up timelines, and pair you with mentors to accelerate your achievements. We might even discover talents that you didn’t know you have and help you develop them. We are enthusiastic advocates of diversity, appreciative of the talents and perspectives every person contributes. Let us include you on our structured career path to success.
SKILLS/COMPETENCIES:
US Citizenship required.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with ability to accurately evaluate current security procedures and develop plans for remedying any identified areas of weakness.
Relationship skills and collaborative style to enable success across multiple partners.
Documentation, planning, negotiation, work prioritization and organizational skills.
Basic knowledge of network technologies (MPLS, VPN, Wireless), boundary protection and Cloud extensions (Intrusion Detection System, Intrusion Prevention System, Firewalls, Proxies, Email Gateways, etc.), device and user authentication (digital signatures, multi-factor authentication technologies), cryptography, and security control compliance assessment to various industry standards.
Exposure in cloud security, mobility security, virtualization/containerization strategies is desirable.
Familiarity with governance, risk and compliance (GRC) and Integrated Risk Management (IRM) platforms is desirable.
Understanding of NIST SP 800-171, 800-53, FedRAMP and related special publications and impacts on a commercial organization. Familiarity with ISO 27000-series, ISO 27001/27002, SOX, or other information security control frameworks.
Written, verbal and presentation communication skills and the ability to thrive in a dynamic environment handling multiple priorities.
Ability to receive constructive feedback and apply it.
Parsons (NYSE: PSN) is a leading technology firm driving the future of defense, intelligence, and critical infrastructure. By combining unique technologies with deep domain expertise across cybersecurity, missile defense, space, connected infrastructure, and smart cities, we're providing tomorrow's solutions today. With a history of disruption beginning in 1944, we apply our distinct perspective to help our customers confront the issues of tomorrow in every domain—land, sea, air, space, and cyber. Our range of capabilities and our global network of resources lets us layer and integrate solutions to respond to any challenge with unmatched agility. In a time of rapid change, we see infinite sources of inspiration to fuel our creativity and enable the innovation necessary to accomplish our quest of delivering a better world.",3804,Washington
18,Senior Service Desk Technician,General Dynamics Information Technology,"Washington, DC 20003 (Navy Yard area)",None,"Travel Required: None
Public Trust: NACI (T1)
Requisition Type: Pipeline
General Dynamics Information Technology provides information technology, systems engineering, professional services and simulation and training to customers in the defense, federal civilian government, health, homeland security, intelligence, state and local government and commercial sectors. Our company delivers IT enterprise solutions, manages large-scale, mission-critical IT programs and provides mission support services.

We have an opportunity for a Senior Service Desk Technician to solve basic technical problems and investigates elevated issues by confirming the validity of the problem and seeking known solutions related to these more complex issues. Activities may include, but are not limited to software repair, diagnostic testing, and the utilization of remote control tools used to take over the user’s machine for the sole purpose of troubleshooting and finding a solution to the problem. Also responsible for the research and development of solutions to new or unknown issues.
Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Provides sound customer service and telephone etiquette in responding to customer calls or inquiries for service and support
Utilizes strong attention to detail and problem solving, to provide outstanding customer support
Analyzes and resolves complex service requests and incidents some of which may have been escalated by the junior level analysts
Leverages remote control technology (such as BOMGAR) while troubleshooting desktop and laptop problems
Utilizes advanced technical skills to analyze and resolve technical issues and tasks, including but not limited to setting up shared drives, mapping network drives, installing and updating software, and network troubleshooting
Requirements:
Experience with Microsoft Windows, Microsoft SQL Server, Microsoft SharePoint, Microsoft Active Directory, Basic Networking Protocols, Remote Desktop Experience, General Hardware/Software Troubleshooting Experience. and Web Browser General Knowledge
DESIRED QUALIFICATIONS: AA/AS, 1+ years experience
Please note: this requisition is a pipeline requisition in support of a contract recompete, not fully funded by the customer. This may result in delayed responses from the GDIT Talent Acquisition team.
We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.
GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3804,Washington
19,Health Program Analyst,Mitre Corporation,"McLean, VA",None,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.
MITRE is seeking experienced analysts with consulting and management skills and the ability to develop expertise in public health, quality improvement, performance measures, policy development, care delivery process improvement, health IT, stakeholder engagement, or program implementation to support agencies within The Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) through all phases of healthcare modernization and transformation. The candidate best suited for the position will thrive in a highly dynamic environment, easily performing independent work, as well as working comfortably in team settings. The position will include strategic and tactical planning, interfacing with customers, project management, and interactions with both public and private sector entities in advising Federal health agencies. This position requires experience interacting with senior level leaders and the ability to develop general subject matter expertise in health policy, public health, health information technology, and other health-related government initiatives. The position provides an exciting opportunity to make a substantive impact in the areas of health care quality, federal policy, and public health.
Key Functions:
Work collaboratively with federal government sponsors, industry stakeholders and MITRE colleagues to shape project initiatives and deliver project work
Apply specific subject matter knowledge to achieve project objectives and to contribute to impactful outcomes
Assist HHS with analysis in support of federal health program implementations
Develop products such as research papers, briefing papers, and recommendations to support program administration
Deliver strategic advice and counsel to HHS, and potentially other healthcare entities for the advancement of health outcomes
Basic Qualifications:
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances
BS degree in a related field
2 years related experience
Required Qualifications:
Ability to obtain and maintain HHS Suitability clearance
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including the ability to clearly communicate analyses and findings to various stakeholders
Strong leadership, including the executive presence needed to work directly with federal government representatives
Strong project management experience, track record of successful execution
Ability to juggle multiple projects simultaneously in a fast-paced environment and work collaboratively with multi-disciplinary teams
Demonstrated strategic and analytical thinking skills and ability to work successfully in ambiguous situations
Ability to create high quality work products with excellent attention to detail
Expert skills in Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint and ability to master new technology tools as needed
Preferred Qualifications:
Master's degree in public health, medicine or healthcare, healthcare policy, public policy, economics, business or related field
This requisition requires the following clearance(s):
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.
Copyright © 1997-2021, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3804,Washington
20,DHS Intelligence Analyst,"Dynamic Planning & Response, LLC.","Arlington, VA","$80,000 - $84,000 a year","As an Intelligence Analyst Watch Team Member for the CISA Integrated Operations Coordination Center (CIOCC) of the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) you will be responsible for assigned tasks during their shift.Intelligence Analyst Watch Team Members shall research, analyze, compose, edit and review CIOCC products; and perform initial analysis of information on questions, issues, or events involving the nation's Critical Infrastructure.Watch Team Members will be responsible for monitoring unclassified and classified Local Area Network (LAN) accounts, in accordance with their security clearance for infrastructure-related information, interfacing with sector representatives, responding to initial requests from the sectors or other parts of DHS, and performing initial research for infrastructure related incidents or request for information from CIOCC customers.The CIOCC maintains 24x7 situational-awareness and crisis monitoring of critical infrastructure and shares threat information, in order to reduce risk, prevent damage, and enable rapid recovery of critical infrastructure assets from incidents caused by natural disasters, attacks, or other emergencies.This is a shift (24x7x365) position.REQUIRED EDUCATION/SKILLS:Must have a current and active security clearance and 5 years of DHS, military staff or other similar related experience at executive staff. BA/BS or prior experience senior DHS or military staff operations experience or a related field, as substitute for degree, is required.Candidates must also meet the following skill requirements:Ability to plan and organize tasks independentlyExercise sound operational judgmentStrong written and oral communication, organization, and interpersonal skillsAbility to pose creative solutions to operational challengesDESIRED EDUCATION/SKILLS: BA/BS in any field, military staff course (Battle Staff, ILE, JPME I) SMC, JPME II, ELC, etc.Qualifications Required:Security ClearancePrevious Military, State or Federal level 24/7 Operation Watch Experience (the more senior level the better)Intelligence Analyst experience preferred.Compensation Package:DP&R offers a comprehensive benefits package which includes:Paid VacationPaid Federal Holidays and Sick Days401(k) planMedical/Dental/Prescription/VisionPerformance-based bonusesPersonal mobile phone planCompany information:Dynamic Planning & Response LLCwww.dynapnr.comDynamic Planning & Response LLC provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.Job Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $80,000.00 - $84,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:12 hour shift8 hour shiftDay shiftHolidaysMonday to FridayNight shiftWeekendsAbility to Commute/Relocate:Arlington, VA (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Intelligence Experience: 3 years (Required)military or agency intelligence: 2 years (Preferred)Security Clearance:Top Secret (Required)Shift Availability:Day Shift (Required)Night Shift (Required)Overnight Shift (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",3804,Washington
21,POLICY ANALYST,US Citizenship and Immigration Services,"Camp Springs, MD","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in the Office of Policy and Strategy

As a Policy Analyst you will serve as the principal subject matter expert responsible for implementing immigration policy objectives within the Office of Policy and Strategy.

Responsibilities
As a member of the Business and Foreign Workers Division, Humanitarian Affairs Division, Residence and Naturalization Division, Security and Public Safety Division, or Policy Development and Coordination Division:
Develops and drafts new immigration policies and regulations based on available data and internal and external input to ensure effective coordination and integration with USCIS goals and objectives.
Serves as a spokesperson for the office and agency with interested internal and external stakeholders on various immigration programs, policies, and positions.
Leads inter- and intra-agency working groups on a range of immigration issues and provides recommendations to achieve agency policy objectives.
Develops and delivers oral and written briefings, talking points, and other publications for supervisors and senior leadership to address complex immigration issues that may impact USCIS and DHS senior level leadership decisions.
Conducts research and balanced assessments on immigration policies, statutes, directives, and regulations to support the development of policy guidance.
Analyzes and devises solutions to resolve and mitigate risks and benefits of various immigration policy proposals.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Similar jobs
Development Managers
Directors, Employee Development
Employee Development Directors
Managers, All Other
Managers, Development
Managers, Training
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S. Citizen or U.S. National to apply for this position
Successfully pass a Background Investigation including financial disclosure
You must pass a drug screening
You must submit resume and supporting documentation
Males born after 12/31/1959 must be registered with the Selective Service
Political appointees may require OPM approval before on-boarding
The qualifications for this position must be met by 11:59 PM (Eastern Time) on the closing date of this announcement.

Current Federal employees must have served 52 weeks at the lower grade or equivalent grade band in the Federal service. The Time-in-Grade requirement must be met by 11:59 PM (Eastern Time) on the closing date of this announcement.

This position is in the bargaining unit.

This position is not considered ""essential"" for purposes of reporting to work when the facility might otherwise be closed.

Residency Requirement: There is a residency requirement for all applicants not currently employed by U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services. This residency requirement states that candidates must have, for three of the last five years immediately prior to applying for this position; (1) resided in the United States; OR (2) worked for the United States Government as an employee overseas in a Federal or Military capacity, OR (3) been a dependent of a U.S. Federal or Military employee serving overseas.

Background Investigation: To ensure the accomplishment of our mission, DHS requires every employee to be reliable and trustworthy. To meet those standards, all selected applicants must undergo and successfully pass a background investigation. This may include a review of financial issues such as delinquency in the payment of debts, child support and/or tax obligations, as well as certain criminal offenses and illegal use or possession of drugs. The background investigation process is initiated after a selection is made. For more information visit the OPM Mythbuster Page.

If a SECRET or TOP SECRET clearance is needed or the position is designated a Sensitive National Security position, all selected candidates must meet the requirements for these clearances or Sensitive National Security position prior to placement AND maintain that level of clearance or national security eligibility while encumbering the position.

Probationary Period: You may be required to serve a probationary period of 1 year.
Qualifications
The USCIS Office of Policy and Strategy was created pursuant to the Homeland Security Act of 2002 to serve as the principal policy advisor for the Director and USCIS, as well as perform research and analysis on immigration issues and program evaluations. In addition, OP&S leads and moderates the Senior Policy Council, manages the USCIS Policy Manual, and oversees the regulatory development process to ensure compliance with the policy goals of USCIS, DHS, and the Administration.

GS-14: You qualify at the GS-14 level if you possess one (1) year of specialized experience, which is equivalent to at least the GS-13 level in the federal government, that equipped you with the skills needed to successfully perform the duties of the position. You must have experience performing the following duties:

Interpreting and applying the Immigration and Nationality Act (INA), regulations, and policies relating to national immigration issues;
Assessing and evaluating various immigration policies and initiatives related to immigration benefit programs;
Interpreting and providing guidance on various immigration policy matters related to immigration benefit programs;
Acting as an organizational representative with other government officials or organizations to explain policy positions and elicit feedback and input;
Leading a team or project to develop and implement complex immigration policies.

The assessments for this job will measure:

Policy and Program Review
Leadership
Written Communication
Attention to Detail
Customer Service
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Problem Solving
Self-Management
Teamwork
Technology Application
Writing

Please read the following important information to ensure you submit everything we need to consider your application: It is your responsibility to ensure that you submit your responses and appropriate documentation prior to the closing date. Your resume serves as the basis for qualification determinations and must highlight your most relevant and significant experience and education (if applicable), as it relates to this job opportunity announcement. USCIS will only review the first 5 pages of your resume to determine your initial eligibility/qualifications for a position. As such, please be sure to include content to support your eligibility/qualifications for this position within the first 5 pages. Please note that your full resume will be made available to the hiring manager if you are referred. Be clear and specific when describing your work history since Human Resources cannot make assumptions regarding your experience. Your application will be rated and ranked based on your responses to the online questions.

Please ensure EACH work history includes ALL of the following information:

Job Title (include series and grade if Federal Job)
Duties (be specific in describing your duties)
Employer's name and address
Supervisor name and phone number
Start and end dates including month, day and year (e.g. June 18 2007 to April 05 2008)
Start and end dates for each grade/pay level if you've held a federal position.
Full-time or part-time status (include hours worked per week)
Salary

Determining length of General or Specialized Experience is dependent on the above information and failure to provide the above information may result in a finding of ineligible.

Note: Overstating your qualifications and/or experience in your application materials or application questionnaire may result in your removal from consideration.

Federal Experience: If you are using current or prior federal experience as a basis for qualifying for this position, the grade levels and length of employment (mm/dd/year) at each grade level must be listed in your work history. This information will be further validated if selected for this position.

The Office of Personnel Management (OPM) must authorize employment offers made to current or former political appointees. If you are currently, or have been within the last 5 years, a political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee in the Executive Branch, you must disclose this information to the Human Resources Office

National Service Experience (i.e., volunteer experience): Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build criteria competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer service. Please provide the dates and amount of time/hours worked earning this experience.
Education
EDUCATIONAL SUBSTITUTION: There is no educational substitution at this grade level.
Additional information
Special Employment Consideration: The Department of Homeland Security encourages persons with disabilities to apply, to include persons with intellectual, severe physical or psychiatric disabilities, as defined by 5 CFR § 213.3102(u), and/or Disabled Veterans with a compensable service-connected disability of 30 percent or more as defined by 5 CFR § 315.707. Veterans, Peace Corps, VISTA volunteers, and persons with disabilities possess a wealth of unique talents, experiences, and competencies that can be invaluable to the DHS mission. If you are a member of one of these groups, you may not have to compete with the public for federal jobs. To determine your eligibility for non-competitive appointment and to understand the required documentation, click on the links above or contact the Servicing Human Resources Office listed at the bottom of this announcement.

Any offers of employment made pursuant to this announcement will be consistent with all applicable authorities, including Presidential Memoranda, Executive Orders, interpretive U.S. Office of Personnel Management guidance and U.S. Office of Management and Budget plans and policies concerning hiring. These authorities are subject to change.

Additional Information:

USCIS uses E-Verify, an Internet-based system, to confirm the eligibility of all newly hired employees to work in the United States. Learn more about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities.

If you receive a conditional offer of employment for this position, you will be required to complete an Optional Form 306, Declaration for Federal Employment, and to sign and certify the accuracy of all information in your application, prior to entry on duty. False statements on any part of the application may result in withdrawal of offer of employment, dismissal after beginning work, fine, or imprisonment.

It is our responsibility to eliminate any risks to national security, public health, and public safety that could be posed by individuals who use illegal drugs. This position may be subject to random testing as a condition of employment. A positive drug test or refusal to be tested will result in disciplinary action, up to and including removal from Federal service.

Note: If you previously retired from the Federal service and are receiving an annuity, your salary may be offset by the amount of your annuity.

Applying to this announcement certifies that you give permission for DHS to share your application with others in DHS for similar positions.

Common definitions for hiring terms found in this announcement.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated for this position based upon information reflected in your resume. Your resume must support your responses to the job specific assessment questionnaire, level of education claimed, experience, and/or training. To remain in consideration for this position, please ensure your resume covers this requirement and that your resume has been successfully submitted as part of your on-line application package.

Creation of this package includes completing the on-line assessment questionnaire, uploading your resume, and uploading any required supporting documents.

NOTE: Your resume and supporting documentation will be verified. If you rated yourself higher than what is supported by your application material, you may be excluded from consideration for this job. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating or consideration for employment.

If you are found best qualified, you may be referred to the hiring manager for consideration and may be called for an interview.

Veterans: Certain veterans are eligible to apply as a status candidate under the Veterans Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA). View Feds Hire vets for more information.

 Agency Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or the Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP) Eligible: If you have never worked for the federal government, you are not CTAP/ICTAP eligible. View information about CTAP or ICTAP eligibility on OPM's Career Transition Resources website. To be considered well qualified under CTAP/ ICTAP, you must be placed in the Well-Qualified category for this position, as described above. In addition, you must submit the supporting documents listed under the required documents section of this job announcement.

Note: Applicants who are referred to the hiring office for selection consideration may be required to complete a writing sample and/or other writing exercise as part of the interview/selection process. If the hiring office decides to request a writing sample and/or other writing exercise as part of its selection process, a designated contractor or Agency representative will contact you to: (1) inform you of this requirement; and (2) provide further instructions.

Conditions of Employment Reminder: If you fail to meet the conditions of employment or any other pre-employment requirements, such as missing any of the scheduled appointments, the hiring agency may rescind their tentative offer of employment.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
Yes
Required Documents

Required Documents
Resume: You must submit a resume that clearly demonstrates you have experience that meets the requirements of this position as outlined in the “Qualifications” section. USCIS’ Human Resources Office will only review the first 5 pages of your resume to determine your eligibility/qualifications.

In order to ensure that you include all necessary information within the first 5 pages of your resume, you are highly encouraged to save and submit your resume as a PDF instead of submitting it through Resume Builder or a word-processing program such as Word or Google Docs.

Your responses to the job questionnaire. (submitted through the on-line application process in USA Jobs. Responses DO NOT need to be attached as an additional document to your application)

Are you a veteran? You must provide acceptable documentation of your preference or appointment eligibility. The member 4 copy of your DD214, ""Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty,"" is preferable. If claiming 10 point preference, you will need to submit a Standard Form (SF-15), ""Application for 10-point Veterans' Preference."" If applying based on eligibility under the Veterans Opportunity to Work (VOW) Act, you must submit certification from the Armed Forces that you will be discharged or released from active duty within 120 days from the date on the certification. This must indicate your dates of service, your rank, and confirm that you will be separated under honorable conditions. View more veterans’ information.

Are you a current or former Federal employee? Submit a copy of your official SF-50 (no text version) or other official ""Notification of Personnel Action"" document that shows the following information:

your appointment in the competitive service
tenure
grade and step
full performance level

If your SF-50(s) does not provide the information needed to make a final determination for qualification, you will be found ineligible for the position. SF-50B print screens from NFC are not official documents and are not acceptable. This includes USCIS employees as well. All current DHS employees can print their own SF-50's by accessing the DHS eOPF website. If you have forgotten your user name or password, eOPF offers a self-service feature to assist you.

If you are a current CIS employee and need access information to eOPF, contact USCIS.EOPF@uscis.dhs.gov. For all other agencies please see your servicing Human Resources Office.

You may be asked to provide a copy of your recent performance appraisal and or incentive awards. If you are a Federal employee and have received a current performance rating, it is strongly encouraged that a copy accompanies your application submission. Doing so allows the selecting official access to all information surrounding your potential to fulfill the duties and responsibilities commensurate of the position being considered for. Failure to provide may impede the selecting official's understanding of the qualifications and experience that you possess.

Are you claiming special priority selection rights under the Agency Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or the Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP)? Submit:

a copy of your agency notice,
a copy of your most recent performance rating, and
a copy of your most recent SF-50, Notification of Personnel Action, noting your current position, grade level, and duty location.

Are you a current or former political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee? Submit a copy of your applicable SF-50, along with a statement that provides the following information regarding your most recent appointment:

Position title
Type of appointment (Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES, or Presidential Appointee)
Agency
Beginning and ending dates of appointment

If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
DHS offers competitive salaries and an attractive benefits package, including: health, dental, vision, life, and long-term care insurance; retirement plan; Thrift Savings Plan [similar to a 401(k)]; Flexible Spending Account; Employee Assistance Program; personal leave days; and paid federal holidays. Other benefits may include: flexible work schedules; telework; tuition reimbursement; transportation subsidies; uniform allowance; health and wellness programs; and fitness centers. DHS is committed to employee development and offers a variety of employee training and developmental opportunities. For more information, go to the DHS Careers website and select ""Benefits."" Disabled veteran leave will be available to any Federal employee hired on or after November 5, 2016, who is a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 30 percent or more.
Review our benefits
Help
This job is open to
Individuals with disabilities
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Internal to an agency
Current federal employees of this agency.
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Current Federal Employees with competitive status, Reinstatement, OPM Interchange Agreement, VEOA, Schedule A and Surplus/Displaced eligibles.",3804,Washington
22,Dep Asst Inspec Gen for Audits,Government of the District of Columbia,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)","$119,706 - $167,586 a year","This position functions as the Deputy Assistant Inspector General for Audits (DAIGA) for the Audit Division. Incumbent serves as a principal advisor and assistant to the Assistant Inspector General for Audits (AIGA) for the overall planning, reporting, liaison, organizational and resource management for the effective performance of the Audit Unit, which entails financial, performance, and attestation audits; reviews of internal controls, and audits and investigative projects covering these activities in all organizational entities comprising the District government.
In conjunction with the AIGA, plans, develops and implements audits and oversight activities to ensure effective management, performance and control of District costs, which includes (1) reviews of District government operations; (2) reviews of contract costs for propriety, including both pre-award and post award audits: and (3) reviews of the quality and appropriateness of services provided to the District, including reviews of performance and compliance with District government policies and regulations, among others.
Leads the development, maintenance, and implementation of adequate policies and procedures to ensure compliance with General Accepted Government Auditing Standards (GAGAS) throughout all phases of an audit. Provides feedback to the senior level auditors/analysts relating to their management of activities for the supervision and professional development of OIG audit staff.
Serves as the principal quality assurance official for all audit products to ensure compliance with GAGAS and internal operating policies and procedures, and to determine sufficiency for issuance.
Provides a management culture for annual performance appraisal reviews of all audit staff and managers; empowers employees to excel in their positions; improves the quality of life at the work place; provides fair and equitable treatment in all aspects of personnel management without regard to political affiliation, race, color, religion, national origin, sex, marital status, age, or disability; and ensures proper regard for employees privacy and constitutional rights.
Performs other related duties as assigned.
Education

Degree: accounting, auditing, or a degree, including auditing courses in a related field such as business administration, finance, or public administration that included or was supplemented by 24 semester hours in accounting. The 24 hours may include up to 6 hours of credit in business law.
Must have at least 5 years of experience managing a team, group or leading an operation
Work Environment
Work is performed in a normal office setting
Other Significant Facts:
Promotion Potential: No known promotion
Duration of Appointment: Management Supervisory Service
Pay Plan, Series, and Grade: CS-511-15
This position is not represented by a collective bargaining unit.
Due to budgetary constraints, the position will be hired at the minimum level for the grade
This position is in the Management Supervisory Service (MSS) and serves at the discretion of the appointing official.
This position is not represented by a collective bargaining unit.
The incumbent of this position will be subject to enhanced suitability screening pursuant to Chapter 4 of DC Personnel Regulations, Suitability – Security Sensitive.
If you are currently receiving a federal retirement, this will not impact your retirement
“If the position you are applying for is in the Career, Management Supervisory, or Educational Service at an annual salary of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or more, you must establish residency in the District of Columbia within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of the appointment and continue to maintain residency within the District of Columbia throughout the duration of the appointment.”
The District of Columbia Government does not discriminate in employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex including pregnancy and gender identity), national origin, political affiliation, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, genetic information, age, membership in an employee organization, retaliation, parental status, military service, or other non-merit factors.
Submission of a resume alone is NOT a complete application. This position may require the completion of additional form/s and/or supplemental materials. Failure to provide the required information and/or materials will result in your application not being considered for employment.",3804,Washington
23,DHS CWMD Junior Intelligence Analyst,DEFTEC Corporation,"Washington, DC","$75,000 - $85,000 a year","DHS CWMD Junior Intelligence Analyst
Washington, D. C.

The CWMD office is responsible for coordinating with other Federal efforts and developing a strategy and policy for the Department to plan for, detect, and protect against the importation, possession, storage, transportation, development, or use of unauthorized chemical, biological, radiological, or nuclear materials, devices, or agents in the United States and to protect against an attack using such materials, devices, or agents against the people, territory, or interests of the United States. Primary responsibilities of CWMD are to:
Support to DHS-frontline personnel who protect the nation from WMD terrorism;
Close capability gaps along adversary pathways; and
Invest in and develop innovative technologies to meet partner requirements and improve operations
What We Can Offer YOU!
EXEPTIONAL COMPANY BENEFITS:
Health, Dental, Vision, Life & AD&D Insurance, Short- and Long-Term Disability, Paid Time Off, 10 Paid Holidays, 401(k) Plan, and more!
POSITION OVERVIEW:
This position will execute complex in-depth WMD threat analysis to produce papers, presentations, and reports.
JOB RESPONSIBILITIES:
Execute complex in-depth WMD threat analysis to produce products (papers, presentations and reports) to inform senior DHS leadership, DHS Components and other federal, state and local homeland security customers for the purposes of: Identifying and understanding WMD Homeland threats and providing recommendations to respond to, mitigate and disrupt such threats
Serve as production or overall author for individual reports and projects
Responsible for supporting customer efforts developing and fostering relationships with DHS and other USG/Intelligence Community partners at the analyst level
QUALIFICATIONS:
Education & Experience
B.A. or M.A. degree in relevant field
3+ years' experience in intelligence analysis
Previous experience with CBRN/WMD-related intelligence preferred
Other Requirements
Active Secret security clearance required
COMPANY OVERVIEW:
DEFTEC's goal is to always be prepared to support our Nation's readiness to counter threats by providing up-the-stream solutions for the Homeland and on the Battlefield to respond to evolving threats. Everything we do is designed to protect our Nation, our national interests overseas, and our warriors on the battlefield. Our company was founded on, and is continuously inspired by, the critical missions that save lives.
DEFTEC Corporation provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, pregnancy, national origin, status as a parent, disability (physical or mental), family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, or other non-merit based factors.",3804,Washington
24,IBM IAM Analyst,Deloitte,"Alexandria, VA 22314 (King St. Metro-Eisenhower Ave. area)",None,"Are you looking to elevate your cyber career? Your technical skills? Your opportunity for growth? Deloitte's Government and Public Services Cyber Practice (GPS Cyber Practice) is the place for you! Our GPS Cyber Practice helps organizations create a cyber minded culture and become stronger, faster, and more innovative. You will become part of a team that advises, implements, and manages solutions across five verticals: Strategy, Defense and Response; Identity; Infrastructure; Data; and Application Security. Our dynamic team offers opportunities to work with cutting-edge cyber security tools, and grow both vertically and horizontally at an accelerated rate. Join our cyber team and elevate your career.
Work you'll do

Utilize IBM Identity and Access Management (ISIM/ISAM) programs to enable government clients to protect against digital identity risks.
Provide appropriate access to applications, systems, and data with advanced authentication.
Oversee the spread of information with privileged access management.
Verify identity utilizing a wide range of IAM solutions including HSPD-12, PIV, and advanced authentication methods.
The team:
Deloitte's Government and Public Services (GPS) practice - our people, ideas, technology and outcomes-is designed for impact. Serving federal, state, & local government clients as well as public higher education institutions, our team of more than 15,000 professionals brings fresh perspective to help clients anticipate disruption, reimagine the possible, and fulfill their mission promise.
At Deloitte, we believe cyber is about starting things-not stopping them-and enabling the freedom to create a more secure future. Cyber Identity leverages methodologies and a digital identity platform to help clients control which employees, partners, suppliers, customers, and citizens have access to sensitive organizational applications and data. Cyber Identity also focuses on the integrations of cutting-edge technologies and cloud providers. Our team is dedicated to enhancing IAM programs so our clients can mitigate risk, reduce intrusion, and secure information. If you're seeking a career in IAM, cloud systems, or identity governance then Cyber Identity is for you.
Qualifications
Required:
Bachelor's degree required
Limited immigration sponsorship may be available.
Experience working with IAM
Experience working with identity governance
Experience working with IBM Identity Access Management or Oracle/Okta
Experience utilizing advanced authentication
Preferred:
Prior professional services or federal consulting experience
Previous identity analytics experience
Experience in consumer identity and directory services
Certifications (e.g., CompTIA Security+, CEH, CISSP)
How you'll grow
At Deloitte, our professional development plan focuses on helping people at every level of their career to identify and use their strengths to do their best work every day. From entry-level employees to senior leaders, we believe there's always room to learn. We offer opportunities to help sharpen skills in addition to hands-on experience in the global, fast-changing business world. From on-the-job learning experiences to formal development programs, our professionals have a variety of opportunities to continue to grow throughout their career.",3804,Washington
25,Management Consulting Analyst,Accenture,"Arlington, VA",None,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Location: Arlington, VA

Management Consulting Analyst

We are:
Accenture Federal Services, helping our federal clients tackle their toughest challenges while unleashing their fullest potential…and then some. What makes our approach so unique? Operating from the nation’s capital, we bring together commercial innovation and leading-edge technologies to deliver an integrated and interactive experience that far exceeds expectations. How? Our passion meets purpose! Through our diverse culture and inclusive thinking, we embrace our employees' ideas taking them from concept to practical solutions. Not to mention, we sleep well at night knowing our work directly impacts and improves the way the world works. We keep our tech smarts sharp by providing abundant training and certification opportunities. Are you ready to learn and grow in a career, while making a difference?
You Are:
Unafraid to experiment and drawn to problem solving. You are willing to share your ideas and work collaboratively in a team environment. You have a strong record of leadership in an academic, professional, and/or extracurricular setting. You have excellent analytical and quantitative problem-solving skills and thrive in the unknown and naturally a problem-solver. You can see all around that the world is changing. You are ready to stretch boundaries –– and yourself.
The Work:
Kick-start your career in our Management Consulting Development Program to build strong relationships with other recent grads and learn about our full array of offerings and capabilities
Receive exceptional training on developing your consulting skills as well as career development coaching and mentoring from senior level executives
Collaborate in a team of 3-5 consultants, playing an active role in all aspects of the client engagement
Solve tough, critical challenges facing our federal clients today
Analyze information, test hypotheses and present recommendations to your client that have a real impact on their business
Work on a variety of client engagements, exploring all the areas of our business
Network and learn from a wide diversity of thought leaders

Here’s what you need -
Bachelor’s degree or Master’s (with a graduation date no later than August 31, 2021
Preferred Qualifications (not required)
Bonus Points if you-
Are known for being analytical, looking at things from all angles
Are resourceful and intellectually curious
Enjoy working in teams
Able to communicate complex ideas effectively – both verbally and in writing.
This role requires US Citizenship with no dual US Citizenship exceptions.
An active security clearance or the ability to obtain one may be required for this role.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Applicants for employment in the U.S. must possess work authorization which does not require now or in the future sponsorship by the employer for a visa.
Accenture is a federal contractor, an EEO and Affirmative Action Employer of Females/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Equal Employment Opportunity
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",3804,Washington
26,Regulatory Impact Analyst,US Environmental Protection Agency,"Washington, DC","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is in the Office of the Administrator, Office of Policy, Office of Regulatory Policy and Management, Policy and Regulatory Analysis Division.

If selected, you must work at the location stated in this announcement.

About: The Office of the Administrator

Responsibilities
You will:
Monitor key Agency regulatory program components to advise and make recommendations to the Division Director regarding regulation and policy options.
Participate on work groups to collaborate with managers, other programs and core office staff to assist in developing Agency wide regulations and policies.
Analyze applicable Agency policy, federal regulations, and program guidance to identify, address, and prioritize important policy issues.
Provide guidance to Agency senior management by presenting alternative approaches based on increased flexibility, efficiency and effectiveness to influence policy decisions.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
If you are selected, a pre-employment background check is required.
You may be required to travel less 25% of each month.
You must submit a resume and required documents-see How to Apply section.
You must be a U.S. citizen.
If you are selected, you may be required to complete a one-year probationary period.

This position is designated as Moderate Risk and requires a background investigation. Unless an appropriate background investigation is already on record with the Office of Personnel Management, you must undergo a background investigation. All conditions of the pre-employment security process must be met before an official letter of employment can be issued with a report for duty date.
Qualifications
We are looking for at least one year of specialized experience related to this position as described below:

To qualify for the GS-14 level, you need to have at least one full year of experience at the GS-13 level defined as analyzing scientific, economic, and/or environmental data to identify and recommend alternative options; collaborating with stakeholders on the development of regulations and/or policies; and developing data reports and briefing materials to convey policy options to varying levels of management.

Your answers to the online assessment will be used to evaluate your competencies in the following areas: 1) Skill in applying environmental public policy, regulations and guidelines; 2) Knowledge of regulatory programs; 3) Skill in interpreting broad environmental policies, guidance and regulations; 4) Skill in problem solving techniques related to environmental policy; 5) Skill in developing analytical studies to identify program policy issues; 6) Skill in making policy recommendations to senior management; 7) Skill in oral communication; 8) Skill in written communication.

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional, philanthropic, religious, spiritual, community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

If you have part-time work experience, read this: EPA Announcement Policies and Procedures.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
This position is in the bargaining unit.

Are you a Displaced Federal Employee? If so, please read the Required Documents section and visit the EPA website for additional information: EPA Announcement Policies and Procedures

EPA participates in E-Verify. E-Verify is an Internet based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) in partnership with the Social Security Administration (SSA) that enables participating employers to electronically verify the employment eligibility of their newly hired employees. For additional information: EPA Announcement Policies and Procedures.

If you are selected, travel, transportation, and relocation expenses will not be paid by EPA. Any travel, transportation, and relocation expenses associated with reporting to work in this position will be your responsibility.

Except in special circumstances, those new to the federal government will be hired at the starting salary (step 1) of the applicable grade range listed above.

This position has portable work. If selected for this position, you may be authorized to telework after meeting eligibility requirements if approved by the supervisor/manager. Telework is available based on agency policy and/or applicable collective bargaining agreement which may not allow for full-time telework. NOTE: The agency is currently utilizing maximum telework flexibilities due to COVID. Once normal operations resume, you will be required to report to the location stated in this announcement.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
We will review your resume and required documents to ensure you meet the basic qualification requirements. Your resume must address the knowledge, skills, and abilities listed in the Qualifications section. If you meet basic qualification requirements, your application will be further evaluated based on your answers to the online assessment. Your responses to the online assessment will be used to measure the degree to which your background matches the requirements for the position. You are being evaluated under the category rating method which means, if you are determined to be qualified, you will be placed into the ‘Best Qualified’, ‘Well Qualified’, or ‘Qualified’ category.

We will compare your resume and supporting documentation to your responses on the assessment questionnaire. If you rate yourself higher than is supported by your application materials, your responses may be adjusted and/or you may be excluded from consideration for this job. We will evaluate your qualifications and eligibility and notify you if you meet minimum qualification requirements. If you are referred for consideration, you may be subject to additional assessments.

NOTE: We do not require a separate statement responding to the competencies, also referred to as Knowledges, Skills, and Abilities (KSAs). However, your resume should clearly show possession of these competencies.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
Documents to be submitted online:

NOTE: You should ensure your social security number, date of birth, and any other personal information are redacted.
-Resume clearly stating your experience related to this position as described in the Duties section and Qualifications section. In describing your experience, you need to be clear and specific. We may not make assumptions regarding your experience.
-Responses to the online assessment questionnaire (you must complete this online - it is not a document you need to upload).
-Veterans' Preference Documents:
Separated veterans claiming 5-point preference:
DD-214 Member 4 copy (or other copy indicating character of service) or other official document/statement from the Armed Forces showing separation, discharge, or release from active duty; document must show separation is under honorable conditions (Honorable or General Discharge)
Separated veterans claiming 10-point preference based on compensable service-connected disability of 10% or more:
DD-214 Member 4 copy (or other copy indicating character of service); document must show separation is under honorable conditions (Honorable or General Discharge); and
VA letter stating overall/combined disability rating (percentage); and
SF-15 (use current version: SF-15 Form) (see page 2 for documents that can be submitted in lieu of the DD-214 and VA letter)
Other separated veterans claiming 10-point preference OR spouses, widows/widowers, or mothers claiming 10-point derived preference:
SF-15 (use current version: SF-15 Form); and
Other required documentation indicated on the SF-15
Active duty service members:
Certification from the armed forces documenting active duty dates, expected discharge/release date, campaign medals/badges, and character of service (a certification is any written document from the armed forces that certifies you are expected to be discharged/released from active duty service in the armed forces under honorable conditions (Honorable or General Discharge) within 120 days after you submit the certification)
-Displaced Federal employees under ICTAP/CTAP: copy of your most recent performance appraisal, proof of eligibility, and your most current SF-50 noting position, grade level, tenure, and duty station.
To learn more about submitting documentation, visit Uploading Documents to USAJOBS.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Join EPA in protecting human health and the environment and enjoy many work life quality options! Working for the EPA offers you a comprehensive benefits package that includes, in part, paid vacation, sick leave, holidays, life insurance, health benefits, and participation in the Federal Employees Retirement System. To learn more about us, visit Life and Careers at EPA.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
U. S. Citizens",3804,Washington
27,Deputy Assistant Secretary for Policy,US Office of the Assistant Secretary for Policy,"Washington, DC","$132,552 - $199,300 a year","Duties
Summary
The Office of the Assistant Secretary for Policy (OASP) is part of the Office of the Secretary within the U.S. Department of Labor. OASP provides advice to the Secretary, Deputy Secretary, and Department leadership on matters of policy development, program evaluation and implementation, regulations, data governance, compliance strategies, research, and legislation to improve the lives of workers, retirees, and their families.

Responsibilities
The incumbent advises the Assistant Secretary on the management and administration of OASP’s regulatory, policy, data, and research agendas. The incumbent assists in carrying out decisions and directives related to the broad issues and developments considered by the Office, and its four Divisions: the Chief Evaluation Office, Office of Compliance Initiatives, Office of Data Governance, and the Office of Regulatory and Programmatic Policy.

The incumbent facilitates the timely promulgation of high quality regulations that are consistent with the Secretary’s vision, Executive Orders, statutes and OMB Bulletins; enhances the quality of DOL’s policy, regulatory and legislative initiatives and innovations by facilitating cross-agency collaboration and interagency cooperation; and facilitates the implementation of cross-agency open government projects within DOL. Integral to this role, the incumbent manages cross- and inter-Department activities.

The incumbent represents OASP and the Secretary in dealings with policy officials at the highest levels within the government and represents the Department on administration task forces and committees dealing with matters in the purview of OASP.

The incumbent is specifically responsible for management and administration. They supervise an organization which is composed of SES level positions and GS 12-15 economists, program analysts, and others with skills and expertise in data governance, economics, as well as policy analysis, research, evaluation and other specialized programmatic expertise. The incumbent establishes program policy procedures, goals and objectives; budgets and plans; and coordinates, advises and evaluates the work performed by OASP’s divisions, individually and as a whole. The incumbent exercises final authority in carrying out normal personnel management responsibilities in areas such as EEO, selection, discipline, and performance appraisals. The incumbent is also responsible for ensuring the agency takes appropriate steps to meet diversity, disability, and procurement goals.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - Less than 25%.
Supervisory status
Yes
Promotion Potential
00
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Similar jobs
Assistants, Executive
Assistants, Office
Executive Assistants
Executive Secretaries
Office Assistants
Office Secretaries
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Appointment to this position may require a background investigation.
Subject to financial disclosure requirements.
Requires a probationary period if the requirement has not been met.
Must meet Mandatory Technical and Executive Core Qualifications.
Candidates must possess technical and management experience and have developed the knowledge and skills required for effective performance of the specific duties of this position.
Qualifications
Candidates must possess technical and management experience and have developed the knowledge and skills required for effective performance of the specific duties of the position. Candidates must have had experience at a major management level (normally equivalent to the GS-15 level in the Federal service). All applications MUST separately address each of the Executive Core Qualifications and the Mandatory Technical Qualifications when applying on line. Responses to ECQs must not exceed 10 pages. For additional guidance, applicants may visit the Office Of Personnel Management's Guide to Senior Executive Qualifications located at: www.opm.gov/ses/references/GuidetoSESQuals_2010.pdf. Applicants are encouraged to follow the Challenge, Context, Action, and Result model outlined in the guide.

EXECUTIVE CORE QUALIFICATIONS (ECQs):

1. Leading Change: This core qualification involves the ability to bring about strategic change, both within and outside the organization, to meet organizational goals. Inherent to this ECQ is the ability to establish an organizational vision and to implement it in a continuously changing environment.
2. Leading People: This core qualification involves the ability to lead people toward meeting the organization's vision, mission, and goals. Inherent to this ECQ is the ability to provide an inclusive workplace that fosters the development of others, facilitates cooperation and teamwork, and supports constructive resolution of conflicts.
3. Results Driven: This core qualification involves the ability to meet organizational goals and customer expectations. Inherent to this ECQ is the ability to make decisions that produce high-quality results by applying technical knowledge, analyzing problems, and calculating risks.
4. Business Acumen: This core qualification involves the ability to manage human, financial, and information resources strategically.
5. Building Coalitions: This core qualification involves the ability to build coalitions internally and with other Federal agencies, state and local governments, nonprofit and private sector organizations, foreign governments, or international organizations to achieve common goals. For additional guidance, applicants may visit the Office Of Personnel Management's Guide to Senior Executive Service Qualifications located at www.opm.gov/ses/references/GuidetoSESQuals_2010.pdf. Applicants are encouraged to follow the Challenge, Context, Action, and Result model outlined in the guide.

MANDATORY TECHNICAL QUALIFICATIONS (MTQs): In writing your narrative responses to the MTQs, please give examples and explain how often you used your skills, the complexity of the knowledge possessed, the level of people you interacted with, the sensitivity of the issues you handled, etc. APPLICANTS SHOULD LIMIT THEIR RESPONSES TO ONE (1) SINGLE SPACED PAGE PER EACH MTQ WITH THE FONT SIZE NO SMALLER THAN POINT 12.

1. Strong experience in developing and implementing internal processes within an organization, including familiarity with federal systems for human resources, strategic and operational planning, performance management, budget and procurement management.

2. Ability to understand and oversee regulatory policy-making, including the development, issuance, and/or economic analysis of regulations.

3. Ability to engage and advise teams charged with conducting program evaluations and overseeing data governance for the Department, including developing plans for publishing research findings and launching new data products and services.

4. Strong written and oral communication skills with demonstrated ability to formulate and communicate complex and sensitive policy issues to multiple and diverse stakeholders, including Department leadership and intergovernmental agencies.
Education
There is no educational requirement for this position.
Additional information

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated based on your experience and your responses to the Executive Core Qualifications (ECQs) and the Mandatory Technical Qualifications (MTQs). It is essential that your resume provide sufficient information to substantiate your responses in the self-assessment vacancy questions. If your responses are not adequately substantiated by your resume, your application will be rated ineligible.

Current/Former Career Senior Executive Service (SES) or SES Candidate Development graduates who have been certified by the Office of Personnel Management (OPM) must provide a narrative response to address each of the MTQs, but need not address the ECQs. In order to successfully complete the online application process you must input the term, ""noncompetitive eligible"" in the text boxes for each of the ECQs. You must submit a Standard Form 50 that documents your SES Career appointment or a copy of your OPM approved SES Candidate Development Program certificate.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Confidential
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Critical-Sensitive (CS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
Credentialing
Required Documents

Required Documents
1. SF-50 documentation of career SES appointment or other Federal appointment (if applicable). 2. Certificate of completion of OPM certified SES candidate program (if applicable) 3. Performance Appraisal (if applicable).
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Senior executives
Those who meet the five Executive Core Qualifications (ECQs).",3804,Washington
28,Counterterrorism Analyst (Pentagon) - TS/SCI,Assertive Professionals,"Arlington, VA 22201","$73,000 - $78,000 a year ++","Assertive Professionals is in search of multiple Counterterrorism / Insurgency (CT/IA) Analysts to support the Defense Intelligence Agency’s (DIA) Defense Combating Terrorism Center (DCTC). The DIA Consultant in this role will:
Provide strategic and operational analysis to support to the Policy and Warning Division's Pentagon Support Branch located at the Pentagon in Arlington, Virginia.
Serve as a transnational terrorism desk officer for a specified area supporting transnational terrorism analytic requirements for the Joint Staff Director of Intelligence. Analytic areas include the Middle East, South East Asia, Africa, Iran, Europe, and the Homeland, as well as functional analysis of transnational terror groups. Functional analysis includes weapons capabilities, finances, communications, and Chemical, Biological, Radiological & Nuclear (CBRN).
Brainstorm analytic ideas in assigned areas on emerging and continuing terrorism threats for the subsequent production of the Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff Daily Intelligence Briefing
Perform extensive research using all-source intelligence databases and tools to form defendable, cogent, and complex assessments, which are properly sourced and formatted.
Clearly and concisely articulate high-quality, complex analysis to a variety of customers.
Communicate in written and oral form to enable informed strategic decisions by Joint Staff and DoD policy makers.
Respond within given timelines to a range of short suspense inquiries from Joint Staff senior leadership in the form of email, talking points, information papers, and/or briefings.
Attend meetings with Joint Staff and Office of the Secretary of Defense (OSD) customers and be prepared to provide strategic and operational analysis of transnational terrorism issues in assigned focus area.
Provide strategic and operational analysis on transnational terrorism questions from the Joint Staff Director for Operations (J3), most notably CT and Special Operations Forces support to the Deputy Director for Special Operations in the form of email, talking points, information papers, placemats, and/or briefing.
Provide strategic and operational transnational terrorism analysis to support planning efforts and campaign development of the Director for Strategic Plans and Policy in the form of email, talking points, information papers, placemats, and/or briefing.

Requirements:
Active TS/SCI Security Clearance
Demonstrate comprehensive knowledge of the concepts involved in strategic and operational analysis
Be able to communicate understanding from information that may be incomplete, indirect, highly complex, seemingly unrelated, and/or technically advanced
Be able to work independently with minimal oversight and direction
Be able to lead teams in researching multifaceted or critical problems.
Demonstrate proficiency using Microsoft Office tools (e.g. Excel, Work, PowerPoint)
Be prepared to be recalled on weekends and evenings in response to critical requirements. During crisis situations, work longer than eight hour days and weekends, if mission requirements dictate. Perform shift work should mission requirement necessitate

Desired:
Current CI Polygraph
Experience relevant to strategic and operational analysis
Bachelor’s degree in a related area from a college or university accredited by an agency recognized by the U.S. Department of Education
Knowledge of DIA intelligence products including: Defense Intelligence Digest (DID), Defense Intelligence (DI)-Short, DI-Long, and Target Development Cables

Total yearly compensation: $73,000.00-$78,000.00

Candidates meeting the minimum qualifications for this position can expect a starting salary at $73,000.00. Candidates who possess additional desired qualifications can expect a higher starting salary, up to a maximum of $78,000.00.
A 10% shift differential is provided for hours worked outside of core working hours (before 6am and after 6pm).
In addition, hired analysts are eligible for either a $1,000.00 sign-on bonus OR $2,000.00 cost-reimbursable relocation bonus.",3804,Washington
29,Senior Intelligence Analyst,Raytheon Intelligence & Space,"McLean, VA 22102",None,"Businesses Raytheon Intelligence & Space
Clearance type Secret
Relocation eligible No
Job ID 168338BR
Date posted 09/21/2020
City McLean
State VA
Country United States
Raytheon Technologies is seeking a motivated and experienced Linguistic Analyst for a legacy language based project with a native level fluency in one of the following languages: Arabic, Turkish,Swahili, Somali, Tuareg, Hausa, African French, Bahasa/Indonesian, Pashto, Uzbek or Urdu. You will be part of a linguistic analytical team providing operational language/translation support to in a highly fluid and fast paced environment in Herndon, VA.


You must be proficient at reviewing and analyzing complex foreign language source material for content and significance; transcribing/translating advanced graphic and/or voice language material into modern American English or a targeted language in either verbatim or gisted format; providing detailed assessments of current events based on the collection, research and analysis of open source information foreign language material; providing quality control of transcripts and translations; preparing and providing quality control of reports; preparing and presenting detailed and unique technical briefings; and sharing language expertise. You should be adept in multiple social media platforms.

You may also perform activities across analytical linguistic disciplines including but not limited to: linguistic review, analysis and reporting; all-source analytic research, training and reporting; analytic methodology development, training and application; employment of various analytic capabilities. You may assist in developing and maintaining relationships and partnerships with customers, stakeholders, peers, and partners.

You must be able to adapt when facing changes in the work environment while maintaining effectiveness. Seek new areas for learning while creating and taking advantage of those opportunities. As a member of a team participate in the completion of goals. Provide an individual or groups with clear information or ideas through a variation of media. With any work situation be open to try unique ways to deal with problems.

Primary responsibilities include:

Reviews and analyzes foreign language source material for content and significance
Transcribes/translates advanced graphic and/or voice language material into modern American English or a targeted language in either verbatim or gisted format
Prepares assessments of current events based on the collection, research, analysis and interpretations of classified and open source information foreign language material
Provides quality control of transcripts, translations and reports
Develops and implements translation methodology and quality control procedures and standards
Drafts and presents technical briefings
Shares language expertise
Operates transcription equipment.
This position requires an active U.S. Security Clearance, for which the US Government requires US Citizenship. This position is contingent upon program/customer concurrence. Candidates must be willing to undergo a rigorous background check.

Required Skills:

Must be fluent (written and verbal) in one of the following languages:
Arabic, Turkish, Swahili, Somali, Tuareg, Hausa, African French, Bahasa/Indonesian, Albanian, Bosnian, Macedonian, Serbo-Croatian,Pashto, Uzbek or Urdu
5 or more years of experience with Open Source Technology
Desired Skills:

Adept with multiple Social Media platforms
Current US Secret Clearance or higher preferred
Required Education (including Major):

Bachelor's degree or 8 years experience in lieu of degree.
168338

Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.",3804,Washington
30,NDMS Junior Business Analyst,ICON GPHS,"Washington, DC",None,"ICON Government and Public Health specializes in preclinical through phase IV support of clinical research and clinical trial services for biologics, drugs, and devices. We help our customers get their products to market faster with a wide array of research, regulatory, and sponsor services both within the US and around the globe and respond rapidly to global health crises.
Position Summary:
The Office of the Assistant Secretary for Preparedness and Response (ASPR) is a public health preparedness and emergency response organization in the Office of the Secretary at the United States Department of Health and Human Services. ASPR was created under the Pandemic and All Hazards Preparedness Act in the wake of Hurricane Katrina to lead the nation in preventing, preparing for, and responding to the adverse health effects of public health emergencies and disasters. The National Disaster Medical System is a Division (NDMS) within the Office of Emergency Management (OEM) who reports to the ASPR. This position will support NDMS in various aspects.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Ability to work within short and specific timelines for task distribution and completion· -Perform Data entry within the NDMS business system (Response Management System)
Create, develop, and modify reporting metrics for senior leadership review
Develop and maintain various tracking mechanisms using MSOffice suite products
Download, scan, file and search documents for additional actions in support of hiring and training initiatives
Various other administrative responsibilities as necessary to achieve the mission of NDMS
Participate in meetings/conference calls at the direction of the government project lead/Branch Chief; create agendas and take minutes
Background in developing educational and training curriculum including Points of Instruction documents and a background in education for adult learners
Create documents for training events
Complete all personnel training activities required to support contract requirements (e.g. security, records management, database applications, etc.
Reasonable Accommodation Statement:
To accomplish this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform, with or without reasonable accommodation, each essential function satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to help enable qualified individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Laboratory/office environment; may require working evenings and weekends. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to manipulate objects, tools or controls; reach with hands and arms; climb stairs; balance; stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl; talk or hear. Work may involve long periods of standing and handling of numerous chemicals and/or hazardous biological material. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.
Experience
Required
Ability to obtain Public Trust clearance
MS Office expertise
Preferred
Public Health Preparedness and Response experience
Ability to work efficiently in a fast-paced environment
Experience with creating training resources, leadership briefings/metrics, and additional resources
Education
Required
Bachelors or better
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3804,Washington
31,"Data Analyst, Senior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Washington, DC",None,"Key Role:
Identifies and collects data sources, analyzes and extracts key data and information, evaluates and monitors data quality to meet the organization's information system needs and requirements. Applies advanced consulting skills and/or extensive technical expertise; full industry knowledge. Develops innovative solutions to complex problems. Works without considerable direction; mentors and may supervise team members.
Basic Qualifications:
3+ years of experience in working with defense, law enforcement, the intelligence community, or national security professionals
Experience with aggregating, visualizing, or analyzing large volumes of data
Experience with programming languages, including R, Python, or Visual Basic macros
Ability to obtain a security clearance
BA or BS degree
Additional Qualifications:
Experience in working with teams on challenging problems for short deadlines in high-pressure situations
Experience with GIS software, technology, and analytics
Knowledge of law enforcement and intelligence community systems, analytics, methods, legal authorities, or access controls
TS/SCI clearance
Clearance: Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",3804,Washington
32,Security Analyst – Senior,CACI,"Chantilly, VA 20151",None,"Job Description
What You’ll Get to Do:
Reviews a case file to determine what additional security processing, if any, needs to be performed.
Creates written products documenting case processing, such as Memorandum for the Record and E-mail.
Advises the Sponsor of the need for additional security processing in order to render adjudicative decision and schedule or conduct additional processing at the direction of the Sponsor.
Reviews the results of all security processing to glean necessary facts and data relevant to the final recommendation.
Interviews the subject in person, by telephone, or through written correspondence to elicit clarifying information after consultation and approval of the Sponsor.
Discusses with the Senior Case Manager (SCM), Expert Adjudicators, Adjudications Board members, Polygraph Examiners, Background Investigators, Case Processing Personnel, Managers, Office of Medical Services, Customers, and other as needed to resolve information discrepancies or gaps.
Analyzes the information and indicate a nexus between the behavior of the subject and the ICD 704 issues sufficient to support a final recommendation.
Provides a final written recommendation, in sufficient detail to permit the Sponsor to make an informed, independent decision to grant, disapprove or revoke a security clearance or approval.
Maintains each security file by purging duplicate copies of SF86, unofficial notes, page flags, and other extraneous materials prior to forwarding file to the SCM. Information contained on handwritten notes shall be formalized in a Memorandum for the Record and included in the file; the information is pertinent to the adjudication, prior to removal of the handwritten note. This may require that the adjudicator accurately upload official documents into electronic file records.
Makes oral presentations to SCMs, Program Managers, Adjudication Boards, and/or other Senior Agency officials, as required.
Administers notification to the customer, identity and recommend codes of conduct issues for the Sponsor to address, input of closing information in the Office of Security (OS) data base or other tracking software/applications as needed, and/or perform other follow-up actions resulting from the disposition of the case.
Protects all information and data acquired during the preparation of the analysis from unauthorized release, employing the “need to know” principle, and return all adjudicative notes to the Sponsor.
Returns to the contractor’s point of contact cases that may give rise to an actual or potential conflict of interest, organizational or otherwise.
Responds in a timely manner to inquiries from the Sponsor on the status of pending cases or any other information pertaining to adjudicative support tasks
Manages case load effectively to meet the productivity standards set by the Sponsor.
Meets the adjudicative quality standards established by the Sponsor.
Attends meetings required for all adjudicative personnel and mandatory training courses required by the Sponsor for individuals with staff-like access.
Track cases throughout the processing stages to ensure investigative information is reviewed for relevance as it comes to completion; and capable of preparing and providing the Statement of Reasons, investigative files, executive case summaries, and First Level Review recommendations. All new information generated throughout the adjudication process is scanned and/or electronically uploaded to the electronic file.
You’ll Bring These Qualifications:
High school diploma or GED
(Advanced degree may be substituted for upwards of six months of experience) An associates or B.A./B.S. degree in English or related field of study (Degree examples include, but are not limited to Criminal Sciences, Cybersecurity, Behavioral Sciences, Management, Financial or Auditing, etc.) which has a central theme/focus related to writing in a clear, concise manner and ability to articulate and defend a logical well-reasoned conclusion based on available and/or discovered/developed information. In summary, any formally approved B.A./B.S. course of study with a related emphasis which demonstrates well developed and honed critical thinking and analysis skills.
Must possess demonstrated analytical ability and the ability to handle a large, complex workload.
Must demonstrate a high level of personal integrity and the ability to discreetly handle sensitive, personal and classified case information.
Must have excellent writing skills, with the ability to comprehend complex and multi-source data into succinct and supportable final reports.
Must possess strong organizational skills and good judgment. In addition, must be able to operate various corporate and customer specific automated systems for case tracking and status reporting.
Must have a thorough understanding of the federal rules and regulations that encompass the clearance process.
Knowledge of and ability to use standard office equipment (e.g., computers, facsimile machines, printers, scanners, reproduction machines, etc.).
Demonstrated ability to produce analytic documents that require minimal editing, unitize software tools (e.g., MS Word/Excel/Power Point).
Demonstrated understanding of the federal rules and regulations that encompass the clearance process.
Demonstrated ability to manage and prioritize multiple task assignments to meet deadlines.
Ability and skill to elicit information during an interview with minimal direction and work effectively with a variety of individuals.
Ability to adapt to changing work requirements.
Ability to provide on-the-job training to colleagues.
Must have an active TS / SCI Full Scope Polygraph Clearance.
Considerable knowledge and application of the principles of the ICD 704-Personnel Security Standards and Procedures and Governing Eligibility for Access to Sensitive Compartmented Information and Other Controlled Access Program Information as mandated through the issuance of the Presidents Executive Order (EO) 13467 Reforming Processes Related to Suitability for Government Employment, Fitness for Contractor Employees and Eligibility for Access to Classified National Security Information and endorsed by Director of National Intelligence.
Knowledge and experience may include verifiable experience in conducting background investigations, consolidating and/or processing investigative inputs, creating a comprehensive applicant profile, and/or preparing and adjudicative analysis and recommendation for the USG, or on behalf of a USG customer. While all of the above examples of ICD 704 experience are relevant, the strongest candidates will be those with prior adjudicative experience.
A minimum of 5 years of adjudicative experience in a Federal or Contractor role with the Federal Government or equivalent year(s) of experience in a related field or internship as delineated below.
Equivalent experience in a related field may include, but is not limited to the following:
Broad experience analyzing, interpreting and applying personnel security policies, standards, procedures or regulations.
Experience conducting personalized as well as secondary/final reviews of more junior level staff to ensure the accuracy, completeness and quality of final reports in compliance with ICD 704 requirements and guidelines.
Demonstrated experience in conducting pre-employment security interviews or background investigations for Federal Government job applicants, contractors and employees.
Successful completion of additional training (coaching, on the job training, training courses) to develop, enhance and/or mature personal analytical and critical thinking skill sets.
Involvement in designing or teaching a training offering aimed at developing or refining individuals analytical or critical thinking skills.
Contributions to the development and updating of Standard Operating Practices (SOPs) documenting best practices at in-depth knowledge of the organization.
Successful academic record that reflects demonstrated analytical and critical thinking skills (see Education requirements section below).
Demonstrated experience conducting interviews and subsequently summarizing and verbally presenting results to senior audiences.
Will be required to complete the ODNI Intro to National Security Adjudications Course within 30 days of deployment.
Must be able to organize and assess investigative file material against required coverage for all case types specific to the assigned program.
Ensure routine background investigation coverage, polygraph, and National Agency Checks are completed according to standards for the level of access requested, and can identify cases that meet outlined thresholds and investigative results that may warrant review of case material by Subject Matter Experts outside of customer organization.
Present case facts, analysis, and recommendations to the Adjudication Board in the presence of Government Program Managers, Senior Case Managers, and peers.
Must be capable of preparing products that capture relevant case details and present facts in a logical manner.
Must be able to compose and formalize adjudicative closing documents utilizing all investigative and/or polygraph results required to render a decision based on ICD 704 standards for access to national security information.
Must be able to submit analysis and recommendations with clear nexus between issues and/or non-issues according to ICD 704 standards. This analysis and recommendation will include identifying, supporting, and implementation of appropriate risk-mitigation strategies when appropriate.
Must be able to identify, as early as possible, any significant derogatory information that may alter the course of routine processing or warrant immediate action, and be capable of clarifying facts, able to elicit new or additional information and, if necessary, further investigate questions relevant to final adjudication.
Also, specifically required training / knowledge:
The Sponsor’s clearance adjudicative process;
Application of ICD 704 and EO 12968 to adjudicative issues.
Effective interview and briefing techniques.
pe3
BITS3
What We Can Offer You:
We’ve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nation’s highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACI’s unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
Job Location
US-Chantilly-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN


CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3804,Washington
33,Sr. Information Security Analyst (Remote),Parsons,"Centreville, VA 20120",None,"Minimum Clearance Required to Start:
Not Applicable/None
Job Description:
Sr. Information Security Analyst (Remote)
Your talent for collaboration sparks new ideas
You enjoy putting your head together with colleagues to build on ideas. Your collaborative spirit encourages others to feel that they’re being heard and acknowledged. You participate fully in analyzing possible scenarios and considering different solutions. Your acceptance of new perspectives cultivates relationships in an environment of respect. We invite you to apply.
Summary:
The focus for the Senior Information Security Analyst covers information security, information assurance, and compliance design, integration, implementation, modification, and coordination of the installation, testing, operation, and disposition of hardware and software systems. Functions may include conducting analyses, developing functional and technical requirements and specifications, documentation, monitoring the availability, serviceability, and recoverability of installed technology security systems, implementing information security procedures and tools, maintaining systems configuration, managing the installation and integration of system patches updates, and enhancements, and ensuring the rigorous application of information security/information assurance policies, principles, and practices.
SPECIFIC RESPONSIBILITIES:
The Senior Information Security Analyst proactively evaluates the system and network enterprise environments and uses technical knowledge and analytical skill to determine the optimum mix of technology, policy, procedures and education to implement effective information security programs and strategies.
The Senior Information Security Analyst determines security controls, configurations, procedures, and policies based off industry standards, best practices, federal, and state regulations, and contractual requirements.
The Senior Information Security Analyst establishes and manages program control processes, compliance assessments to determine deviations from acceptable configurations, policy, or standards, and provides expertise in compliance requirements for internal and external reviews of requirements
Senior Information Security Analyst assists with the identification and mitigation of risk posed to the confidentially, integrity, and availability of information systems.
The Senior Information Security Analyst fully masters and explains to others the information security requirements for legal and regulatory compliance including DFARS 48 CFR § 252.204-7012 (Safeguarding covered defense information and cyber incident reporting) and 252.204-7021 Cybersecurity Maturity Model Certification Requirements, NIST SP 800-171 (Protecting Controlled Unclassified Information in Nonfederal Systems and Organizations), HIPAA (Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act), ISO-27001 Information Security Management system, and other federal regulations and statutes.
Performs Continuous monitoring of system where they are responsible for monitoring and tracking system vulnerabilities and compliance issues.
Generates Plans of Action & Milestones (POA&M) to track the mitigation of vulnerabilities and compliance issues.
Responds to data calls, scan requests and weekly and monthly reporting.
Generates security artifacts such as System Security Plans, Security Control Traceability Matrices, Configuration Plans and Self-Assessment Test Plans.
Develops techniques and procedures for conducting information security risk assessments and compliance audits; evaluation and testing of hardware, firmware and software for possible impact on system security
Conducts technical and policy-based information security risk reviews of third-party vendors.
Reviews RFPs to ensure information security requirements are fully and correctly stated
Monitors and follows up to ensure that appropriate mitigation and remediation actions have been taken on risk- assessment findings.
Gathers, creates and presents information security metrics to middle, senior and executive management levels using appropriate visualization techniques.
Reviews Change Requests for security impacts and technical documentation from a security perspective.
Participates in Agile Planning Events to provide technical input in addition to risk assessments for software, systems and services, etc.
Have the support that frees you to excel
In a workplace where people from diverse backgrounds willingly offer help when it’s needed… where you feel included, recognized, and supported by management … where your efforts are encouraged and your accomplishments rewarded… you’re certain to do your best work. Come get and give the support that counts.
QUALIFICATIONS:
5+ years of experience as a security professional and developing security policies.
5+ years of experience working in a Microsoft environment.
Experience with Cloud Security systems, processes and tools (ex., CloudWatch)
Knowledge and experience with Cloud Computing relating to Microsoft Azure and/or AWS architectures.
Strong understanding of policy, compliance, and best practice security principles.
Previous experience with vulnerability assessments and testing.
Excellent written and communication skills.
Strong work ethic, demonstrated self-starter, ability to work in a team-oriented environment.
Strong organizational skills.
CERTIFICATIONS:
One of the following is preferred: CySA+, Security+, Certified in Risk and Information Systems Control (CRISC), ISO27001 Certified ISMS Lead Implementer, ISO27001 Certified ISMS Lead Auditor.
Tell us where you’re going. We’ll help you plot the route!
Let us be your “tour guide” on your path to even greater success. We’ll work with you to structure your goals, set up timelines, and pair you with mentors to accelerate your achievements. We might even discover talents that you didn’t know you have and help you develop them. We are enthusiastic advocates of diversity, appreciative of the talents and perspectives every person contributes. Let us include you on our structured career path to success.
SKILLS/COMPETENCIES:
US Citizenship required.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with ability to accurately evaluate current security procedures and develop plans for remedying any identified areas of weakness.
Relationship skills and collaborative style to enable success across multiple partners.
Documentation, planning, negotiation, work prioritization and organizational skills.
Basic knowledge of network technologies (MPLS, VPN, Wireless), boundary protection and Cloud extensions (Intrusion Detection System, Intrusion Prevention System, Firewalls, Proxies, Email Gateways, etc.), device and user authentication (digital signatures, multi-factor authentication technologies), cryptography, and security control compliance assessment to various industry standards.
Exposure in cloud security, mobility security, virtualization/containerization strategies is desirable.
Familiarity with governance, risk and compliance (GRC) and Integrated Risk Management (IRM) platforms is desirable.
Understanding of NIST SP 800-171, 800-53, FedRAMP and related special publications and impacts on a commercial organization. Familiarity with ISO 27000-series, ISO 27001/27002, SOX, or other information security control frameworks.
Written, verbal and presentation communication skills and the ability to thrive in a dynamic environment handling multiple priorities.
Ability to receive constructive feedback and apply it.
Parsons (NYSE: PSN) is a leading technology firm driving the future of defense, intelligence, and critical infrastructure. By combining unique technologies with deep domain expertise across cybersecurity, missile defense, space, connected infrastructure, and smart cities, we're providing tomorrow's solutions today. With a history of disruption beginning in 1944, we apply our distinct perspective to help our customers confront the issues of tomorrow in every domain—land, sea, air, space, and cyber. Our range of capabilities and our global network of resources lets us layer and integrate solutions to respond to any challenge with unmatched agility. In a time of rapid change, we see infinite sources of inspiration to fuel our creativity and enable the innovation necessary to accomplish our quest of delivering a better world.",3804,Washington
34,Counterterrorism Analyst (Pentagon) - TS/SCI,Assertive Professionals,"Arlington, VA 22201","$73,000 - $78,000 a year ++","Assertive Professionals is in search of multiple Counterterrorism / Insurgency (CT/IA) Analysts to support the Defense Intelligence Agency’s (DIA) Defense Combating Terrorism Center (DCTC). The DIA Consultant in this role will:
Provide strategic and operational analysis to support to the Policy and Warning Division's Pentagon Support Branch located at the Pentagon in Arlington, Virginia.
Serve as a transnational terrorism desk officer for a specified area supporting transnational terrorism analytic requirements for the Joint Staff Director of Intelligence. Analytic areas include the Middle East, South East Asia, Africa, Iran, Europe, and the Homeland, as well as functional analysis of transnational terror groups. Functional analysis includes weapons capabilities, finances, communications, and Chemical, Biological, Radiological & Nuclear (CBRN).
Brainstorm analytic ideas in assigned areas on emerging and continuing terrorism threats for the subsequent production of the Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff Daily Intelligence Briefing
Perform extensive research using all-source intelligence databases and tools to form defendable, cogent, and complex assessments, which are properly sourced and formatted.
Clearly and concisely articulate high-quality, complex analysis to a variety of customers.
Communicate in written and oral form to enable informed strategic decisions by Joint Staff and DoD policy makers.
Respond within given timelines to a range of short suspense inquiries from Joint Staff senior leadership in the form of email, talking points, information papers, and/or briefings.
Attend meetings with Joint Staff and Office of the Secretary of Defense (OSD) customers and be prepared to provide strategic and operational analysis of transnational terrorism issues in assigned focus area.
Provide strategic and operational analysis on transnational terrorism questions from the Joint Staff Director for Operations (J3), most notably CT and Special Operations Forces support to the Deputy Director for Special Operations in the form of email, talking points, information papers, placemats, and/or briefing.
Provide strategic and operational transnational terrorism analysis to support planning efforts and campaign development of the Director for Strategic Plans and Policy in the form of email, talking points, information papers, placemats, and/or briefing.

Requirements:
Active TS/SCI Security Clearance
Demonstrate comprehensive knowledge of the concepts involved in strategic and operational analysis
Be able to communicate understanding from information that may be incomplete, indirect, highly complex, seemingly unrelated, and/or technically advanced
Be able to work independently with minimal oversight and direction
Be able to lead teams in researching multifaceted or critical problems.
Demonstrate proficiency using Microsoft Office tools (e.g. Excel, Work, PowerPoint)
Be prepared to be recalled on weekends and evenings in response to critical requirements. During crisis situations, work longer than eight hour days and weekends, if mission requirements dictate. Perform shift work should mission requirement necessitate

Desired:
Current CI Polygraph
Experience relevant to strategic and operational analysis
Bachelor’s degree in a related area from a college or university accredited by an agency recognized by the U.S. Department of Education
Knowledge of DIA intelligence products including: Defense Intelligence Digest (DID), Defense Intelligence (DI)-Short, DI-Long, and Target Development Cables

Total yearly compensation: $73,000.00-$78,000.00

Candidates meeting the minimum qualifications for this position can expect a starting salary at $73,000.00. Candidates who possess additional desired qualifications can expect a higher starting salary, up to a maximum of $78,000.00.
A 10% shift differential is provided for hours worked outside of core working hours (before 6am and after 6pm).
In addition, hired analysts are eligible for either a $1,000.00 sign-on bonus OR $2,000.00 cost-reimbursable relocation bonus.",3804,Washington
35,DHS Intelligence Analyst,"Dynamic Planning & Response, LLC.","Arlington, VA","$80,000 - $84,000 a year","As an Intelligence Analyst Watch Team Member for the CISA Integrated Operations Coordination Center (CIOCC) of the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) you will be responsible for assigned tasks during their shift.Intelligence Analyst Watch Team Members shall research, analyze, compose, edit and review CIOCC products; and perform initial analysis of information on questions, issues, or events involving the nation's Critical Infrastructure.Watch Team Members will be responsible for monitoring unclassified and classified Local Area Network (LAN) accounts, in accordance with their security clearance for infrastructure-related information, interfacing with sector representatives, responding to initial requests from the sectors or other parts of DHS, and performing initial research for infrastructure related incidents or request for information from CIOCC customers.The CIOCC maintains 24x7 situational-awareness and crisis monitoring of critical infrastructure and shares threat information, in order to reduce risk, prevent damage, and enable rapid recovery of critical infrastructure assets from incidents caused by natural disasters, attacks, or other emergencies.This is a shift (24x7x365) position.REQUIRED EDUCATION/SKILLS:Must have a current and active security clearance and 5 years of DHS, military staff or other similar related experience at executive staff. BA/BS or prior experience senior DHS or military staff operations experience or a related field, as substitute for degree, is required.Candidates must also meet the following skill requirements:Ability to plan and organize tasks independentlyExercise sound operational judgmentStrong written and oral communication, organization, and interpersonal skillsAbility to pose creative solutions to operational challengesDESIRED EDUCATION/SKILLS: BA/BS in any field, military staff course (Battle Staff, ILE, JPME I) SMC, JPME II, ELC, etc.Qualifications Required:Security ClearancePrevious Military, State or Federal level 24/7 Operation Watch Experience (the more senior level the better)Intelligence Analyst experience preferred.Compensation Package:DP&R offers a comprehensive benefits package which includes:Paid VacationPaid Federal Holidays and Sick Days401(k) planMedical/Dental/Prescription/VisionPerformance-based bonusesPersonal mobile phone planCompany information:Dynamic Planning & Response LLCwww.dynapnr.comDynamic Planning & Response LLC provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.Job Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $80,000.00 - $84,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:12 hour shift8 hour shiftDay shiftHolidaysMonday to FridayNight shiftWeekendsAbility to Commute/Relocate:Arlington, VA (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Intelligence Experience: 3 years (Required)military or agency intelligence: 2 years (Preferred)Security Clearance:Top Secret (Required)Shift Availability:Day Shift (Required)Night Shift (Required)Overnight Shift (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",3804,Washington
36,Senior Counterterrorism Analyst (S/SE Asia) - TS/SCI,Assertive Professionals,"Reston, VA 20191","$95,000 - $100,000 a year ++","Assertive Professionals is in search of multiple Counterterrorism / Insurgency (CT/IA) Analysts to support the Defense Intelligence Agency's (DIA) Defense Combating Terrorism Center (DCTC). The DIA Consultant Tasks include: open source and classified research, predicative analysis, opportunities analysis and warning intelligence production, and oral presentations, in accordance with Office of the Director of National Intelligence (ODNI) Analytical Standards and in compliance with the DIA Writing Guide, and using standard DIA product lines and briefings. Customers will include senior U.S. DoD and other government officials.

Required:
Active TS/SCI Security Clearance
Demonstrate comprehensive knowledge of the concepts involved in strategic and operational analysis
Have a minimum of ten years of experience conducting strategic analysis on non-state Violent Extremist Organizations (VEO)
Have three years of experience on the South/Southeast Asia region
Possess an understanding of ODNI Analytic Standards, Sourcing Requirements for Disseminated Products, and for Writing for Maximum Utility
Be able to communicate understanding from information that may be incomplete, indirect, highly complex, seemingly unrelated, and/or technically advanced
Be able to work independently with minimal oversight and direction
Be able to lead teams in researching multifaceted or critical problems.
Demonstrate proficiency using Microsoft Office tools (e.g. Excel, Work, PowerPoint)

Desired:
Current CI Polygraph
Experience relevant to strategic and operational analysis
Bachelors degree in a relevant area from a college or university accredited by an agency recognized by the US Department of Education

Total yearly compensation: $95,000.00-$100,000.00

Candidates meeting the minimum qualifications for this position can expect a starting salary at $95,000.00. Candidates who possess additional desired qualifications can expect a higher starting salary, up to a maximum of $100,000.00.
A 10% shift differential is provided for hours worked outside of core working hours (before 6am and after 6pm).
In addition, hired analysts are eligible for either a $1,000.00 sign-on bonus OR $2,000.00 cost-reimbursable relocation bonus.",3804,Washington
37,Security Analyst - All Levels - ITOPS - REMOTE,Information Sciences Consulting Inc,"Manassas, VA 20109",None,"We have an exciting opportunity for Security Analyst/Technicians to join our team in support of the ITOPS TSS endeavor (formerly known as CRISP) at the US Department of Veteran's Affairs. Come join our great team in the ongoing effort to strengthen and maintain IT security across the VA network, and play a vital role in support of those who have served the USA.
Security Technician
Requirements:
Associate degree (computer science, engineering, or related scientific/technical discipline is required).
3+ years of experience is required.
4 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education.
Responsibilities:
Experience in implementing IT security solutions and assure successful implementation.
Has knowledge of security principles, policy and regulations.
IT experience with Cyber Security document management and familiar with security and privacy rules.
Security Analyst
Requirements:
Bachelor's Degree in computer science, electronics engineering or other engineering or technical discipline is required.
8 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education.
Responsibilities:
Experience in the concepts, terms, processes, policy and implementation of information security.
Experience and knowledge of the latest security measures at all stages of an information system life cycle.
Ability to solve complex problems involving a wide variety of information systems
Must be able to understand and differentiate between critical and non critical systems and networks
Security Analyst, Sr.

Requirements:
Master's Degree in computer science, electronics engineering or other engineering or technical discipline is required.
5 + years experience
10 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education
Responsibilities:
Experience in managing teams of security analysts.
Is able to effectively leverage vast detailed knowledge and familiarity with security discipline.
Has thorough knowledge of security principles, concepts, policy and regulations.
Is able to identify risks in security systems and work with technical experts to resolve security issues.
Possess ability to identify key concepts, factors and risks based on conversations and document these in clear and concise narrative or graphic reports
Full Benefit Package to include:
Paid PTO and sick leave (15 days initially)
Paid Federal Government Holidays
100% Medical premium for employee
100% Dental and Vision
100% paid Life, short and long-term disability insurance for employee
401K
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer
We do not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, genetic information or any other characteristics protected by law.",3804,Washington
38,Treaty and Regulatory Compliance Analyst,Bai Inc,"Washington, DC 20036 (Dupont Circle area)",None,"BAI is seeking a Treaty and Regulatory Compliance Analyst to support a U.S. government agency’s cutting-edge science and technology research and development program. Our Analysts assist Federal Program Managers and researchers in complying with applicable treaty, regulatory and policy frameworks, and support our client in representing the agency’s interests in interagency and international technology policy discussions. As a key member of this team, BAI’s Treaty Compliance Analyst is responsible for facilitating department-wide compliance with applicable arms control agreements, with a particular focus on the Biological Weapons Convention (BWC) and the Chemical Weapons Convention (CWC).
Responsibilities:
In this position, the successful applicant will:
Review and assess all relevant agency-sponsored research and development activities for Treaty and Regulatory compliance and perception issuesCoordinate logistics for senior-level meetings and briefings related to arms control complianceAdvocate for the Department’s equities within the U.S. interagency on a variety of biological science and nonproliferation policy issuesServe as treaty compliance subject-matter expert for other Compliance Assurance Team colleaguesManage multiple compliance portfolios and related information on all agency-sponsored biological, chemical, and animal care research activities


Requirements:
Must possess and maintain a U.S. government security clearance
Master’s degree in Life Sciences, Biosafety, Biodefense, Nonproliferation or related subject area
Specific knowledge of or experience with the BWC / CWC
Strong familiarity with the life sciences (through coursework or past work experience)
Extensive experience writing for both technical and non-technical audiences
Strong oral communication skills
Ability to work independently
Flexibility
Preferred Qualifications:
Direct experience working with or supporting government clients, at the federal, state, and/or local levels
Experience working within the U.S. government interagency
Experience engaging with senior government or private sector leadership
Familiarity with homeland security mission areas and the roles of science and technology in building capabilities to support these areas


BAI, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer.

Celebrating 20 years of successful Business, BAI – one of Inc. Magazine’s 5,000 Fastest-Growing Private Companies In America – has built a strong reputation upon the excellence of our carefully selected employees and the comprehensive, innovative solutions we provide to our government clients. BAI employees are customer-focused, cleared professionals with the education and experience to support a wide spectrum of science and technology, management, analytical, administrative, security, and IT/cybersecurity mission areas. From managing research and education programs in homeland security-related fields to reviewing critical technology acquisition initiatives for compliance with international arms control agreements, our forward-thinking employees are continually positioned to make a positive impact on our country’s safety, security, and resilience, now and in the future.",3804,Washington
39,INVESTIGATIVE ANALYST,US Office of Inspector General,"Alexandria, VA","$39,684 - $51,592 a year","Duties
Summary
This announcement has been reopened to add additional time for application. The new closing date is Monday, June 14, 2021.

This position is within the Department of Defense Office of Inspector General (DoD OIG), Deputy Inspector General for Administrative Investigations (DIG-AI).

Priority Placement Program (PPP) Military Spouse Preference (MSP) eligible candidates will receive priority consideration at the full performance level only.
Responsibilities
The incumbent serves as an Investigative Analyst in support of the four directorates within DIG-AI: Investigations of Senior Officials, Whistleblower Reprisal Investigations, DoD Hotline, and the AI Front Office.
Serves as Investigative Analyst, developing/collecting, entering various data into an automated database.
Retrieving, analyzing, consolidating and statistical reporting of extremely sensitive and complex investigative data concerning senior officials, whistleblower reprisal, and hotline complaints impacting the Department and national security.
Performs other duties as assigned to include maintains the automated time and attendance reporting system for the office.
Performs other duties as assigned to include prepares Requests for Personnel Actions (RPAs), reviews travel orders and vouchers, and tracks budget expenditures.
Extracts and organizes statistical data for investigators, Senior Analysts, and the component heads within DIG-AI. Prepare reports and oral briefings.
Utilizes MS applications creating correspondence, Power Point slides and Excel spreadsheets.
Disseminates data through automated data processing systems.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
9
Job family (Series)
1805 Investigative Analysis
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U.S. Citizenship or National
Suitable for Federal Employment
Registered for Selective Service (if applicable)
This national security position, which may require access to classified information, requires a favorable suitability review and security clearance as a condition of employment. Failure to maintain security eligibility may result in termination.
The incumbent must adhere to the DoD Standards of Conduct.
Qualifications
You must meet the minimum qualification requirements as stated in the Office of Personnel Management (OPM) Operating Manual, Qualification Standards for General Schedule Positions, http://www.opm.gov/qualifications/standards/group-stds/gs-cler.asp

Specialized Experience for the GS-05: You must have at least one year of specialized experience at the GS-04 or equivalent level. Specialized experience includes include skills in written communication to present clear and concise information. Providing support services by to accessing and operating large automated data base systems and performing various office automation skills and experience with MS Word, Excel, and Power Point.

Volunteer Experience: Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual, community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.
Education
SUBSTITUTION OF EDUCATION FOR SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE: A 4-year course of study leading to a bachelor's degree may be substituted to meet the experience requirement. Equivalent combinations of successfully completed education and experience may be used to meet total qualifications requirements.
Additional information
Competitive wages, flexible schedules and one of the most comprehensive benefits packages found in either government or private sector. These extraordinary benefits encompass health, pay, work/life balance, growth & learning.
Drug Testing: If you are given access to classified information, you will be subject to random drug testing. If you are selected for a critical/special sensitive position, you will be placed in a drug testing designated position. You must pass a drug test before your assignment to such a position and you will be subject to random drug testing subsequent to your assignment.
For more information see the security section of Understanding Vacancy Announcements.
Moving expenses will not be paid.
Selections are subject to restrictions resulting from the DoD Program for Stability of Civilian Employment.
A two year probationary period may be required.
Telework availability will be based upon the mission requirements and supervisory determination.
We may use this announcement to fill additional vacancies within 90 days of the closing date.
Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered or be exempt from Selective Service (see http://www.sss.gov)
Travel: Some travel may be required. Travel is typically local; however, some overnight travel may be required.
Veterans Preference: If you are a veteran with preference eligibility and you are claiming 5-points veterans' preference, you must submit a copy of your DD-214 member copy 4 or other proof of eligibility. If you are claiming 10-point veterans' preference, you must also submit an SF-15, ""Application for 10-Point Veterans' Preference"" plus the proof required by that form. For more information on veterans' preference go to: http://www.fedshirevets.gov/job/vetpref/index.aspx
Retired Civil Service Employee: Employment of retired Federal employees receiving an annuity is subject to the requirements of the Department of Defense (DoD) policy guidance. (See DoD Instruction 1400.25, Volume 300, at http://www.dtic.mil/whs/directives.)
Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP): Applicants must be well-qualified, which is defined as meeting all of the minimum qualification standards and eligibility requirements as well as possessing skills that clearly exceed the minimum qualification requirements for the position established by the Best Qualified category definition.
Military Spouse Preference (MSP): You may be eligible for MSP, if you are the spouse of an active duty military member and you are ranked among the best qualified for this vacancy.
If you are unable to apply online or need to fax a document you do not have in electronic form, view the following link for information regarding an Alternate Application.
Pay for first time hires to the Federal Government will typically be set at step 1 salary range for their respective grade level.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
IMPORTANT NOTE - YOU MUST FOLLOW ALL APPLICATION INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY. ERRORS OR OMISSIONS MAY AFFECT YOUR RATING.
Your application will be evaluated and rated under the Category Rating and Selection Procedures. We will review your resume and supporting documentation and compare this information to your responses on the occupational questionnaire to determine if you meet the minimum qualifications for this job. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating. Eligible candidates will then be placed for selection consideration into 3 categories as described below:

Qualified Category: Meets the minimum qualifications and demonstrates minimum experience and/or training only based on responses to occupational questionnaire.
Highly Qualified Category: Meets the minimum qualification requirements and demonstrates full-performance level experience based on responses to occupational questionnaire.
Best Qualified Category: Meets the minimum qualification requirements and demonstrates experience as an expert in the field or recognized as a senior specialist, team lead, etc.
The Assessment Questionnaire takes approximately 15 minutes to complete and collects information on your education, training and experience related to the following critical competencies:
Database Management Systems
Program Management
Written Communication
You can preview the Assessment Questionnaire here: https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11134529

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Noncritical-Sensitive (NCS)/Moderate Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents
You must provide a complete Application Package which includes:

1. Resume: You are encouraged to choose only ONE method of submitting your resume. (HR will review the resume that the system date stamps as the latest one received and this may not be the resume, which best reflects your qualifications for the job and may result in an ineligible rating.) You may submit your resume by: attaching in your USAJOBS account. For assistance in preparing your resume, take a look at the DFAS Resume Tools.
2. Complete Assessment Questionnaire: Your resume must describe the quality of work in regards to responses to the occupational self-assessment questionnaire as they generate your numerical rating.
3. Other Supporting Documents.
4. Military Spouse Preference:Spousal Permanent Change of Station (PCS) orders or travel orders, marriage certificate/license and the Self-Certification form are required to claim Military Spouse Preference.


The following supporting documents are ONLY required if applicable to your personal qualifications or status. They must be received by the closing date of the announcement or at the time of application if applying to an announcement with an extended closing date.

1. Transcripts and/or Certifications: All applicants to include current agency employees, must submit proof of education if the job announcement requires education to meet the basic qualification requirements, or if substituting education to meet the specialized experience requirements. Many applicants must also submit documentation for proof of meeting the basic education requirement. For additional information on acceptable documents, click here Transcripts and Certifications. All applicants to include current agency employees/contractors must also document your education and/or certifications in your resume. To be creditable, education must have been obtained in an accredited college or university recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
2. Cover Letter: You may submit a cover letter which will be forwarded to the selecting official with your resume. Your cover letter will not be used to verify your qualifications or determine eligibility for preference.
3. Veterans Preference: If you are claiming veteran's preference, you MUST submit the appropriate documentation. Failure to do so WILL result in the loss of veteran's preference, and will possibly impact your placement on the certificate. For more veterans' information please click here.

You must submit a copy of your DD Form-214, Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty"", showing the dates of active duty service, type of discharge and the character of service. Alternatively, If you are a current military member in active duty service and do not have a copy of your DD Form-214, you must submit a written documentation (certification) from your branch of service certifying that you are expected to be discharged or released from active duty under honorable conditions no later than 120 days after the date the certification is submitted with your application for this position. The certification should also include your rank, dates of active duty service and what they condition of discharge is thought to be.
If claiming 10-point preference and/or are a 30% or more Disabled Veteran, you must submit both a DD Form-214 or expected discharge documentation as described above AND a copy of a letter from the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) or your branch of service certifying the presence of service-connected disability and indicating the percentage of disability
If you are claiming eligibility based on 10-point derived veterans' preference (i.e. a spouse, widow/widower, or parent of a veteran claiming veterans' preference when the veteran is unable to use it), you must also submit a Standard Form 15 (SF-15) ""Application for 10-Point Veteran's Preference"" and any required documents indicated on the SF-15 to substantiate the claimed preference.
Click to review veterans authorities and required documents that verify eligibility for VEOA, VRA and/or 30% or more disabled veterans hiring authorities.
4. ICTAP Eligibles: A copy of the RIF separation notice and SF-50 if available.

WARNING: Failure to submit a complete application package including any required documentation by 11:59 PM (EST) on 06/14/2021, or at the time of application for announcements with an extended closing date, may result in an ineligible rating and loss of consideration. To verify that your application is complete, log into your USAJOBS account, select Application Status and More Information. The Details page will display the status of your application. It is the applicant's responsibility to verify that information entered, uploaded, or faxed is received, legible and accurate. HR will not modify answers submitted by an applicant.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
All US citizens.",3804,Washington
40,Senior Investment Analyst,Wells Fargo,"Washington, DC",None,"Job Description
Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume when submitting your application for consideration. To participate in some selection activities you will need to respond to an invitation. The invitation can be sent by both email and text message. In order to receive text message invitations, your profile must include a mobile phone number designated as “Personal Cell” or “Cellular” in the contact information of your application.
At Wells Fargo, we are looking for talented people who will put our customers at the center of everything we do. We are seeking candidates who embrace diversity, equity and inclusion in a workplace where everyone feels valued and inspired.
Help us build a better Wells Fargo. It all begins with outstanding talent. It all begins with you.
Wealth & Investment Management, or WIM, is one of the United States’ leading providers of financial and investment services. WIM provides a full range of personalized wealth management, investment, and retirement products and services to meet clients’ unique needs and help them achieve financial goals. Our mission is to help clients pursue their financial goals with confidence. We accomplish this by:
Building enduring client relationships through sound, thoughtful, and objective advice
Developing individualized plans for clients to help meet their financial objectives
Helping clients build, manage, preserve, and transition their financial resources and wealth
WIM serves clients through the following businesses:
Wells Fargo Private Bank serves high-net-worth and ultra high-net-worth individuals and families.
Abbot Downing serves ultra-high-net-worth individuals and families.
Wells Fargo Advisors provides investment advice and guidance to clients through more than 13,200 full-service financial advisors and referrals from more than 5,450 licensed bankers.
Wells Fargo Asset Management brings together a strategic balance of investment capabilities to serve the investment needs of institutions, financial advisors, and individuals worldwide.
Through Wells Fargo Private Bank and Abbot Downing, WIM is also a leading provider of trust, investment, and fiduciary services, including personal trust services and a number of specialized wealth services designed to meet the diverse needs of high-net-worth clients.
The Senior Investment Analyst conducts in depth analysis of investment opportunities relative to current client account holdings. Working in connection with more senior staff, possess an intimate knowledge of the inner dealings and risk tolerances of assigned client relationships. Interface with some, or possibly all, points of contact for a client relationship and support senior investment staff with investment management responsibilities. Charged with sourcing, reviewing and vetting platform ideas for top relationships and source/sponsor new ideas to the platform for broader client use. Mastery of all managers, proprietary solutions and products available to clients including considerations of various economic exposures, sources of risk and return, and how these considerations affect a particular client portfolio. Intelligently respond to any questions from the most astute investors about the merits and risks associated with any portfolio investment. Articulate, in a credible and sophisticated manner, all asset and sub-asset class decisions to the client and their advisors. May manage moderately complex accounts in conjunction with related accounts or smaller accounts independently. Solid understanding and close working relationship with central resources responsible for investment strategy, manager research, securities research, asset allocation, portfolio construction and risk management. Understanding of tax, financial planning, credit and other related items that affect portfolio positioning and may liaise directly with outside client advisors on related subjects.
This is a national role that can be performed in any of the identified major hubs as well as remotely.
The salary range displayed below is based on a full-time 40 hour a week schedule:
IL-Chicago: Min: $114,700 Mid: $163,900 Max: $213,100
MN-Minneapolis: Min: $104,300 Mid: $149,000 Max: $193,700
DC-Washington: Min: $114,700 Mid: $163,900 Max: $213,100
CA-San Francisco: Min: $125,200 Mid: $178,800 Max: $232,400
Salary range is determined by the location of the job. May be considered for a discretionary bonus.
Required Qualifications
6+ years of investment management experience
Desired Qualifications
High net worth client experience
Advanced Microsoft Office skills
Excellent verbal, written, and interpersonal communication skills
CFA-Chartered Financial Analyst designation
Other Desired Qualifications

Demonstrated ability to work independently within a team and in a fast paced environment supporting multiple individuals
Demonstrated proficiency with portfolio management systems and managing a large volume of client accounts
Experience with SEI, Moxy, Navigator, WealthIQ, Performer IQ, TMT and other Wells Fargo systems

Job Expectations
Ability to travel up to 20% of the time",3804,Washington
41,Senior Analyst - Biotechnology,Gryphon Scientific,"Takoma Park, MD 20912",None,"Position Description:
Company Description

Gryphon Scientific is a small consulting business with a unique focus on physical and life sciences, public health, and program management and evaluation. We capitalize on our staff’s rich, past experience in the laboratory, in policy shops and from the field, combined with literature-based research and interview data collection, to tackle projects with complex technical challenges. Our projects drive policy changes in security, preparedness, and science policy at the highest levels of US government. Abroad, we advise governments in the developing world on how to cope with daunting public health challenges. Our aim is to improve the health and safety of populations world-wide. The energy of our small business environment, as well as our commitment to technical excellence, attracts staff with the highest qualifications. Gryphon strongly encourages collaboration throughout the company, between junior and senior staff and across disciplines. Personal and professional development are actively supported through opportunities to work across a wide range of projects. Gryphon boasts a laid-back work environment, a comprehensive employee benefit package, and places an emphasis on work-life balance, which has afforded us excellent employee retention. We are growing and looking for new staff members to join the Gryphon team.

Over the past 15 years, Gryphon’s studies have been extremely influential on shaping the US stance on the oversight of emerging biotechnologies, from the crafting of the guidance to the synthetic DNA industry, to the regulation of manipulated pathogens to the oversight of mergers and acquisitions of biotech companies by foreign entities. We are actively recruiting a senior-level analyst with a background in biotechnology to contribute to and lead projects in these and other related areas. Qualified applicants will have experience working in the laboratory (in academe or industry) in synthetic biology, bioinformatics, genomics and/or bioengineering, although the position involves no lab work.

All positions at Gryphon Scientific require critical thinking, creative problem solving, and both qualitative and quantitative analysis to tackle challenging projects. This position will involve in-depth investigations of the scientific literature to develop an evidence basis for policy recommendations. Because our studies are communicated in the form of written reports and oral presentations, strong writing and verbal communication skills are required.

Technical Performance
Work with federal and other government clients to support planning efforts and policy decisions.
Conduct analyses on diverse and complex datasets and scientific literature to advance the understanding of biological safety standards, practices, and developments in science policy.
Analyze the scientific literature to extract needed data.
Apply scientific data to policy recommendations.
Develop methods to leverage scientific data in custom-made quantitative frameworks.
Managerial Responsibilities
Serve as a team leader on analytical projects in fields related to science policy and risk assessment.
Supervise the work of and mentor research assistants and interns as needed.
Communication
Translate complex scientific advances in biotechnology for clients and the broader scientific community through written, visual and oral media.
Develop and present reports and analyses to various stakeholder groups.
Present status and progress updates at regular meetings.
Marketing and Business Development
Attend scientific conferences and develop working relationships with various stakeholder groups.
Produce white papers and scholarly articles, based on company needs or client requests.
Support proposal development efforts.
Qualifications:
Minimum Qualifications:
PhD in scientific discipline of biotechnology (bioinformatics, molecular biology, genomics, synthetic biology, biological engineering, etc.) with 0-3 years post-graduate experience in academe or industry, or MS and 5 years experience, or BA/S and 10 years experience.
Must have a command of latest advances in biotechnology.
U.S. Citizen.
Willing to re-locate to the greater Washington, DC, area.
Required Skills:
Ability to analyze large and complex data sets to generate new findings.
Must be a creative problem solver that likes to tackle complex issues and work through hard problems.
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written.
Strong qualitative and quantitative analytical skills.
Strong interpersonal skills.
Ability to work independently.
Additional Skills and Experience (desired but not required):
Supervisory experience.
Well known and regarded in the field of biotechnology (either industry or academe).
Desired quantitative skills include familiarity with statistical tools, modeling suites, systems analysis or solving of Fermi problems.
Why Consider Gryphon Scientific?
Gryphon offers a competitive benefits package including 401(k), fully subsidized employee health insurance, and performance and profit-sharing bonuses.
Gryphon Scientific is a place that actively encourages intellectual engagement and provides analytical challenges on a wide range of projects.
Gryphon Scientific boasts a friendly, laid-back work environment. The dress code is casual. Gryphon employees often take afternoon walks to the local ice cream or coffee shop.
Mentorship is taken seriously at Gryphon Scientific. There is an open-door policy for all staff, meaning you can ask for advice from any staff member, from the owner of the company to your manager to junior staff.
Work-life balance and a pleasant work environment are a priority. All staff work in offices; there is not a cubicle in sight!
We encourage all senior staff to participate in business development efforts and the company supports senior staff pursuing work in their areas of interest.
Gryphon supports professional development including tuition reimbursement, conference attendance and career specific training.
To Apply:

For more information and to apply to the available position, please visit this website.",3804,Washington
42,Budget Analyst (Senior Budget Analyst),"US Justice, Bureau of Prisons/Federal Prison Syste...","Washington, DC","$72,750 - $113,362 a year","Duties
Summary
Why work for the Federal Bureau of Prisons?

You can have a meaningful career with an agency that truly values a diverse workforce. You will find a diverse workforce employed from entry level jobs to senior management positions. We protect public safety by ensuring federal offenders serve their sentences of imprisonment in facilities that are safe, humane, and provide reentry programming. Employees at correctional facilities perform correctional work regardless of their specific occupation.

Responsibilities
Responsible for developing, coordinating and maintaining an integrated system of Budget Execution via the Financial Management Information System (FMIS) for the entire Federal BOP which consists of Central Office (Headquarters), six (6) Regional Offices, two (2) Law Enforcement Training Centers, and 100 field installations.

Responsible for monitoring the results of budget execution and formulation input from Central Office Administrators, Regional Comptrollers, and in coordination with the Controller of the Management & Specialty Training Center.

Responsible for the formulation of Annual Budgets for all BOP facilities using the established equity formulas by management program area (i.e. Food Service, Medical), and coordinating with Facilities Staff (Headquarters & Regions) the Annual B&F Budget requirements in the FMIS System.

Provides technical assistance to BOP field installations in maintaining the Financial Management Information System (FMIS) and responsible for future development of enhancements to the system.

Responsible for the continued development, revision, and implementation of the BOP policy relating to the FMIS system (Distributed Budget Module - Manual).
Travel Required
25% or less - Travel may be required for training and/or work related issues.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
0560 Budget Analysis
Similar jobs
Analysts, Budget
Budget Analysts
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U.S. Citizenship is Required.
See Special Conditions of Employment Section.
Selective Service Requirement: http://www.sss.gov
Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan (ICTAP). The ICTAP provides eligible displaced Federal competitive service employees with selection priority over other candidates for competitive service vacancies. If your agency has notified you in writing that you are a displaced employee eligible for ICTAP consideration, you may receive selection priority if: 1)this vacancy is within your ICTAP eligibility; 2) you apply under the instructions in this announcement; and 3) you are found well qualified for this vacancy. To be well qualified, you must satisfy all qualification requirements for the vacant position and rate equivalent to the Highly Qualified category using established category rating criteria. You must provide proof of eligibility with your application of ICTAP eligibility or a copy of your separation personnel action form. Additional information about ICTAP eligibility is at: Click Here


The Career Transition Assistance Plan (CTAP) provides eligible surplus and displaced competitive service employees in the Department of Justice with selection priority over other candidates for competitive service vacancies. If your Department of Justice component has notified you in writing that you are a surplus or displaced employee eligible for CTAP consideration, you may receive selection priority if: 1) this vacancy is within your CTAP eligibility; 2) you apply under the instructions in this announcement; and 3) you are found well qualified for this vacancy. To be well qualified, you must satisfy all qualification requirements for the vacant position and rate equivalent to the Highly Qualified category using established category rating criteria. You must provide a copy of your written notification of CTAP eligibility with your application. Additional information about CTAP eligibility is at: Click Here
Qualifications
To be considered for the position, you must meet the following qualification requirements:

Education:

GS-11: Ph.D. or equivalent doctoral degree or three full years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to such a degree or LL.M., if related.

Graduate education must demonstrate the knowledge, skills, and abilities necessary to do the work of the position.

GS-12: There is no substitution of education for specialized experience at these levels.

OR

Experience:

GS-11 and GS-12: You must have at least one year of specialized experience equivalent in difficulty and complexity to the next lower grade level in federal service. To be creditable, this experience must have equipped the applicant with the particular qualifications to perform successfully the duties of the position, and must typically be in or related to the position to be filled.

Some examples of this qualifying experience are:

GS-11:

Experience in analyzing and evaluating program plans and funding.
Experience in providing training and/or technical assistance on budget reprogramming actions, policies, principles and procedures.
Experience in compiling, developing and analyzing various fiscal reports and projections, and making recommendations on fiscal matters.

GS-12:

Experience providing technical advice on Budget Execution Operations, annual budget requirements, annual obligations, operating costs, special projects, and other budget information.
Experience reviewing appropriations through completion of Office of Management (OMB)required Quarterly Budget Execution and Call Reports, reports on Budget execution (SF-133’s and SF-225’s), quarterly Department of Justice (DOJ) Status Reports, Obligations and Expenditure reports.
Experience in preparing reports, analyses, studies covering a wide range of program areas for Executive Staff review and consideration of current year and out year budget priorities.
Experience providing technical assistance to field installations in maintaining the Financial Management Information Systems (FMIS) and development of enhancements to the system.

OR

Combination of Education and Experience:

GS-11 only: Have a combination of education and experience. This experience must have equipped you with the qualifications to perform the major duties of this position as described above.

If applicable, credit will be given for paid and unpaid experience. To receive proper credit, you must show the actual time (such as the number of hours worked per week) spent in activities.

**Your eligibility for consideration will be based on your responses to the questions in the application.**
Education
See Qualifications Section for education requirements, if applicable.

ONLY if education is a requirement/substitution for specialized experience, applicant MUST upload legible transcripts as verification of educational requirement. Transcripts MUST be uploaded and electronically linked from USAJOBS at the time you apply and MUST include identifying information to include School Name, Student Name, Degree and Date Awarded (if applicable). All academic degrees and coursework must be completed at a college or university that has obtained accreditation or pre-accreditation status from an accrediting body recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. For a list of schools that meet this criteria, Click Here.

Foreign Education: For information regarding foreign education requirements, please see Foreign Diploma and Credit Recognition at the U.S. Department of Education website: Recognition of Foreign Qualifications.

If you are selected for this position and qualified based on education (i.e. basic education requirement and/or substitution of education), you will be required to provide an OFFICIAL transcript prior to your first day on duty.
Additional information
Special Conditions of Employment Section:

The incumbent is subject to geographic relocation to meet the needs of the agency.

Appointment is subject to satisfactory completion of a pre-employment and panel interview, urinalysis, physical, and background investigation.

All applicants are subject to, and must satisfactorily pass all screening requirements in relation to National Crime Information Center (NCIC) and credit check.

Additional selections may be made if vacancies occur within the life of the certificate.

Current Federal Law Enforcement Employees:

Individuals selected who are under the Federal Employees Retirement System (FERS) or Civil Service Retirement System (CSRS) and who have not had three years ""primary"" law enforcement retirement coverage, will not be covered by law enforcement retirement while in this position. To regain coverage, individuals must return to a position with ""primary"" coverage.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Your application will be evaluated and rated under DOJ's Category Rating and Selection Procedures. Based upon your self-reported responses to the assessment questions during the application process, your application will be placed into one of three categories: Best Qualified, Highly Qualified, or Qualified. Applications will be reviewed from the top quality category. Your resume and supporting documentation will be used to determine whether you meet the job qualifications listed in this announcement. If you are found qualified for this job, your resume and supporting documentation will be compared to the responses you provided on the online assessment questionnaire.

NOTE: Candidates within the top quality category and who are eligible for veterans preference will receive selection priority over non-veteran preference eligibles.

If you are entitled to veterans preference, you should indicate the type of veterans preference you are claiming on your resume. Although veterans preference points are not assigned under the category rating procedures described under ""How You Will Be Evaluated"", veterans preference eligibles are listed ahead of non-veterans within each category for which they are qualified.

In addition, qualified veterans with a compensable service-connected disability of 10% or more are placed at the top of the highest qualified category as defined by category rating procedures.

What Competencies/Knowledge, Skills and Abilities are Required for this Position?

The following Competencies/Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (KSA's) are required:

GS-11 and GS-12:

Ability to communicate orally.
Ability to communicate in writing.
Ability to plan and organize work.
Ability to analyze financial date.
Knowledge of budget principles, procedures, and regulations.
Ability to apply procedures, policies, and regulations to resolve budget issues.
Knowledge of automated financial systems.


To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
Veterans' Preference Documentation: Veterans must demonstrate that they have been discharged or released from active duty under honorable conditions (i.e., the individual must have received either an honorable or general discharge). Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty (DD-214 indicating type of discharge); or other official documentation (e.g., documentation of receipt of a campaign badge or expeditionary medal).
If you are currently on active duty, a statement from the appropriate Branch Personnel Office containing the following information: Name, Rank, Branch of Service, Active Duty time, Projected Separation Date and type of anticipated discharge must be provided.
If you are a disabled veteran, a Purple Heart recipient, or widow/widower of a veteran, the spouse of a disabled veteran or the parent of a disabled or deceased veteran, you SHOULD submit a completed Standard Form (SF) 15, ""Application for 10-Point Veteran Preference"", and the other required documentation identified on the reverse side of the SF-15 to support your preference claim. Documentation to support a disability must reflect the overall evaluation or percentage disability rating. Veterans must also demonstrate that they have been discharged or released from active duty under honorable conditions (i.e., the individual must have received either an honorable or general discharge).
Resume showing relevant experience (cover letter optional).
In order to receive credit for experience contained in a resume, your employment history must be documented in month/year format (MM/YYYY), reflecting starting date and ending date and include the number of hours worked per week. Failure to follow this format may result in disqualification.
A college transcript which includes the School Name, Student Name, Degree and Date Awarded (if applicable). (Note: If you are selected for this position, official transcript(s) will be required prior to your first day).
SF-50 for proof of prior LEO coverage, if applicable.

Failure to provide these documents could possibly result in removal from consideration for this vacancy. If uploading documentation, do not identify/save your documents utilizing a special character such as %, #, @, etc. Documentation should be identified/saved as VA Letter, DD214, or Transcripts.

We cannot be held responsible for incompatible software, delays in mail service, applicant application errors, etc.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
• THIS IS A DELEGATED EXAMINING ANNOUNCEMENT OPEN TO ALL U.S. CITIZENS. • DIVISION: Budget Execution Branch, Administration Division • Duty Location: Central Office, Washington, DC",3804,Washington
43,Program Analyst,US Department of State - Agency Wide,"Washington, DC","$103,690 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
The position is located in the Bureau of Global Talent Management, Office of Talent Services, Corporate Services, Employment Programs (GTM/TS/COR/EP). The Program Analyst will manage the department-wide employment program, Reemployed Annuitant (REA/WAE) Program and Global Registry.

Responsibilities
Responsible for directing, implementing, coordinating, or overseeing management programs impacting the Bureau such as annual and strategic program planning, program budgeting, acquisition planning and administration, mandatory periodic reports.
Plans and conducts special studies, personally or through team members, provides advice to managers of headquarters functions, and develops and evaluates policies in assigned areas of responsibility.
Responsible for providing oversight and coordinating the identification, analysis and issuance of policies with managers and top level officials of the Bureau.
Plans, develops, and coordinates planning management through briefings, presentations and conferences for executive management. Ensures that accurate, appropriately concise and timely information is available to management and policy officials .
Represents the Bureau at meetings and conferences as directed by his/her supervisor or higher level manager.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
13
Job family (Series)
0343 Management And Program Analysis
Similar jobs
Analysts, Management
Analysts, Program
Management Analysts
Program Analysts
Program Management Analyst
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Incumbent will be subject to random drug testing.
U.S. Citizenship is required.
One year probationary period, unless excepted by regulation.
Verification of employment eligibility in the United States is required.
Must be able to obtain and maintain a Secret security clearance.
Qualifications
Applicants must meet all the required qualification requirements, including education, and any selective placement factors described below by the closing date of this announcement. If you are qualifying based on education OR if there are mandatory education requirements listed below, you MUST submit a copy of your college transcript with your application. NOTE: Applicants must meet time-in-grade and time after competitive appointment requirements, by the closing date of this announcement. Time-In-Grade Requirements: Federal applicants must have served 52 weeks at the next lower grade to satisfy time-in-grade restrictions, per 5CFR 300, Subpart F.

Applicants must have 1 year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-12 level in the Federal service which provided the applicant with the particular knowledge, skills and abilities to perform the duties of the position.

Qualifying specialized experience must demonstrate the following:

Experience interacting with various groups and individuals including senior management.
Experience in management analysis and program evaluation techniques.
Experience setting performance measures and monitoring progress.

There is no substitute of education for specialized experience for the GS-13 position.
Education
See the qualifications section of this vacancy announcement for education requirements, if applicable.
Additional information
For reasonable accommodation at the U.S. Department of State, please contact the Office of Accessibility and Accommodations at (202) 663-3474 or ReasonableAccommodations@state.gov.

EMPLOYMENT ELIGIBILITY VERIFICATION PROGRAM (E-Verify) – U.S. law requires organizations to employ only individuals who may legally work in the United States - either U.S. citizens, or foreign citizens who have the necessary authorization. This agency utilizes E-Verify to compare information from the Form I-9, Employment Eligibility Verification, to data from U.S. Department of Homeland Security (DHS) and Social Security Administration (SSA) records to confirm employment eligibility. If the employee’s information does not match DHS and/or SSA records, the employee is given an opportunity to resolve the problem. If eligibility cannot be verified, employment will be terminated.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Your qualifications will be evaluated on the following knowledge, skills, abilities (KSAs) and other characteristics that are relevant to the duties of this position and must be fully supported by information in your resume:

Ability to perform management and program analyses.
Skill in communicating with customers / clients with a wide variety of backgrounds.
Knowledge of database management.
Ability to clearly and accurately communicate technical information to all audiences.
Ability to communicate effectively orally.

Your resume serves as the basis for qualification determinations and must highlight your most relevant and significant work experience and education (if applicable) as it relates to this job opportunity. Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Your resume should include the dates of all qualifying experience (from month/year to month/year) and the number of hours worked/volunteered per week. For assistance with creating a resume, please click here.

Qualified candidates are assigned a score between 70 and 100. Agency Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP) candidates must be rated ""Well Qualified"" for the position and earn a score of at least 85 (when applicants are rated in a range of 70 to 100) to receive consideration for selection priority. Applicants must meet all the qualification requirements and submit any required supporting documentation by the closing date of this job opportunity.

Your applicant package must contain sufficient information to make a valid determination that you fully meet the basic/specialized experience requirements as stated in this job opportunity announcement for each grade level(s) for which you are applying. Applicants found to be among the top qualified candidates will be referred to the hiring official for further consideration and possible interview.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Required Documents

Required Documents
All required documents listed below, that are applicable to you, must be submitted to our automated system ""Gateway to State"" by 11:59 p.m. Eastern Time (ET) on the closing date of this announcement.

1. Resume - your resume or any other written format you choose should contain the required information as specified in the “How You Will Be Evaluated” section. Insufficient information will result in an ineligible rating.

2. A completed online job specific self-assessment questionnaire through the Department’s automated system “Gateway to State”.

3. Transcripts - if applicable, see the Qualifications section of the announcement. If selected, an official/sealed college transcript(s) will be required to verify education prior to employment.

4. If you are qualifying based on other criteria listed under the Qualification Section of this announcement, you must submit the required supporting documentation (certificates, certifications, etc.) with your application by the closing date.

5. Performance Appraisal – ICTAP/CTAP eligible applicants must submit a copy of your most recent completed annual performance appraisal that includes the final rating. If a performance appraisal does not exist, is incomplete or unavailable, a Form DS-1812 (Applicant Appraisal) or equivalent form from another agency signed by the current supervisor is acceptable. Mid-year progress reviews will not be accepted.

6. ICTAP/CTAP eligible applicants must submit SF-50s (Notification of Personnel Action) that show: effective date, position title, series, grade, salary, tenure, position occupied, full promotion potential, and name of agency. Examples include promotion & within-grade increase actions. Award SF-50s often do not show this information. Current Federal employees applying under the Veterans Employment Opportunities Act (VEOA) must submit a qualifying SF-50 to show you meet time-in-grade requirements.

7. Veterans who are preference eligibles OR who have been separated from the Armed Forces under honorable conditions (honorable or general discharge) after 3 or more years of continuous active service may apply under the Veterans Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA). You must submit documentation showing your eligibility to apply under VEOA, which may include: VA Letter, statement of service, and/or a DD-214 (Member Copy 4 is preferable) showing the dates you served as well as your type of discharge and qualifying service campaign medals OR if you are still on active duty, you MUST submit a certification on letterhead from your military branch, which contains your military service dates, expected date of discharge or release, and the character of service to show that your military service was performed under honorable conditions. The expected date of discharge or release must be no later than 120 days after the certification is submitted for consideration for this vacancy announcement.

For more information on preference eligibility, consult the Vet Guide.

To gain access to your DD-214 online, please visit: http://www.archives.gov/veterans/military-service-records/get-service-records.html 8. CTAP/ICTAP eligibles must submit a copy of the appropriate documentation with their application.

See links below:

ICTAP Considerations

CTAP Considerations
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
CTAP, ICTAP, and VEOA",3804,Washington
44,Network Analyst I,"American Federation of State, County and Municipal...","Washington, DC","$76,115 a year","To be consideredFor each position of interest, please send a separate email with an attached cover letter and resume to: recruiting@afscme.org.Also, include the position title, and if you are a current member of an AFSCME Local, in the subject line of your email.Network Analyst IDepartment:Information TechnologyLocation:Washington, D.C.Grade:8Salary:Starts at $76,115Benefits:List of benefitsPosting Date:June 08, 2021This position in the Information Technology Department is responsible for maintaining Microsoft server-based equipment, VMWARE, Storage, Office 365 and Cloud Services administration that includes web-enabled services, electronic mail, databases, application servers and backup services. This involves capabilities in network design and implementation of network operating systems on various hardware and cloud platforms within the AFSCME network at headquarters and field locations.DUTIES: Position will maintain servers and peripheral computer room devices performing daily routine maintenance as determined by the Senior Network and Network ManagerMonitors the status of network servers via an automated software system, resolves problems, or escalates problems for resolution by senior Network staff when appropriate.Installs operating systems patches and associated software tools for maintenance and monitoring of network components. Monitors and tests networks and servers.Performs firmware upgrades and installs support packs for servers, firewalls, storage and switches.Installs hardware relating to networks, servers, PC’s and maintenance of same; server-based equipment includes web-enabled services, e-mail, databases, application and general file servers.Documents cable systems with charts and maintains patch cables. Maintain disk space usage statistics on NAS, SAN and Raid systems. Creates and maintains cabling and power distribution charts.Develops and maintains the associated documentation in an electronic format, required for computer operations and network management. This documentation includes logbooks, checklists, job run steps, various procedures, network diagrams and hardware/software configurations and conventionsInteracts with the operating system and applications via PC with MS Windows and MS office applications.Provides support to users by investigating and resolving user problems with a wide variety of hardware including networked PCs, printers, PC peripherals, monitors, servers, backup systems, routers, switches and other hardware. Provides telephone support to remote sites with all of the above.Documents work performed in accordance with department standards and reports on progress and status of assigned projects to managers. Keeps tracking system of work updated in a timely manner.Keeps current on emerging technologies via professional organizations, technical or functional reference manuals and magazines, and other external sources.Participates on team for creating computer security and disaster recovery plans and follows those plans.Suggests ways to improve the department's operations procedures and standards.Performs other duties as requiredEDUCATION REQUIREMENTS: Graduation from an accredited four-year college or university with a degree in Computer Sciences or a technical institution with certification in network management.A minimum of three (3) years of experience on Microsoft networks and servers or; any equivalent combination of education and experience providing the following knowledge, skills and abilities:EXPERIENCE/SKILLS REQUIREMENTS:Knowledge of network operating systems.Local Area Networks Certified Professional with the following coursework completed: LAN Implementation and Configuration, Wireless, switched, Virtual &Routed Network Troubleshooting, PC Networking, Intro to Storage NetworksMicrosoft Certified System Engineer (MCSE) certification desirable.Knowledge and hands on experience of hardware configuration of servers, PCs, laptops, and switching equipment. Expertise in cable configuration, connector building, etc. and all forms of bios upgrades to hardware and support pack application to Windows PC and server software.Knowledge of electronic communications set-up and administration.Knowledge of client/server operations including Windows Operating Systems (including Windows Server ) and Local Area Network and attached print device concepts. Knowledge of operations and batch processes.Knowledge of e-mail systems (preferably Office 365).Experience with enterprise backup software, Data Center Edition. Understanding of backup concepts.Technical knowledge of Encryption technologies used in secure transfer of files.Ability to develop procedures and documentation.Strong ability to work under pressure and time constraints.Ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing.Familiarity with all types of Internet communications networks cable, firewall setup, and IP networking.Customer service skills and communication skills, analytical problem-solving skills, and accurate data entry skills.Travel and Work Hours:Extended work hours, travel and a valid driver’s license are required.Please submit resume and cover letter to recruiting@afscme.org.Posting Date: June 8, 2021AFSCME is an equal opportunity employer, and, as such, does not discriminate an employee or applicant on the basis of race, creed, color, age, sex, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, religious affiliation, disability, or any other classification protected from discrimination under applicable law.Job Type: Full-timePay: $76,115.00 per year",3804,Washington
45,Economist,"US Treasury, Departmental Offices","Washington, DC","$87,198 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
The purpose of this position is to serve as an Economist in the Office of Macroeconomic Analysis (MA) in the Office of Economic Policy (EP). MA provides intelligence and research support to senior Treasury officials concerning current and future developments in the U.S. economy that cut across all economic sectors. The selectee must be competent in macroeconomics, policy modeling, and econometrics and demonstrate communication skills.

Responsibilities
The following are the duties of this position at the GS-14. If you are selected at a lower grade level, you will have the opportunity to learn to perform all these duties, and will receive training to help you grow in this position.
Identify and analyze substantive issues, independently structuring the work to be performed, evaluating the results attained, and recommending potential changes/policies.Work with other analysts both within and outside Macroeconomic Analysis (MA) to monitor and assess the significance of current and future economic developments, including producing memos, papers, and briefings on current and prospective conditions, under tight time constraints for senior Treasury policy-making officials.Plan, draft, edit, and present assessments of important macroeconomic factors. Provide advice and counsel to senior Treasury policy-making officials.Analyze and assess the potential impact of U.S. policy shifts or global economic developments on the U.S. economy and specific special interests.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
0110 Economist
Similar jobs
Economists
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Please refer to ""Conditions of Employment.""
Click ""Print Preview"" to review the entire announcement before applying.
Must be U.S. Citizens or U.S. Nationals
The experience may have been gained in either the public, private sector or volunteer service. One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis. To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/day/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week on your resume.
Qualifications
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement.

Specialized experience:

For the GS-14, you must have one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-13grade level in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position includes:
Conducting independent research into questions of economic significance and using advanced statistical and econometric techniques; ANDPublished independent research in peer-reviewed journal articles, doctoral dissertation chapters, or equivalent publications; ANDPlanned and implemented applied macroeconomic and/or economic policy-driven modeling; ANDLed intra-office or interagency work groups to study questions of applied macroeconomic and/or economic policy significance; ANDDeveloped applied economic or policy ideas through the use of economic research.

For the GS-13, you must have one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-12 grade level in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position includes:
Planning, executing, and completing independent economic research projects by using appropriate theoretical models, statistical techniques, and software packages that would suitable for publication in academic journals; ANDCompiling and analyzing macro data sets to construct tables or graphs that capture key findings; ANDWorking with macroeconomic data by collection methods or time-series techniques to assess the significance of changes in economic conditions; ANDCommunicating effectively, both in written products and orally, to present analysis at interagency policy meetings, policy-oriented workshops outside government, or private-sector consulting projects related to the public sector.
For the GS-12, you must have one year of specialized experience at a level of difficulty and responsibility equivalent to the GS-11grade level in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position includes:
Plan and execute independent economic research projects, using appropriate theoretical models, statistical techniques, or software packages, that would be suitable for publication in academic journals; ANDCompile and analyze macroeconomic data sets to construct tables or graphs that capture key findings; ANDCommunicate effectively, both in written products and during oral presentations.
OR
You may substitute education for specialized experience as follows: a related Ph.D. or equivalent doctoral degree
OR
You may qualify by a combination of experience and education. Only graduate level education in excess of the first 36 semester hours (54 quarter hours) may be combined to be considered for qualifying education.
Education
A. Degree: economics, that included at least 21 semester hours in economics and 3 semester hours in statistics, accounting, or calculus.
OR
B. Combination of education and experience: courses equivalent to a major in economics, as shown in A above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.


The education generally must be from an accredited (or pre-accredited) college or university recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Additional information
We may select from this announcement or any other source to fill one or more vacancies.Relocation expenses will not be paid.This is a non-bargaining unit position.We offer opportunities for telework.

CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT:
A one year probationary period may be required.Must successfully complete a background investigation.Complete a Declaration for Federal Employment to determine your suitability for Federal employment, at the time requested by the agency.If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System or are exempt from having to do so.Have your salary sent to a financial institution of your choice by Direct Deposit/Electronic Funds Transfer.Go through a Personal Identity Verification (PIV) process that requires two forms of identification from the Form I-9. Federal law requires verification of the identity and employment eligibility of all new hires in the U.S.File a Confidential Financial Disclosure Report within 30 days of appointment and annually from then on.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Your application includes your resume, responses to the online questions, and required supporting documents. Please be sure that your resume includes detailed information to support your qualifications for this position; failure to provide sufficient evidence in your resume may result in a “not qualified” determination.

Rating and Referral: Your application will be evaluated in the following areas: Technical Skills, Communications, Analysis.

This announcement is issued under ""direct-hire"" authority. Consistent with 5 U.S.C 3304(a)(3) and OPM regulations (5 CFR 337 Subpart B) on direct-hire: All candidates who meet all the qualification and other eligibility requirements may be referred for consideration. Competitive examining rules providing for rating and ranking and veterans' preference do not apply.

You may be required to participate in a selection interview.

If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee (eligible for the Career Transition Assistance Plan (CTAP)/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan (ICTAP)) you must be assigned the middle category or better to be rated as “well qualified"" to receive special selection priority.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
A complete application includes 1. A resume, 2. Vacancy question responses, and 3. Submission of any required documents. Please note that if you do not provide all required information, as specified in this announcement, you may not be considered for this position (or may not receive the special consideration for which you may be eligible).

All applicants are required to submit a resume either by creating one in USAJOBS or uploading one of their own choosing. (Cover letters are optional.) To receive full credit for relevant experience, please list the month/date/year and number of hours worked for experience listed on your resume. We suggest that you preview the online questions, as you may need to customize your resume to ensure that it supports your responses to these questions. Please view resume tips.

VETERANS' PREFERENCE DOCUMENTATION: If you are claiming veterans' preference, please see applicant guide for required documentation. In order to be considered for veterans preference, you must submit all required documentation as outlined in the applicant guide.

CAREER TRANSITION ASSISTANCE PLAN (CTAP) OR INTERAGENCY CAREER TRANSITION ASSISTANCE PLAN (ICTAP) DOCUMENTATION: If you are a displaced or surplus Federal employee, click CTAP/ICTAP for eligibility and a detailed list of required documents.


EDUCATION DOCUMENTATION: You are not required to submit transcripts for this initial phase of the application process. Candidates will be referred for consideration based on their self-certification. If you are selected for a position which has a positive education requirement (as described in the vacancy announcement) and/or you are qualifying solely on your education, you will be required to submit official transcripts verifying your qualifications prior to a job offer being issued.

A college or university degree generally must be from an accredited (or pre-accredited) college or university recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. For a list of schools which meet these criteria, please refer to Department of Education Accreditation page.

If you are qualifying based on foreign education, you must submit proof of creditability of education as evaluated by a credentialing agency, if you are selected. Refer to the OPM instructions.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Our comprehensive benefits are very generous. Our benefits package includes:
Challenging work, opportunities for advancement, competitive salaries, bonuses and incentive awards.Ten paid holidays, 13 days of sick leave, and 13 to 26 days of vacation time each year.
Access to insurance programs that may be continued after you retire.
A wide choice of health insurance plans, coverage for pre-existing conditions, and no waiting periods. We pay a substantial amount (up to 75%) of the health insurance premiums.
A retirement program which includes employer-matching contributions.
Learn more about Federal benefits programs at: https://help.usajobs.gov/index.php/Pay_and_Benefits.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
U.S. citizens or U.S. Nationals; no prior Federal experience is required.",3804,Washington
46,Program Analysts COVID-19 Vaccinations,"HRS Consulting, Inc.","Washington, DC 20571 (Downtown area)",None,"High Reliability Solutions (HRS) is our name.
Program Analysts COVID-19 Vaccinations
Washington, DC 20571
HRS Consulting, Inc. is staffed by human performance and training professionals who specialize in assisting our clients to adopt the best practices of High Reliability Organizations. Our experts include professionals with extensive experience introducing HRO principles and enthusiasm for HROs in healthcare. We have a portfolio of proven tools and systems to advance our customers’ goals.

Position Description:
HRS Consulting, Inc. is seeking multiple Program Analysts to work in support of the Department of Veterans Affairs to provide best value healthcare and professional consulting services to the Veterans Health Administration (VHA). Qualified candidates will experience supporting wide-scale immunization programs.
The Program Analysts will support VHA efforts to stand-up a vaccine distribution program for COVID-19 for healthcare personnel. This includes active coordination across disciplines within VHA as well as extensive liaisons between VA, Centers for Disease Control (CDC), public health authorities and VA Medical Centers.
Location Note: Qualified candidates outside the Washington DC area will be considered for remote work arrangements.
Duties/Responsibilities:
Supporting VHA in the analysis and evaluation of healthcare program effectiveness by measuring success, outcomes, and improvement programs
Conducting program reviews requiring systematic ways of assessing the quality of current and future VHA programs to determine ways to improve programs
Assisting VHA in executing program operations to meet the previously established goals and objectives
Providing input on the program evaluation and improvement of the organization and management of projects and programs to increase productivity/program performance
Assisting VHA in the identification of program resources and the development of program reports
Experience/Education Requirements:
U.S. Citizen or Green Card Holder
Current security clearance or Veterans Affairs (VA) credentials (VA PIV card); recent fingerprints are preferred
Bachelor's degree
Expertise working with large scale vaccination and immunization programs
Experience supporting Veterans Health programs
Senior Program Analysts require 8+ years of related experience analyzing and evaluating program effectiveness at the enterprise level
Junior Program Analysts require 4+ years of related experience supporting overall operations improvement for a healthcare organization
Experience supporting substantive programs focused on Veterans healthcare and outreach is preferred
Expertise in conducting program reviews and determining methods of improvement
Ability to clearly communicate and exchange information with co-workers, teammates, stakeholders, and other personnel, as required
Proficiency working across the Microsoft Office Suite
Work Environment/Physical Demands:
This job operates in a professional office environment with prolonged periods sitting at a desk, attending meetings, and using standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, and video teleconferencing equipment.
This is a largely sedentary role; however, the ability to move office items such as files, laptop/computer equipment, meeting materials, and other work supplies may require carrying and lifting items up to 15 pounds at times.
Business travel may be required.
HRS Consulting, Inc. provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.
We comply with Form I-9 identity and legal work authorization requirements and utilize E-Verify for Employment Eligibility Verification in accordance the Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (IRCA).
Individuals with disabilities who need assistance with the application process can reach us by email at recruiting@ihthrs.com or telephone 954-217-6241.
www.hrsconsults.com",3804,Washington
47,"Mobile Security Analyst, Senior",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Washington, DC",None,"Key Role:
Perform forensic analysis of digital information and gather and handle evidence. Use forensically sound procedures to identify network and mobile device intrusion evidence and identify perpetrators. Apply expertise in technical principles, theories, and concepts in the field. Contribute to the completion of specific programs and projects. Perform mobile application security vetting to determine the vulnerabilities and risks of deploying applications to an enterprise architecture.
Basic Qualifications:
Experience with one or more Mobile Security or Mobile Device Management tools, including Forensic Toolkit (FTK), AirWatch, Steel Talon, or CellebriteKnowledge of Windows, Linux, or Android operating systems, including registry, services, memory management, and security protectionsAbility to analyze and document procedures for investigationsTop Secret clearanceHS diploma or GED
Additional Qualifications:Experience with mobile device forensicsExperience with making security recommendations for mobile devicesExperience with mobile application vettingExperience with LinuxPossession of excellent verbal and written communication skills
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information; Top Secret clearance is required.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",3804,Washington
48,Business Analyst - Department of State,Censeo Consulting Group,"Washington, DC 20006 (Foggy Bottom area)",None,"Business Analyst
The Company:
Censeo Consulting Group is a top Washington D.C. based management consulting firm dedicated to helping public sector and non-profit clients build operational excellence, deliver better outcomes, and lower cost. We take a personalized approach to strategic consulting to solve our clients’ most complex problems and build operational excellence that transforms their organizations, allowing them to better deliver on their public and social missions.
At Censeo, our award-winning culture means you’ll join a tight-knit community of 50 brilliant and passionate colleagues. We are advocates for a better functioning public sector, and we’re also good friends who know the names of each other’s dogs. Our philosophy is horizontal, not hierarchical, and our open-door policy encourages a culture of entrepreneurship at all levels. We share successes, make decisions together, and foster an environment for those with passion and initiative (Business Analysts especially!) to lead. Our colleagues bring their own unique personalities to work every day and use them to help shape our growing firm in ways that reach far beyond client projects.
The Position:
We are looking for passionate, driven candidates to help solve our client’s complex problems and support one of our core clients at the Department of State. As a Business Analyst supporting Department of State (DOS) Category Management Program Management Office (CMSO). You will support the creation and implementation of Category Management strategies DOS-wide. In this role you will utilize a broad range of creative problem-solving, technical and analytical rigor, and change management skills to help develop and implement Category Strategies. A typical day in the life of a Business Analyst is never quite the same, but it is always equally exciting and challenging. On any given day, you could be performing critical analyses, helping shape final recommendations for clients, creating deliverables, or presenting your work to Censeo leadership and senior clients. Some of your key responsibilities as a Business Analyst will include:
Supporting all aspects of client engagements from defining the strategy of a project to preparing final deliverables
Conducting quantitative and qualitative analysis of data to identify trends, find opportunities areas, and develop meaningful insights
Developing in-depth knowledge of client issues, needs, and contexts
Collaborating with teams (typically 3-7 team members per project) to recommend realistic solutions to their problems and encourage innovative, bold thinking
Sharing insights, results, and recommendations in a comprehensible manner through both written presentations/reports and interactions with teams/clients
The Ideal Candidate:
At Censeo, we are looking for unique candidates whose passion and enthusiasm will help shape Censeo’s client insights and workplace culture. Our staff have a wide range of backgrounds, areas of expertise, personality types, and favorite breakfast foods. Our client and cultural successes are rooted in our team’s innovation, creative problem solving, and collaboration. The unique perspective that you bring and the way you tackle problems are much more important to us than what’s printed on your diploma. We believe a successful Business Analyst will have:
Secret Security Clearance or MRPT Required for the role
BA/BS required with a strong academic background
1-3 years of experience supporting federal clients preferred
Prior experience in supporting federal acquisition, procurement, or category management preferred
Superior creative problem-solving, analytical, and quantitative skills
Ability to work effectively on projects with demanding deadlines in a team environment
Effective written and verbal communication skills with an ability to share and synthesize knowledge
Ability and desire to take initiative and ownership over project work and professional development and growth
Knowledge and appreciation of business concepts
Knowledge of spreadsheet and presentation software
Interest in working with public sector clients
The Location:
Censeo Consulting Group is based in Washington D.C., a fantastic city for recent college grads. For now, we’re all working from home. But normally, we work at an office conveniently located in the heart of downtown D.C., just a few blocks away from the White House. And with many of our clients also based in D.C., we have the luxury of leaving for a meeting and being back in the office in time for post-work happy hours, team dinners, and game nights.
The Fine Print:
Expected travel 0-10%; may increase based on business needs
This is an exempt, full-time position
Censeo offers a competitive compensation and benefits package, including paid vacation and sick leave, flexible and remote work opportunities, and tuition and training reimbursement. More information on our benefits and perks can be found at: https://www.censeoconsulting.com/about/join-us/.
Censeo is an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to providing equal opportunity to all applicants and employees in full compliance with all applicable state and federal laws prohibiting discrimination on the basis of race, color, age, gender, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other class protected by applicable state or federal law.
Join Our Award-Winning Culture!
Our passion wins awards. But don’t just take it from us…
2020 Vault #21 Best Boutique Consulting Firm
2019 Ivy Exec #7 Best Boutique Consulting Firm
2018 Consulting Magazine Best Small Firms to Work For
2017 Vault #12 Best Boutique Consulting Firm
2016 Forbes Best Management Consulting Firms in America
2015 Washington Business Journal’s Philanthropy List

3WHvED604u",3804,Washington
49,Senior Cyber Security Analyst,IQuasar,"Arlington, VA",None,"Position: Senior Cyber Security AnalystLocation: Arlington, VAPosition Type: Full-time positionClearance: MinimumInterim Secret with Eligibility to obtain a TS/SCIJob Description: Provide cybersecurity policy and strategy-related support focused on the intersection of mobility, cloud, and Internet of Things (IoT) technology groups with consideration of zero trust architectures, multi-factor authentication, and other emerging technologies. Assist team members with research, development, and documentation of IT strategies and enterprise capabilities in support of the warfighter. Develop, coordinate, and collaborate with teammates in the development of briefings, whitepapers, and other support materials for the senior leadership of the Client.Education/Experience Requirements: BA or BS degree or equivalent work/military experience6-10 years of experience with Cybersecurity or equivalent4-6 years of experience with government security policies and/or regulations or equivalentExperience with Microsoft Office, including Word, PowerPoint, and ExcelProven experience with content review, editing, grammar, & spell-checkingExperience supporting and assisting team members.Experience working in a team environment; ability to work unsupervised.Additional Recommended Qualifications: Knowledge of mobile devices, mobile device management, and mobile architectures with a focus on mobile securityApplicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.Job Type: Full-timeBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:Cybersecurity: 6 years (Preferred)Security Clearance:Secret (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",3804,Washington
50,Intelligence Analyst I - MRS,WorldAware,"Washington, DC 20006 (Downtown area)",None,"Intelligence Analyst I - MRS
WorldAware, Inc., 1875 K Street NW, Washington, District Of Columbia, United States of America Req #364
 Friday, June 11, 2021
At Crisis24, A GardaWorld Company, we take a proactive approach to solving business challenges and our customers are at the heart of everything we do. It’s the reason we love rolling up our sleeves and getting down to work – and it’s why we’re so successful. It takes an entire team to stand behind something big. Interested?
Position Overview:
Under the general supervision of the on-duty Senior Global Intelligence Analyst, as the Global Intelligence Analyst you will perform the majority of the intelligence monitoring, response, coordination and communication duties within the operational environment of the 24/7 Global Security Operations Center (GSOC). Your responsibilities are twofold: to serve the World Bank Group’s (WBG) travelers and permanent duty station staff across the globe, as well as monitor and respond to real-time security and safety threats worldwide. Intelligence support must be provided in a thorough and timely manner to ensure the safety and well-being of WBG staff and facilities. This position requires rotating shift work, to include nights, evenings, weekends, and holidays. Extended hours (12-hour shifts) are occasionally required.
Essential Duties/Responsibilities:
Monitors global events through designated tools, open source information, media, and vendor provided tools, software and resources that could impact WBG global operations
Monitors social media monitoring compiles reports
Analyzes and assesses events to determine potential impact to WBG personnel, facilities, product or reputation
Monitors and initiates responses to incidents and emergencies affecting the WBG personnel, operations or footprint
Liaises with WBG staff, other contractors, and vendors as directed by managers or Senior Intelligence Analyst on shift
Develops and issues intelligence communications regarding global events with potential to impact WBG staff or operations
Recognizes crisis situations and initiates protective action using independent judgment and professional training in accordance with incident management best practices and WBG policies and standard operating procedures
Available to provide surge capacity support during an emergency
Completes requests for intelligence and requests for assistance
Shift work is required for this position
Experience, Functional and Technical Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent combination of education and relevant intelligence analysis.
1+ years’ experience in a related field required
Significant exposure to risk analysis and incident management
Superior knowledge of multinational geopolitical events
Intelligence Gathering, Analysis and Alerting experience preferred
Skills/Abilities:
Versatile interpersonal skills
Excellent analytical skills
Outstanding written and verbal communication skills; accurate typing skills
Computer proficiency, including MS Office Suite and SharePoint
Foreign travel and experience
Foreign language knowledge
Ability to take initiative and multi-task under pressure
Excellent attention to detail and ability to organize and prioritize work with little supervision
Effective time management skills
Effective problem-solving skills
General knowledge of basic office equipment
Crisis24, A GardaWorld Company is dedicated to equal opportunity in employment without regard to race, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, veteran or disabled status, or any other protected class.
Other details
Job Family Dedicated Intelligence Pay Type Salary Required Education Bachelor’s Degree",3804,Washington
51,Financial Analyst,US Department of Energy,"Germantown, MD","$103,690 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is part of the Office of Science, Office of the Principal Deputy Director for Science Programs, Office of Management, Business Operations Division Department Of Energy. As a Financial Analyst, you will be responsible for the execution of the program direction budget for a nationwide program.
Responsibilities
As a Financial Analyst, you will:
Be responsible for the execution of the program direction budget for a nationwide program, providing advice to leadership by performing in-depth quantitative and qualitative analysis of budget activity lines.
Initiate and develop the establishment of related budget tracking and financial management systems.
Organize and participate in audits and financial reviews at field and site offices and contractor sites.
Conduct the development and implementation of fiscal performance and validation reviews primarily for program direction and field operations budgets.
Monitor Congressional actions, political/economic and DOE changes to identify how they would affect the current financial climate of the organization.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
0501 Financial Administration And Program
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a U.S. Citizen or National.
This employer participates in the e-Verify program.
Males born after 12/31/1959 must be registered for Selective Service.
Subject to satisfactory security and suitability requirements.
May be required to successfully complete a probationary period.
Qualifications
For GS-13 level

SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: A qualified candidate's online application and resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower grade level of GS-12 in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position is defined as:
Conducting quantitative and qualitative analysis of each budget activity line and presenting recommendations to the supervisor as required.
Developing and implementing fiscal performance and validation reviews for budgets.
Ensuring compliance with policy guidelines in the area of responsibility, ensuring appropriation is not exceeded.
Performing analysis on actual expenditures, obligations, costing patterns, projections, levels and sources of resources needed, anticipated impediments, and alternative, and alternative resource strategies.
Analyzing and projecting the potential effects of budgetary actions affecting subprograms within program direction.
For GS-14 level

SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: A qualified candidate's online application and resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower grade level of GS-13 in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position is defined as:
Organizing, directing, and participating in audits and financial reviews at field and site offices and contractor sites.
Developing and interpreting guidance to be followed in preparing annual operating objectives and plans funding estimates required for their execution.
Initiating meetings with customers to discuss financial management aspects of approved and planned funding.
Recommending long-range budget projections and financial strategies to senior management.
Interpreting, analyzing, and projecting the potential effects of budgetary and Congressional actions affecting subprograms within program direction.
Education
Qualification Standards

There is no positive education requirement for this position.
There is no substitution of education for experience at the GS-13 or GS-14 level.

Additional information
The U.S. Department of Energy fosters a diverse and inclusive workplace and is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
This job opportunity announcement may be used to fill additional similar vacancies across DOE.
For general information on government-wide Telework polices visit: www.telework.gov


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.

Once the application process is complete, your resume and supporting documentation will be used to determine whether you meet the job qualifications. If you are minimally qualified for this job, your responses to the self-assessment questions (True/False, Yes/ No, Multiple Choice questions) will be evaluated and you will be placed into one of three pre-defined quality categories under Category Rating procedures. These categories are ""Best Qualified"", ""Well Qualified"", and ""Qualified. If you rate yourself higher than is supported by your application materials, your responses may be adjusted and/or you may be excluded from consideration for this job.

Your qualifications will be evaluated on the following competencies (knowledge, skills, abilities and other characteristics):

Information Management
Mathematical Reasoning
Oral Communication
Problem Solving
Application of Veterans' Preference: If you are a preference eligible candidate, you will be listed at the top of whichever quality category your rating places you in. CP/CPS veterans are placed at the top of the highest category for all positions except professional and scientific positions at GS-9 and higher.

Career Transition Assistance Programs: To receive selection priority for this position, you must: 1) meet the eligibility criteria; and 2) be rated ""well-qualified"", which is defined as scoring in the in Well Qualified category (or higher).

You must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date (06/18/2021) of this announcement.

To preview the Assessment Questionnaire, clickhttps://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11120265.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
High Risk (HR)
Trust determination process
Credentialing, Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
To apply for this position, you MUST provide a complete application package which includes:

Your RESUME showing all relevant work experience (paid and unpaid) including: duties performed; full name and address of the each employer; start and end dates (month/day/year); work schedule (part-time, full-time, number of hours if intermittent); salary; and any completed education and training (program title, subject area, number of hours completed, and completion date).
Cover Letter, optional, expressing additional information not covered in your resume.
Transcripts, if specific educational requirements are indicated in this job announcement. Unofficial transcripts or any report listing institution, course title, credits earned (semester or quarter hour) and final grade is acceptable. It is your responsibility to provide adequate proof that you meet the educational requirements.
Veterans' Preference documentation,if applicable, DD-214 Member Copy 4 showing type of discharge/character of service; current active duty members- certification of expected discharge or release from active duty under honorable conditions dated within 120 days; SF-15 Form and related documentation; VA letter. For more information visit the USAJOBS Help Center & OPM CHCOC website for VOW information.
Career Transition Assistance Program/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program documentation, if applicable(e.g., Certification of Expected Separation, Reduction-In-Force Separation Notice, or Notice of Proposed Removal; SF-50 that documents the RIF separation action; and most recent performance appraisal.) For more information see the OPM Guide to Career Transition.
Failure to submit any of the above mentioned required documents may result in loss of consideration due to an incomplete application package. It is your responsibility to ensure all required documents have been submitted.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.",3804,Washington
52,Program Analyst (Open to both U.S. Citizens and Federal Employees),US Office of the Secretary of Transportation,"Washington, DC","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
The incumbent serves as a Program Analyst, identified as a Project and eGovernment Analyst, on the Investment Management Team, Oversight of Information Technology (IT) Investment Management within the Office of Resource Management, Office of the Chief Information Officer (CIO), Office of the Secretary of Transportation (OST). The incumbent acts as an advisor to senior Department and government officials for reporting on all facets of Capital Planning and Investment Control for IT Projects.

Responsibilities
As a Program Analyst, you will:

Develop, analyze, evaluate, modify, and review innovative solutions related to the planning, development and implementation of eGovernment projects for the improvement of organizational implementation/effectiveness.
Develop and maintain comprehensive, disciplined, and well-defined policies and procedures to facilitate Investment Review Boards (IRB) and CPIC process frameworks for the governance and integration of Departmental-wide IT portfolios, using data artifacts and applying project management and Earned Value Management (EVM) techniques.
Provide comprehensive investment planning and management advice and assistance to support the Department’s Capital Planning and Investment Control (CPIC) Program.
Conduct risk identification and mitigation and in-depth analyses of issues, problems, and proposals that relate to eGovernment projects.
Draft comprehensive reports, briefings, memorandums and issue papers to communicate CIO interest/positions, and inform internal and external stakeholders, e.g. CIO, OMB, DOT IG, OAs and other senior department leaders on Investment Management activities.
Support and coordinate customer and stakeholder outreach, education and training activities. Provides support for business case development for CPIC major and non-major investments. This includes performing alternatives analysis, risk assessments, EVM, operational analysis, or other analyses required to complete and submit a compliant Exhibit 300 business case.
Establish and maintain liaison with officials and groups throughout DOT, other government agencies, and industry in areas related to the OCIO and associated issues, projects and/or plans.
Actively evaluate, review, and develop recommendations on IT budget requests, and implements guidance to support project activities through proven project management techniques, best practices and in-depth analyses.

Ideal Candidate: OCIO is looking for a Program Analyst with a passion for partnering with business stakeholders, and a desire for learning, trying, and developing new ways of thinking. We are seeking an innovative individual with a commitment to open collaboration and teamwork.
Travel Required
Not required
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
0343 Management And Program Analysis
Similar jobs
Analysts, Business Management
Analysts, Management
Analysts, Program
Business Management Analysts
Chief Technology Officers
Management Analysts
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S.Citizen and eligible for consideration.
You must meet specialized experience to qualify.
Required documents must be submitted by the closing date.
Submit application and resume online by 11:59 PM EST on the closing date.
CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT:

SELECTIVE SERVICE: Males born after 12/31/1959 must be registered for the Selective Service.
PROBATIONARY PERIOD: You must complete a one-year probationary period (unless already completed).
TIME-IN-GRADE: Federal applicants must have served 52 weeks at the next lower grade in the competitive or excepted service in the executive branch to satisfy time-in-grade restrictions contained in 5 CFR 300, Subpart F.
DEU REQUIREMENTS: Applicants selected under delegated examining procedures may be required to successfully complete a one-year probationary period (unless already completed).

Qualifications
To meet the minimum qualifications for this position, you must meet the specialized experience qualifications for the grade at which you are requesting consideration.

To qualify for the Grade 14, you must have at least one year of experience equal or equivalent to the GS-13, it must include:

Experience analyzing and conducting qualitative/quantitative analyses of IT investments, Programs or Projects and preparing senior level decision recommendations for a business or organization Investment Review Board (IRB).
Experience equivalent experience leading capital planning and investment control (CPIC) teams and overseeing the management and reporting activities using automated tools or information systems to govern information technology (IT) oversight and lifecycle management of IT resources.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES (KSAs): Your qualifications will be evaluated on the basis of your level of knowledge, skills, abilities and/or competencies in the following areas:

Information Technology Program Management - Knowledge of the principles, methods, and tools for the coordinated management of an IT program to include providing oversight of multiple IT projects, integrating dependent schedules and deliverables, and related activities (for example, benefits management, life cycle management, program governance).
Communication - Expresses information (for example, ideas or facts) to individuals or groups effectively, taking into account the audience and nature of the information (for example, technical, sensitive, controversial); makes clear and convincing oral presentations; listens to others, attends to nonverbal cues, and responds appropriately.

For all types of consideration, experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

For additional information about applying to Federal positions, please click on the following link: https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-policies/#url=e4

Applicants must meet all qualification requirements by the closing date of this announcement.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
This vacancy may be used by any DOT agency to fill similar positions within 90 days.

FLSA: Exempt

BUS Code: 1133

The U.S. Department of Transportation strives to ensure that equity, transparency, accountability, collaboration, and communication permeate all that we do for the betterment of the Department, the traveling public, and our nation. As such, DOT values a highly diverse workforce of persons who promote a culture of belonging by respecting the personal dignity and worth of each individual and fostering a positive environment where all feel safe and welcome. If these commitments coincide with your personal ideals and professional aspirations, please consider joining the DOT family.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
DESCRIBING YOUR EXPERIENCE: PLEASE BE CLEAR AND SPECIFIC. WE WILL NOT MAKE ASSUMPTIONS REGARDING YOUR EXPERIENCE. If your resume/ application does not support your questionnaire answers, we will not allow credit for your response(s). Your resume must contain sufficiently detailed information upon which to make a qualification determination. Please ensure that your resume contains specific information such as position titles, beginning and ending dates of employment for each position, average number of hours worked per week, and if the position is/was in the Federal government, you should provide the position series and grade level.

To compete with U.S. Citizens: If you meet the qualification requirements, your application will be placed in one of four categories: Platinum, Gold, Silver or Bronze, which is based upon your responses to the vacancy questions. Within these categories, applicants eligible for veteran's preference that have provided supporting documents will receive selection priority over non-veterans. The top rated applications will be reviewed for the quality of your experience, education and training relevant to the position.

To compete with other competitive status government employees: If you meet the qualification requirements, your application will be scored based upon your responses to the vacancy questions. The top rated applications will be reviewed for the quality of your experience, education and training relevant to the position. If referred, all relevant documents including performance appraisals and awards submitted with your application package will be forwarded to the hiring official for review.

Eligible Federal employees also seeking consideration for noncompetitive reassignment for this position, must indicate interest in the assessment. In eligibility question 14: select Yes/Other/Former Incumbency of a Position brought into the Competitive Service. Noncompetitive federal candidates must have competitive status on a SF-50, meet minimum qualifications, have served at the same grade or higher, and held or exceeded the promotion potential of this position.

All applicants: Your application will be rated on the extent and quality of your experience, education and training relevant to the position. The answers you select in the on-line process must be substantiated in your application package. If upon review, it is determined that your described work history, competencies, and/or supporting documents do not support your answer choices, your application may be updated on your behalf or you may not be referred to the selecting official. Please ensure that your work history provides enough details to support your answers. The Automated Staffing Office is ultimately responsible for determining your final rating.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Other
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Non-sensitive (NS)/Low Risk
Trust determination process
Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
RESUME - All applicants must provide a resume created within USA Jobs Resume Builder, that shows relevant experience, education and support the required specialized experience. Formatted resumes can by uploaded later in the application process.

TRANSCRIPTS are REQUIRED if there is a stated education requirement for the series OR if you are substituting education for experience. The transcripts need not be official, but must show that you meet the stated education requirements, including specific major or class requirements.

If you have already qualified and worked in the federal service in this series, you may provide an SF-50 in lieu of transcripts.

PERFORMANCE APPRAISALS/INCENTIVE AWARDS: If applicable, performance appraisals and/or Incentive award documentation may be submitted and forwarded to the selecting official in consideration of your application. To receive credit, submit a recent performance appraisal (dated within 18 months) showing the official rating of record, signed by a supervisor, or statement why the performance appraisal is unavailable (do not submit a performance plan) and/or incentive award documentation dated within the last 18 months (i.e. performance awards, special act or achievement awards, quality step increases, etc.).

VETERANS: Your last DD214 (member 4 copy), Certificate of Release or Discharge From Active Duty, that shows the type of discharge and all dates of active duty is required to verify your eligibility.

If applying to a vacancy opened to all US Citizens under category rating and wish to be considered as a preference eligible, you need to submit a copy of your DD214 (member-4 copy).
If claiming preference eligibility as a disabled veteran, you must submit proof of entitlement of this preference which is normally a valid letter from the Department of Veterans Affairs certifying to the present existence of the service-connected disability and indicating the percentage of your disability. An SF-15 is desired, but not required.
If applying to a vacancy opened Status and you are requesting consideration under Veteran's Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA) (https://www.fedshirevets.gov/job/shav/#veoa), you need to provide a copy of your last DD214 (member-4 copy), which verifies your military service dates, reason for separation, OR certification of separation that shows a discharge date within 120 days of the closing of this announcement, and eligibility for consideration under the Veterans Employment Opportunity Act.

FEDERAL APPLICANTS: You must submit SF-50(s) that verify your highest competitive grade, full performance level, and eligibility as a federal applicant. DO NOT submit an award SF-50 as these often do not verify grade or eligibility. For consideration for a promotion, Box 4 of the SF-50 must show a date that is at least 52 weeks prior to the job announcement closing. We recommend submitting your last promotion SF-50, current SF-50 or within-grade increase SF-50. Pay adjustment raise SF-50s for the current year will not support the 52 weeks’ time-in-grade requirements. https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/working-in-government/service/SF-50/

NON COMPETITIVE APPLICANTS: If requesting concurrent consideration for Non-competitive (NC) appointment eligibility, you must provide the appropriate SPECIAL APPOINTING AUTHORITY DOCUMENTS, such as PCS orders (military spouse) describing move & marriage certificate; letter from VA or DD214 describing 100% disability of spouse; letter from State Vocational Office certifying disability (schedule A), etc. For more information, visit military spouse NC appointments or Persons with Disabilities NC appointments.

DISPLACED EMPLOYEES: If requesting consideration under the Career Transition Assistance Program (CTAP) or Interagency CTAP program (ICTAP), you must meet the well qualified standards for this vacancy (meeting minimum requirements for position and scoring at least an 85 or falling in the Gold Category) and provide all of the following documents:

your most recent performance appraisal,
the proof of eligibility letter from the Agency, and
your most current SF-50, displaying current series and grade.

Displaced employees may be eligible for ICTAP or CTAP priority consideration. For more information, please review the OPM Employee's Guide to Career Transition.

Failure to submit any of the required documents by the closing date of the vacancy will result in your removal from consideration for this position. Please review your application prior to final submission and ensure you have submitted all appropriate documents. Uploading documents to USAJobs does NOT ensure inclusion with your application to our system. You must verify that the documents are in the system with your application prior to final submission.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Individuals with disabilities
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Military spouses
Family of overseas employees
Family members of a federal employee or uniformed service member who is, or was, working overseas.
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Open to current and former Federal employees with competitive status, VEOA Applicants, AND All U.S. Citizens.",3804,Washington
53,Senior Principal SAP SuccessFactors Business Analyst,Northrop Grumman,"Washington, DC",None,"Category: Information Technology
Location: Washington, District of Columbia
US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes
Clearance Type: Position of Public Trust
Telecommute: Yes – May Consider Full Time Teleworking for this position
Shift: 1st Shift
Travel Required: Yes, 10 % of the Time
Positions Available: 1

Peraton drives missions of consequence spanning the globe and extending to the farthest reaches of the galaxy. As the world’s leading mission capability integrator and transformative enterprise IT provider, we deliver trusted and highly differentiated national security solutions and technologies that keep people safe and secure. Peraton serves as a valued partner to essential government agencies across the intelligence, space, cyber, defense, civilian, health, and state and local markets. Every day, our 22,000 employees do the can’t be done, solving the most daunting challenges facing our customers. Peraton is seeking a motivated SAP SuccessFactors Business Analyst to join our team of qualified, diverse individuals supporting the Department of Treasury’s Enterprise Business Solutions (EBS) program. The candidate will directly interface with our customer to support their Talent Management Solutions (TMS) team. This position allows for full telework. The candidate will serve as a SuccessFactors Workforce Planning and Succession Planning SME and the primary responsibilities include solution design consulting, configuration management, functional, system administration, testing, and rollout support. Proven past experience with solution design and implementation of the Workforce Planning and Succession Planning modules is required for this position. The candidate will assist in the full lifecycle of deployment and maintenance activities for EBS’s SAP SuccessFactors implementation and will work closely with Federal staff on a daily basis to provide support in the areas of customer relationship management, vendor interaction, and general application performance. The candidate is expected to maintain high levels of customer satisfaction and work effectively with employees, subcontractors, and the Treasury staff in a diverse team environment. Additional responsibilities include:
Leading solution design and discovery sessions with customers
Documenting business requirements, defining system configuration changes, creating change requests (CRs) for new functionality required by EBS’s customers, and reviewing/updating existing configuration and system documentation as needed. The candidate will coordinate system maintenance and trouble tickets with the SAP vendor
Administering Workforce Planning, Succession Planning, and other talent management functions. This task includes creating forms, launching plans, security role management including researching and resolving system issues. The candidate will develop a functional understanding existing data feed integrations with other Treasury applications and will troubleshoot and refine the data integration as necessary
Developing test plans, scenarios, and scripts to validate configuration and other system changes and facilitating User Acceptance Testing (UAT) activities. Additionally, the candidate will identify and mitigate system issues resulting from implementations and change requests
Leading and actively contributing to the software design phases of the software development life cycle
Providing solutions to complex issues; responsible for ensuring the delivered solution meets the technical specifications and design requirements
Participating with team members in prioritization of identified requirements
Managing requirements traceability information and tracking the status of requirements throughout the stages of implementation
Managing the deployment of new configurations, functionality, CRs, etc.

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, Information Systems Management, or related field and 9+ years of relevant work experience; OR Master’s degree and 7+ years of relevant work experience; OR PhD and 4+ years of relevant work experience or 13+ years of relevant work experience in lieu of degree.
5+ years of experience configuring and implementing SAP Workforce Planning and Succession Planning modules. Must have SuccessFactors administration experience.
Strong working knowledge of SAP SuccessFactors HCM modules.
Must be capable of independently managing time and multiple tasks with minimal guidance.
Must be proficient in the use of Microsoft Word, Excel, and PowerPoint applications.
Must be available to provide scheduled and ad hoc evening and weekend support.
Must be a US Citizen and be must be able to obtain a Position of Trust designation.
Preferred Qualifications:
Strong working knowledge of SAP SuccessFactors HCM modules.
Working knowledge of the SuccessFactors Career Development Planning module.
Knowledge of Federal Human Resources policies and regulations.
Experience implementing SuccessFactors in government agency environments
SuccessFactors certification(s).
Experience working within an agile framework.
We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, marital status, veteran status, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or membership in any other group protected by federal, state, or local law.",3804,Washington
54,Senior Mission Analyst,HawkEye360,"Herndon, VA 20170",None,"Company Description:
HawkEye 360 is delivering a revolutionary source of global knowledge based on radio frequency (RF) geospatial intelligence to those working to make the world a safer place. The company operates the first-of-its-kind commercial satellite constellation to detect, characterize, and geolocate a broad range of RF signals. This unique RF data and analytics equip our global customers with high-impact insights needed to make decisions with confidence. HawkEye 360 is headquartered in Herndon, Virginia.

Build the world's first RF-Derived Geospatial Analytics Firm

HawkEye 360 is seeking a Senior Mission Analyst to join an innovative team in a quickly growing startup. We need a talented individual to serve our domestic and international customers by performing mission-focused data analysis duties on a variety of programs. This hands-on role will support one or more customer organizations by applying our unique data to customer intelligence problems for demonstrations, contract deliverables, reports, and internal technical development. The Mission Analyst also supports development of new capabilities in response to current and anticipated future contract requirements by providing feedback to the Product, Engineering, and Mission Management teams.

We'll Expect You To…


Analyze HawkEye and 3rd-party data to produce customer-facing vignettes, presentations, and reports
Rapidly apply available tools and datasets to meet the needs of emerging customer intelligence requirements
Prioritize across competing tasks from multiple different projects or programs, each with unique needs and deadlines
Provide internal training to HawkEye personnel on data analysis, and help develop training for customers external to the organization
Provide ad-hoc short-term embed support to domestic or international customers on a periodic basis

You'll Need to Have…


5-10 years intelligence analysis experience
Bachelor's or Master's degree in Engineering, Computer Science, International Affairs, Intelligence, or another related discipline or equivalent experience
Experience analyzing geospatial, open-source, or other types of quantitative and qualitative data
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Lots of initiative, and the ability to learn quickly and seek help when needed

We'd Like to See…


Service as a military or civilian intelligence analyst
Experience with GIS tools and analysis
Experience writing/generating finished intelligence products
Experience working with International or US Government customers

Security Clearance


TS/SCI required

Cultural Fit…


Ability to work in a small and fast-paced environment.
Ability to work well with all levels of company disciplines (i.e. Legal, HR, etc.)
Sense of humor and ability to proactively problem solve.
Great customer relationship skills.

HawkEye 360, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer that does not discriminate on the basis of actual or perceived race, creed, color, religion, alienage or national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, age, disability or handicap, sex, marital status, veteran status, sexual orientation, arrest record or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws.",3804,Washington
55,Africa All-Source Intelligence Analyst - Senior (TS/SCI req'd),Streamline Defense,"Washington, DC 20340",None,"TITLE: Africa All-Source Intelligence Analyst - Senior
LOCATION: Joint Base Anacostia-Bolling (JBAB), Washington, D.C.
OVERVIEW
Streamline Defense is seeking an exceptionally-qualified candidate to serve as an All-Source Intelligence Analyst at the Senior-level in support of the Defense Intelligence Agency (DIA) on Joint Base Anacostia-Bolling (JBAB) in Washington, D.C. The All-Source Intelligence Analyst will focus on political-military issues regarding various areas of responsibilities (AORs), producing strategic intelligence assessments conveying options regarding the impact to DoD equities within these region.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Responsible for all-source intelligence analysis to produce intelligence assessments and briefings for the customer for executive level audiences.
Present findings to leadership and senior executives in attendance of internal/external meetings with the ability to explain complex information.
Draft presentations and supporting documentation (as needed).
Coordinates and interacts with analysts from service, component, DoD, and national-level intelligence agencies.
Analyze and assess intelligence against a wide scope of data sources.
Gather, interpret, and compare data to produce reports and establish conclusions.
Deliver analysis and make policy recommendations based on research.
Develop concepts of operations for processing and analytical initiatives.

REQUIREMENTS
TS/SCI security clearance is required; willingness to take a polygraph exam
MA/MS degree and over 10 years of experience, or BA/BS and over 18 years of experience intelligence analysis supporting the IC or U.S. military.
10+ years of operational experience with intelligence analysis, US government all-source analytic production, or specialized intelligence analysis training.
Demonstrated experience in conducting analysis of foreign military capabilities in a dynamic environment and developing / producing associated analytics products.
Knowledge of US IC and Combatant Command environments.
Ability to develop high-quality deliverables tailored to clients who range from tactical to strategic levels, including actionable leads, complex written products, and formal or informal briefings.
Knowledge of ICD 203 analytic tradecraft standards.

About Streamline

Streamline is a professional and technical solutions company focused on the U.S. Defense, Intelligence, and Special Operations communities. Our talented team of analyst, engineers, and military professionals support our clients most demanding missions. We offer an unmatched opportunity to grow and learn in an exciting and entrepreneurial environment. Highly motivated individuals will find a culture that values their individual input and compensates them well for their efforts.
Streamline Defense is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other protected class.",3804,Washington
56,Military Analyst,Central Intelligence Agency,"Washington, DC 20505 (Foggy Bottom area)","$58,070 - $159,286 a year","Military Analysts provide U.S. policymakers and military leaders analysis and briefings on foreign military forces, their structure, capabilities, doctrine, and tactics.

Full time
Starting salary: $58,070 - $159,286
Bachelor’s or master’s degree
Foreign language bonus eligible

About the Job

As a Military Analyst at CIA, you’ll provide U.S. policymakers with analysis of foreign military forces, their structure, capabilities, doctrine, and tactics. Analysts frequently provide briefings and written analysis to senior military leaders. You’ll work closely with other CIA analysts and Intelligence Community members to produce timely and accurate all-source analysis.

Opportunities exist for foreign and domestic travel, language training, analytic and management training and assignments to other offices in the Agency and throughout the US Government.

Who You’ll Work With

At the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA), we recognize our Nation’s strength comes from the diversity of its people. People from a broad range of backgrounds and viewpoints work at CIA, and our diverse teams are the reason we can keep our country safe.

Read more about diversity and inclusion

What You’ll Get

Our benefits support every aspect of a working professional’s life, including health and wellness, time off, family, finances, and continuing education. Our programs include highly sought-after government health benefits, flexible schedules, sick leave, and childcare. In some cases, we also offer sign-on incentives and cover moving expenses if you relocate.

As a CIA employee, you’ll also get the satisfaction of knowing your work is part of something bigger than yourself. Our work is driven by one mission: to keep our Nation safe. Every day is an opportunity to enhance U.S. national security.

Learn more about working at CIA

Minimum Qualifications

Bachelor’s or master’s degree in one of the following fields:
History
International Relations
Political Science
War Studies
At least a 3.0 GPA on a 4-point scale preferred
Strong critical thinking and problem-solving skills
Ability to meet the minimum requirements for joining CIA, including U.S. citizenship and a background investigation
Desired Qualifications
Interest in international affairs
Awareness of U.S. national security interests
Foreign language capability
Strong verbal presentation skills
Demonstrated ability to write clear, concise text
Research experience in international affairs
Ability to work in a team environment
Interest in a career that requires regular writing assignments
Previous military experience as a Military Analyst or Foreign Area Specialist/Officer (FAO)
Experience in order of battle – database development
Interest in military history
What You’ll Need to Apply
Resume
Unofficial transcripts for all degrees
A cover letter specifying your qualifications for one or more analytic positions. Please address why you want to work as an analyst and what differentiates you from other applicants.
Two (2) different writing samples, three to five pages (3-5) each, single-spaced PDF. Submit papers that showcase your writing style, research abilities and critical thinking skills. Subject matter should focus on your current areas of expertise that relate to your interest in positions at the CIA. You can excerpt longer papers.",3804,Washington
57,Intelligence Production Analyst- Department of Homeland Security,J.G. Management Systems,"Silver Spring, MD","$130,000 - $135,000 a year","Title

Job Location
Total Working Hours
Full Time
Part Time (Flexible)

Exemption Status
Non-Exempt
Exempt

Traveling required
Not required
Occasionally
Permanent

Ethically minded, mission driven.

At JGMS Government Services, LLC. (JGMS-GS) we provide applied technology, engineering, science, and management services to government and private sector clients nationwide. As a diverse team of professionals, we are focused on meeting the needs of our clients and following through with real solutions that effectively and efficiently meet all budgetary and scheduling requirements.

As a member of the JGMS-GS team, you will be involved in a growing, dynamic organization that is developing new client solutions to benefit our environment and economy.

We take pride in promoting a healthy work-life balance, family-friendly benefits, servant leadership, team values, and professional growth. Our competitive benefit package includes a 401K Plan with Company Match, Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance, Paid Time Off, Paid Community Service Hours, 10 Paid Holidays, Life Insurance-, Short- and Long-Term Disability, Supplemental Insurance, Employee Assistance Plan [EAP], and Professional Growth and Development.

Compensation Range: $130,000 - $135,000

This position is a full-time role and due to COVID-19 Restrictions, will be remote.

About the Job

The Intelligence Production Analyst serves as the GIS and GEOINT specialist within a small team of JGMS subject matter experts supporting the Strategic Intelligence Branch at the DHS Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (DHS CWMD) in Washington DC.

The Analyst will be responsible for building geospatial products that convey the geographic dimensions of known WMD threats; pathways to, from, and within the Homeland; and systems or infrastructures that could be targeted as part of a WMD attack in the Homeland. Some products will be tailored for wide dissemination to law enforcement personnel via the National Network of Fusion Centers, while others will be designed to provide a complete classified picture of WMD threats to DHS’ senior-most decision makers including the Assistant Secretary for CWMD, the Secretary of Homeland Security, and the heads of DHS components.

The Analyst will also independently research and build geospatial data layers to support long-term analysis, using a wide variety of classified and unclassified sources. When reliable data is unavailable, the GIS Analyst will work directly with DHS and national collection managers to create new GEOINT collection requirements.

Finished GIS products may include imagery, mapping, and text and the GIS Analyst will be expected to be comfortable with developing well-structured written intelligence analysis, and in assisting peers in developing and reviewing their draft products.

The Analyst will be expected to build a network of relationships with other GEOINT experts across DHS and the Intelligence Community.

The successful candidate will have substantial experience in working with ESRI ArcGIS, as well as a good knowledge of the GEOINT cycle and experience in producing finished GEOINT products in accordance with Intelligence Community standards including ICD 203/206.

Requirements

The Intelligence Production Analyst shall be able to:

Conduct intelligence analysis on topics of long-term concern to Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction (CWMD) programs.
Apply structured analytic techniques to better characterize implications of intelligence reporting, explore the range of possible consequences where the base of known incidents is small, and support key judgments with repeatable results
Develop the results of this analysis into finished intelligence products at both TOP SECRET and SECRET level, with evidence and judgments clearly delineated in accordance with Intelligence Community Directive (ICD) 203, sources annotated in accordance with ICD 206, and all portions marked in accordance with current National Archives Information Security Oversight Office (ISOO) and DNI Controlled Access Program Office (CAPCO) guidance
After obtaining review and clearance of the finished products, arrange for publication and dissemination per DHS Intelligence Enterprise practice
Highlight intelligence gaps and submit collection requirements
Collaborate in expert working groups on topics related to CWMD intelligence • Process appropriate intelligence reports into DHS and IC databases to support long-term retrieval and display
Apply computer-based tools to perform intelligence fusion, determine patterns of interest, and to support DHS operations
Respond to incoming Requests For Information (RFI) from across the DHS Intelligence Enterprise
Assign classification markings to image and map products.
Perform spatial/temporal analysis.

To be considered further, you must have:
ESRI Arc/GIS experience
Proven Analytical Writing Skills

Education – Master’s degree with up to 15 years’ experience or Bachelor’s with up to 25 years’ of experience or equivalency of combined experience and education will be considered.

Security – Possess or be eligible to receive a security clearance of SECRET, TOP SECRET, DOE L OR Q.

Certification Requirement – Must have a current SSBI and be eligible to begin indoctrination into their SCI program upon entry on duty.

Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO)

JGMS-GS is dedicated to the principles of equal opportunity (EEO) in any term, condition, or privilege of employment. The Company prohibits unlawful discrimination against applicant or employees on the basis of age (40 and over), race, color, religion, national origin, disability, genetic information, sexual identity, sexual orientation, pregnancy, veteran status, or any other status protected by federal, state or local laws.

This policy applies to all applicants, employees, including manager, supervisors, co-workers and non-employees such as customers, clients, vendors, consultants, or any other entity in professional contact with the Company.",3804,Washington
58,Research Analyst,"Competitive Innovations, LLC","Washington, DC",None,"Competitive Innovations, LLC (CI) is seeking a Research Analyst to support the U.S. Department of State, Bureau of Democracy, Human Rights, and Labor (DRL), Office of Multilateral and Global Affairs (MLGA). The position provides advice, guidance, research, and written materials related to issues pertaining to Internet freedom, data privacy and cross-border data flows, content moderation, business and human rights, and other similar issue of concern to the DRL/MLGA office. This is a full-time position located in Washington, D.C.


Responsibilities:
Support the MLGA Multilateral Team in tracking initiatives and policy developments related to implementation of the Global Magnitsky sanctions program, as well as human rights-related visa ineligibilities (including under the INA, 7031(c), Presidential Proclamations, and USC 1182(e)) within the Department of State and with interagency partners and external non-governmental organization (NGO) interlocutors. Raise awareness about these authorities through engagement with other Department offices, embassies abroad, the interagency, civil society, and the Hill. Advise on opportunities to expand the use of these authorities and adopt/institute innovative practices. Draft related Congressionally-mandated periodic reports.
Monitor political, economic, security and other developments in assigned geographic areas of responsibility, particularly with an eye on the impact on human rights in the region and in particular countries of concern, including through classified and unclassified reporting channels, media sources, and NGOs. Conduct outreach and liaison work with relevant geographic bureaus and DRL regional desks, the Bureau of International Organizations (IO), the Office of the Legal Advisor, and others.
Develop cases – including by undertaking research (on open source and classified systems), preparing reports and analyses, and providing advice – regarding the actions of foreign government officials and others who may be involved in or responsible for the commission of human rights abuses, for use by FTE officers in making policy determinations regarding Global Magnitsky nominations and statutory visa ineligibilities.
Analyze human rights-related developments in assigned countries/regions, particularly as those developments are addressed within the HRC, and inform FTE officers of the implications of such developments.
Draft and edit written products related to the state of human rights in assigned countries/regions, particularly as those developments are addressed within the HRC, and provide periodic briefings to senior Department officials.


Minimum Qualifications:
Secret Level Security Clearance
Bachelor’s degree in a related field
Minimum two years of experience
Demonstrated competence in analyzing and synthesizing large amounts of information into coherent and cogent materials
Superior research, writing, and briefing skills
Experience in U.S. human rights policies
Qualified candidates that are HUBZone residents, preferred (check your status here: https://maps.certify.sba.gov/hubzone/map#center=39.828200,-98.579500&zoom=5)",3804,Washington
59,Associate Model Validation analyst,RiskSpan,"Arlington, VA 22209 (Radnor-Ft Myer Heights area)",None,"About The RoleRiskSpan is seeking a model risk management professional with a degree in mathematics, economics, finance or statistics to perform model validation (SR 11-7, OCC 2011-12) projects for external clients. This role will validate a lot of different quantitative and qualitative models used throughout the financial industry. This will provide exposure and experience to all types of models, systems and processes currently in use.About RiskSpanRiskSpan is a leading source of analytics, modeling, data and risk management solutions for the Consumer and Institutional Finance industries. We solve business problems for clients such as banks, mortgage-backed and asset-backed securities issuers, equity and fixed-income portfolio managers, servicers, and regulators that require our expertise in the market risk, credit risk, operational risk and information technology domains.Primary Responsibilities:Execute and support client-facing model validation engagements.Devise effective challenges for modeling assumptions, inputs, conceptual soundness and theory, developmental evidence, implementation and outputs.Perform statistical analyses and devise benchmarking and back-testing schemes for internal and client models.Identify and quantify model risk.Prepare model validation reports and related, supporting technical documents.Qualifications: Excellent written and verbal communication skills with a focus on detailed, concise and clear technical writing.Degree in Statistics, Economics, Finance, Physics, Math, or Engineering required. Advanced degree preferred but not required.0 - 2 years of experience performing quantitative analysis in the financial services industry preferred but not required.Skilled ""hands-on"" user of SAS, R, MATLAB, SQL, and/or other statistically programming language required.Ability to thrive on multiple projects/tasks at one time. Must be detail-oriented and enjoy aspects of statistics, finance analytics and report writing.RiskSpan is proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer committed to hiring a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture. Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to be employed in the United States on an unrestricted basis.Job Type: Full-time",3804,Washington
60,Regulatory Impact Analyst,US Environmental Protection Agency,"Washington, DC","$122,530 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is in the Office of the Administrator, Office of Policy, Office of Regulatory Policy and Management, Policy and Regulatory Analysis Division.

If selected, you must work at the location stated in this announcement.

About: The Office of the Administrator

Responsibilities
You will:
Monitor key Agency regulatory program components to advise and make recommendations to the Division Director regarding regulation and policy options.
Participate on work groups to collaborate with managers, other programs and core office staff to assist in developing Agency wide regulations and policies.
Analyze applicable Agency policy, federal regulations, and program guidance to identify, address, and prioritize important policy issues.
Provide guidance to Agency senior management by presenting alternative approaches based on increased flexibility, efficiency and effectiveness to influence policy decisions.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
If you are selected, a pre-employment background check is required.
You may be required to travel less 25% of each month.
You must submit a resume and required documents-see How to Apply section.
You must be a U.S. citizen.
If you are selected, you may be required to complete a one-year probationary period.

This position is designated as Moderate Risk and requires a background investigation. Unless an appropriate background investigation is already on record with the Office of Personnel Management, you must undergo a background investigation. All conditions of the pre-employment security process must be met before an official letter of employment can be issued with a report for duty date.
Qualifications
We are looking for at least one year of specialized experience related to this position as described below:

To qualify for the GS-14 level, you need to have at least one full year of experience at the GS-13 level defined as analyzing scientific, economic, and/or environmental data to identify and recommend alternative options; collaborating with stakeholders on the development of regulations and/or policies; and developing data reports and briefing materials to convey policy options to varying levels of management.

Your answers to the online assessment will be used to evaluate your competencies in the following areas: 1) Skill in applying environmental public policy, regulations and guidelines; 2) Knowledge of regulatory programs; 3) Skill in interpreting broad environmental policies, guidance and regulations; 4) Skill in problem solving techniques related to environmental policy; 5) Skill in developing analytical studies to identify program policy issues; 6) Skill in making policy recommendations to senior management; 7) Skill in oral communication; 8) Skill in written communication.

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional, philanthropic, religious, spiritual, community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

If you have part-time work experience, read this: EPA Announcement Policies and Procedures.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
This position is in the bargaining unit.

Are you a Displaced Federal Employee? If so, please read the Required Documents section and visit the EPA website for additional information: EPA Announcement Policies and Procedures

EPA participates in E-Verify. E-Verify is an Internet based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) in partnership with the Social Security Administration (SSA) that enables participating employers to electronically verify the employment eligibility of their newly hired employees. For additional information: EPA Announcement Policies and Procedures.

If you are selected, travel, transportation, and relocation expenses will not be paid by EPA. Any travel, transportation, and relocation expenses associated with reporting to work in this position will be your responsibility.

Except in special circumstances, those new to the federal government will be hired at the starting salary (step 1) of the applicable grade range listed above.

This position has portable work. If selected for this position, you may be authorized to telework after meeting eligibility requirements if approved by the supervisor/manager. Telework is available based on agency policy and/or applicable collective bargaining agreement which may not allow for full-time telework. NOTE: The agency is currently utilizing maximum telework flexibilities due to COVID. Once normal operations resume, you will be required to report to the location stated in this announcement.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
We will review your resume and required documents to ensure you meet the basic qualification requirements. Your resume must address the knowledge, skills, and abilities listed in the Qualifications section. If you meet basic qualification requirements, your application will be further evaluated based on your answers to the online assessment. Your responses to the online assessment will be used to measure the degree to which your background matches the requirements for the position. You are being evaluated under the category rating method which means, if you are determined to be qualified, you will be placed into the ‘Best Qualified’, ‘Well Qualified’, or ‘Qualified’ category.

We will compare your resume and supporting documentation to your responses on the assessment questionnaire. If you rate yourself higher than is supported by your application materials, your responses may be adjusted and/or you may be excluded from consideration for this job. We will evaluate your qualifications and eligibility and notify you if you meet minimum qualification requirements. If you are referred for consideration, you may be subject to additional assessments.

NOTE: We do not require a separate statement responding to the competencies, also referred to as Knowledges, Skills, and Abilities (KSAs). However, your resume should clearly show possession of these competencies.

To preview questions please click here.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Required Documents

Required Documents
Documents to be submitted online:

NOTE: You should ensure your social security number, date of birth, and any other personal information are redacted.
-Resume clearly stating your experience related to this position as described in the Duties section and Qualifications section. In describing your experience, you need to be clear and specific. We may not make assumptions regarding your experience.
-Responses to the online assessment questionnaire (you must complete this online - it is not a document you need to upload).
-Veterans' Preference Documents:
Separated veterans claiming 5-point preference:
DD-214 Member 4 copy (or other copy indicating character of service) or other official document/statement from the Armed Forces showing separation, discharge, or release from active duty; document must show separation is under honorable conditions (Honorable or General Discharge)
Separated veterans claiming 10-point preference based on compensable service-connected disability of 10% or more:
DD-214 Member 4 copy (or other copy indicating character of service); document must show separation is under honorable conditions (Honorable or General Discharge); and
VA letter stating overall/combined disability rating (percentage); and
SF-15 (use current version: SF-15 Form) (see page 2 for documents that can be submitted in lieu of the DD-214 and VA letter)
Other separated veterans claiming 10-point preference OR spouses, widows/widowers, or mothers claiming 10-point derived preference:
SF-15 (use current version: SF-15 Form); and
Other required documentation indicated on the SF-15
Active duty service members:
Certification from the armed forces documenting active duty dates, expected discharge/release date, campaign medals/badges, and character of service (a certification is any written document from the armed forces that certifies you are expected to be discharged/released from active duty service in the armed forces under honorable conditions (Honorable or General Discharge) within 120 days after you submit the certification)
-Displaced Federal employees under ICTAP/CTAP: copy of your most recent performance appraisal, proof of eligibility, and your most current SF-50 noting position, grade level, tenure, and duty station.
To learn more about submitting documentation, visit Uploading Documents to USAJOBS.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Join EPA in protecting human health and the environment and enjoy many work life quality options! Working for the EPA offers you a comprehensive benefits package that includes, in part, paid vacation, sick leave, holidays, life insurance, health benefits, and participation in the Federal Employees Retirement System. To learn more about us, visit Life and Careers at EPA.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
U. S. Citizens",3804,Washington
61,Senior Business Analyst - Department of Labor,AMSG,"Washington, DC",None,"AMSG has a Contingent need for a Senior Business Analyst to support an opportunity with the Dept of Labor

Background

The U.S. Department of Labor (DOL) Office of the Chief Information Officer (OCIO)'s mission is to provide, through a dedicated mindset, information solutions and leadership to advance the DOL mission that is to foster, promote, and develop the welfare of the wage earners, job seekers, and retirees of the United States; improve working conditions; advance opportunities for profitable employment; and assure work-related benefits and rights.

To carry out this mission, DOL leadership identified a Management Goal in the Department's 2018-2022 Strategic Plan: Optimize the Department of Labor's Enterprise Services' Opportunities. A specific focus of the Management Goal was to develop enterprise-wide shared services for human resources (HR), information technology (IT), and procurement services. Personnel security was added to the initiative due to the interrelationship with current HR and procurement practitioners and the operational need to ensure a single authoritative source for all administrative support functions. The purpose of this initiative is to transition these administrative services to their respective central authority to improve the quality, consistency, and customer service delivery, thereby allowing the agencies to focus on mission. At this point, OCIO has therefore inherited nearly all agencies' IT systems, IT applications, and IT personnel.

OCIO's vision is to provide premier technology solutions – best in federal service – that empower the DOL mission and serve the American public through collaboration and innovation. In order to achieve this desired position, OCIO has refocused its IT strategy to foster increased transparency and collaboration to support the Department's enterprise-wide shared services initiative. OCIO is therefore responsible for the technical planning, design, development, integration, testing, staging, delivery, management, and maintenance of all IT solution services supporting various internal agency programs.

Scope

The candidate will guide the management consulting activities alongside the project/program manager, technical staff, and federal clients for IT strategy and governance support services. Duties may include high-level analysis and support related to statutory requirements and compliance, agency mission, strategic goals, business process reengineering, implementation plans, and/or integration of IT portfolio processes to other procedures and disciplines. Minimum of seven (7) years of experience providing internal/external consulting services to management and technical staff in managing Capital Planning, Enterprise Architecture, OMB reporting requirements and solving complex IT portfolio management issues in accordance with federal laws, regulations and procedures. Must have exceptional verbal and written communication skills, and leadership skills.

Qualifications


7+ years of experience in Capital Planning and Investment Control support for large complex federal government IT projects.
10+ years professional experience.
Prepare and complete OMB Major and Standard Investment Business Cases, develop investment artifacts and data call preparation.
Define and implement best practice governance processes; analyze and document current processes and workflows against target states to develop achievable implementation paths including stakeholders, tasks, and schedules.
Resolve problems, support program audits, identify trends, determine system improvements, recommend, and implement changes.
Provide support for the monthly, quarterly, and annual reporting and data call activity related to Investment Management.
Solid understanding of the federal Capital Planning process, OMB report requirements, and reporting cycles
Experience with the development and submission on OMB Major and Standard Investment business cases and cost benefits analysis for federal programs
Ability to support a team and apply advanced, comprehensive knowledge of methodologies, principals, and practices related to logistics, business, or financial management disciplines.
Ability to review complex organizational budget data, plan and forecast requirements; analyze budget variances, recommend, and initiate corrective actions.
Responsible for ensuring compliance with technological standards throughout the project.
Operates with considerable latitude for actions and decisions.
May serve as a prime point of contact with the client. May be called upon to deliver presentations, plan tasks, and coordinate resources and budgets.
Proficient in MS Office Suite of Applications (Word, PowerPoint, Outlook, Excel).
Advanced skills in MS Excel and MS Access such as pivot tables, macros, SQL, formats, filters, connecting to databases, etc.

",3804,Washington
62,Senior Data Analyst,US Federal Trade Commission,"Washington, DC","$103,690 - $159,286 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in the Division of Consumer Response and Operations (DCRO) in the Bureau of Consumer Protection (BCP) at the Federal Trade Commission (FTC) in Washington, D.C. BCP, through its consumer protection work in seven divisions and eight FTC regional offices, carries out the Commission's mandate to protect the American public from unfair and deceptive acts and practices in commerce.
Responsibilities
If selected for this position, you will provide intelligence to both FTC and external law enforcement authorities concerning consumer complaints, law enforcement actions and other data maintained by the FTC. As part of your responsibilities, you will support the Consumer Sentinel Network (CSN). Consumer Sentinel is a secure Internet web site available to law enforcement authorities throughout the United States and Canada. It includes a searchable data bank of consumer complaints received by the FTC and external data contributors, as well as a host of other information concerning telemarketing, unsolicited commercial email and identity theft.

To support this program, you will perform the following duties:

Develop methods to extract data from CSN or from data obtained during the course of investigations and to transmit this information to the appropriate internal and external users, including FTC management and staff at all levels as well as external parties including members of Congress, other government agencies, FOIA requesters and media outlets.Leverage analytics and visualization tools (Tableau) to present information in a way that drives fact based decision-making.Develop new analytical reports and represent large, complex sets of data through visual representation.Automate and optimize data extraction, cleaning, processing and analysis functions.
- Query and mine large data sets, including text data, to discover patterns, using traditional or advanced techniques such as machine learning.- Regularly use various relational databases, SQL Server, MYSQL, etc to query databases.
Use python (pandas, numpy), R or other programing languages to analyze large datasets of structured or unstructured data.Energetically work with teams to create data products for a wide-range of stakeholders.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
14
Job family (Series)
0301 Miscellaneous Administration And Program
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
U.S. citizenship requirement must be met by the closing date of this vacancy.
Position is subject to a background investigation.
Males born after December 31, 1959 must register with Selective Service.
You may serve a one-year probationary period under this appointment.
R?sum? and supporting documents (See How To Apply).
This position is in the bargaining unit.
Qualifications
To qualify for a Senior Data Analyst at the GS-13 level, you must meet the following requirements:

Applicants must have (1) year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-12 level using data analysis tools (sql, python, R, etc) to build and execute data queries against databases with large volumes of data, extract and wrangle large datasets (over 1,000,000 records) and present results to internal audiences or external audiences, and a solid understanding of data science fundamentals.

To qualify for a Senior Data Analyst at the GS-14 level, you must meet the following requirements:

Applicants must have (1) year of specialized experience equivalent to the GS-13 level using data analysis tools (sql, python, R, etc) to build and execute data queries against databases with large volumes of data, extract and wrangle large datasets (over 1,000,000 records) and present results to internal audiences or external audiences, and a solid understanding of data science fundamentals, managing large data related projects from start through completion, and/ or planning, development, execution and maintenance of all project aspects.



Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.
Education
This position does not have an education requirement.
Additional information
If you are a veteran with preference eligibility and are claiming 5-points veterans' preference, you must submit a copy of your DD-214 or other proof of eligibility. If you are claiming 10-point veterans' preference, you must also submit an SF-15, ""Application for 10-Point Veterans' Preference"" plus the proof required by that form. For more information on veterans' preference visit: VETERANS GUIDE


Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered or exempt from Selective Service (see SELECTIVE SERVICE).


Career Transition Assistance Programs: These programs apply to employees who have been involuntarily separated from a Federal service position within the competitive service or Federal service employees whose positions have been deemed surplus or no longer needed. To receive selection priority for this position, you must: (1) meet CTAP or ICTAP eligibility criteria; (2) be rated well-qualified for the position with a score of 87 or above; and, (3) submit the appropriate documentation to support your CTAP or ICTAP eligibility. For more information visit: CAREER TRANSITION.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
Once the announcement has closed, a review of your résumé and supporting documentation will be used to determine whether you meet the qualification requirements listed on this announcement. If you are minimally qualified, your résumé and supporting documentation will be compared against your responses to the assessment questionnaire to determine your level of experience. If, after reviewing your résumé and/or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your qualifications and/or experience, you may lose consideration for this position. Please follow all instructions carefully when applying, errors or omissions may affect your eligibility.

All qualified candidates will be assigned to a quality category.


Best-Qualified: Applicants possessing experience that substantially exceeds the minimum qualifications of the position and demonstrate high proficiency in all of the critical competencies.

Well-Qualified: Applicants possessing experience that exceeds the minimum qualifications of the position and demonstrates acceptable proficiency in all of the critical competencies.

Qualified: Applicants possessing experience that meets the minimum qualifications of the position and demonstrate basic proficiency in most of the critical competencies.

Veterans: Qualified veterans who have a compensable service-connected disability of at least 10% are listed in the best-qualified category, except when the position being filled is scientific or professional at the GS-09 grade level, or higher. Other 10-point preference eligibles and veterans with 5-point preference who meet the eligibility and qualification requirements are placed above non-preference eligibles within the category in which they qualify. View information on veterans' preference.

The category assignment is a measure of the degree in which your background matches the competencies required for this position. Your qualifications will be evaluated on the following competencies (knowledge, skills, abilities and other characteristics):

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Moderate Risk (MR)
Trust determination process
Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
To apply for this position, you must submit a complete Application Package which includes:

1. Your résumé showing work schedule, hours worked per week, dates of employment and duties performed.

2. Other supporting documents:

Cover Letter, optional

College Transcript(s), if qualifying based on education

Veterans' Preference documentation, if applicable (e.g., DD-214 Member Copy 4 showing type of discharge/character of service, SF-15 Form and related documentation, VA letter, etc.)

Career Transition Assistance Program/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program documentation, if applicable (e.g., Certification of Expected Separation, Reduction-In-Force Separation Notice, or Notice of Proposed Removal; SF-50 that documents the RIF separation action; and most recent performance appraisal.)

If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Individuals with disabilities
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
All U.S. Citizens",3804,Washington
63,"Senior Analyst, Facility Operations",Sony Corporation of America,"Herndon, VA",None,"Sony Corporation of America , located in New York, NY, is the U.S. headquarters of Sony Group Corporation, based in Tokyo, Japan. Sony's principal U.S. businesses include Sony Electronics Inc., Sony Interactive Entertainment LLC, Sony Music Entertainment, Sony Music Publishing and Sony Pictures Entertainment Inc. With some 900 million Sony devices in hands and homes worldwide today, a vast array of Sony movies, television shows and music, and the PlayStation Network, Sony creates and delivers more entertainment experiences to more people than anyone else on earth. To learn more: www.sony.com/en .

Sony Corporation of America (SCA), is seeking a Senior Analyst, Facility Operations to join the Global Information Security Department organization in Herndon, Va. This position will report to the Vice President and General Manager of Operations and is responsible for overseeing facilities, reception, and security functions; logistics and site requirements planning; establishing office process and protocols; and organizing employee events as a key part of the Global Information Security Department (GISD).

Responsibilities:
Oversee the office management functions to include, the office manager, reception and security operations
Coordinate and manage project tasks to ensure project delivery within allotted budget and timelines.
Develop facility requirements and plans to support the workforce
Manage site COVID protocols and ensure adherence
Assist with site support vendor management
Maintain business continuity plans
Provide support for audio/visual (A/V) equipment to support meetings and conferences
Communicate workplace safety precautions to employees, as needed
Coordinate and assist with in-office logistics including, A/V and catering needs for large meetings and events
Plan and organize Volunteer Day and annual Holiday Party activities
Handle logistics for offsite events (conference space and hotel negotiations, etc.)
Perform other duties as assigned
Qualifications:
3-5 years’ experience as in facility management or front office management
Knowledge of general operational requirements. safety precautions related to facilities management
Ability to develop plans and procedures with limited oversight
Experience with event planning
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to prioritize multiple tasks and formulate responses/recommendations to customers and team members
Sound problem resolution, judgment, negotiating and decision-making skills
Strong work ethic and commitment to accomplish assigned tasks
All candidates must be authorized to work in the USA
Sony is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religious creed, sex (including pregnancy), gender, national origin, citizenship, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, military status, status as a veteran or disabled veteran, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital or family status, genetic information, medical condition, or any other basis protected by applicable federal, state, or local law, ordinance, or regulation.
Disability Accommodation for Applicants to Sony Corporation of America
Sony Corporation of America provides reasonable accommodation for qualified individuals with disabilities and disabled veterans in job application procedures. For reasonable accommodation requests, please contact us by email at careers@sonyusa.com or by mail to: Sony Corporation of America, Human Resources Department, 25 Madison Avenue, New York, NY 10010. Please indicate the position you are applying for.
EEO is the Law
EEO is the Law Supplement
Right to Work (English/Spanish)
E-Verify Participation (English/Spanish)",3804,Washington
64,Senior Information Security Analyst -- Risk and Controls,Mathematica Policy Research,"Washington, DC 20024 (Southwest Federal Center area)","$80,000 - $125,000 a year","Position Description:


Mathematica applies expertise at the intersection of data, methods, policy, and practice to improve well-being around the world. We collaborate closely with public- and private-sector partners to translate big questions into deep insights that improve programs, refine strategies, and enhance understanding. Our work yields actionable information to guide decisions in wide-ranging policy areas, from health, education, early childhood, and family support to nutrition, employment, disability, and international development. Mathematica offers our employees competitive salaries, and a comprehensive benefits package, as well as the advantages of being 100 percent employee owned. As an employee stock owner, you will experience financial benefits of ESOP holdings that have increased in tandem with the company’s growth and financial strength. You will also be part of an independent, employee-owned firm that is able to define and further our mission, enhance our quality and accountability, and steadily grow our financial strength. Learn more about our benefits here: https://www.mathematica.org/career-opportunities/benefits-at-a-glance


We are looking for a Senior Information Security Analyst – Risk and Controls to join our IT Security, Risk and Compliance group in either our Princeton, NJ headquarters or our Washington, DC office. This position will be remote until our offices reopen. The Analyst will contribute to the success of Mathematica’s security strategy through continuous improvement of Mathematica’s information security program, leading information and technology audit activity across the enterprise, leading process documentation, mapping controls to processes, and effectively communicating risk posture to the enterprise. The Risk and Controls Lead will provide technical expertise and advice on IT control implementation. The ideal candidate has and can maintain expertise with on-premises and cloud system security industry standards and will champion the adoption of tools and procedures that promote security monitoring and information and technology risk management.
At Mathematica, we take pride in our commitment to diversity. Building an inclusive culture that draws on the individual strengths of employees from different ethnic backgrounds, cultures, lifestyles, abilities, and experience is key to our success.


Position Requirements:

Requirements:

Ability to support Information and Technology risk taxonomy development and implementation, including development of risk appetite, key risk indicators and key performance indicators
Experience developing an enterprise risk reporting capability, and ability to coordinate information technology risk status and updates to management and Board of Directors’ Audit Committee
Experience leading information and technology audits and testing of security controls for design and effectiveness, and coordinate third-party security assessments, such as SOC2 and client-specific assessments
3 to 5 years’ experience leading and performing periodic audits of information technology procedures and technology implementation to confirm compliance with regulatory standards, contractual agreements, and enterprise policy
Experience independently updating corporate security policies, standards, procedures, and plans, and identifying opportunities to improve efficiency
Experience facilitating input to and documenting IT processes, risks, and controls in a GRC solution
Experience efficiently coordinating written responses to client requests for information about information technology risk and compliance
Experience developing and documenting security incident reporting processes and procedures.
Experience participating in coordinating and documenting incident reporting and response, and facilitating reporting to stakeholders
Experience leading or providing substantial support to the development and delivery of information and technology risk training material
Demonstrated proactive and self-motivated work ethic
Bachelor’s Degree in computer programming, management information systems or another computer related field preferred. Will consider a combination of education and computer/IT skills developed through progressively responsible positions in technology or consulting roles
Other Desired Skills:

Experience with security and privacy domains such as FISMA, HIPAA, and HITECH, as well as frameworks such as COBIT
Big 4 or equivalent IT audit experience
Certified Information Systems Auditor (CISA), Certified Information Security Manager (CISM), Certified in Risk and Information Systems Control (CRISC), or Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP) preferred
Knowledgeable about IT audit best practices
This position offers an anticipated annual base salary range of $80,000 - $125,000. This position may be eligible for a discretionary bonus based on company and individual performance.
To apply, please submit a cover letter, resume, location preference, and salary expectations. Also, please submit a brief writing sample that illustrates your experience with one or more of the requirements.
Various federal agencies with whom we contract require that staff successfully undergo a background investigation or security clearance as a condition of working on the project. If you are assigned to such a project, you will be required to obtain the requisite security clearance. Must be able to pass a public trust background investigation.
This position may be eligible for a discretionary bonus based on company and individual performance.
Available Locations: Washington, DC; Princeton, NJ
#LI-DI1
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",3804,Washington
65,Senior Security Operations Center Analyst,"NVR, Inc","Reston, VA",None,"NVR has been helping families build their happily ever after since 1948. As a Top 5 US homebuilder, we’re committed to quality and to our customers and we take pride in the nearly 500,000 new homes we have sold and built across the country. Working in the homebuilding industry is tangible and rewarding, but not every job at NVR requires a hard hat. We don’t just sell and build new homes; we also manage teams, acquire land, manufacture materials, provide mortgages to our customers, and provide corporate support to NVR’s multi-billion dollar business operations.

As a Senior Security Operations Center (SOC) Analyst, you will be responsible for analyzing information from designated information security systems, developing information security requirements for key areas of the business, and working on assigned information security tasks with limited supervision. This includes, but is not limited to, physical security, data security (including data privacy security), electronic discoveries, network security, virus related activities, incident response, disaster recovery and security related audit activities and solutions.

Primary Responsibilities

Operational Security Tasks
Assisting with the oversight of our Security Operations Center and related log collection and analysis tools.
Supporting the creation, documentation, and implementation of security policies, procedures and practices.
Conducting proactive research and investigations to identify threats/vulnerabilities and identify remediation/mitigation procedures.
Collaborating and working closely with other IT teams/users to identify and resolve issues.
Project-related Security Tasks
Assisting project teams with performing risk and vulnerability assessments on business processes and infrastructure systems. Working with appropriate parties to develop appropriate resolution and/or mitigation plans.
Incident Response
Coordinating detection, analysis and remediation activities on attacks that impact information assets.
Accurately and timely performing electronic discovery activities including data identification, collection, preservation and processing.
Audit and Compliance
Planning and performing security assessments on designated technologies and systems by using tools and other methods including interviews.
Performing designated verifications, assessments and controls as required by Audit and the Internal Compliance Process.

Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in computer science or related discipline.
At least 5 years of experience in an information security role.
Demonstrated technical competencies in Operating Systems, Networking, Security tools, Cloud Services.
Knowledge of security industry practices and standards including SANS Top 20 Controls, and NIST.
Experience with security assessments, incident response activities and working in environments subject to regulations (e.g., SOX, Data Privacy) and audit oversight.
Security-related industry certifications are preferred, but not required (e.g., CISA, CISSP, GSEC, Security+).

Life at NVR

At NVR, your desire to excel is matched by our commitment to your success and we’ll give you the tools and industry knowledge you need. Our management team is tenured and talented, nearly 80% of them promoted from within, so you’ll find mentors who can share their knowledge, provide career guidance and encourage your success.

NVR also offers benefits among the best in the industry that reflect the strong commitment we have to all of our employees.

Competitive Compensation
Home Purchase Discount
Mortgage and Settlement Services Discounts
Comprehensive Health, Life and Disability Insurance
401(k) (Full-time employees are eligible to contribute immediately)
Employee Stock Ownership Program
Vacation and Holidays

In addition to the traditional benefits, we offer all our employees stock ownership through a profit sharing trust as part of our retirement savings package. NVR has had the highest Earnings Per Share growth rate in the homebuilding industry for the past 10 years, so as we grow financially, so do you.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Drug Testing and Credit Check are required.
Applicants must be legally entitled to work in the United States, as NVR does not provide visa sponsorships.",3804,Washington
66,Counterterrorism Analyst - TS/SCI,Assertive Professionals,"Reston, VA 20191","$73,000 - $78,000 a year ++","Assertive Professionals is in search of multiple Counterterrorism / Insurgency (CT/IA) Analysts to support the Defense Intelligence Agency's (DIA) Defense Combating Terrorism Center (DCTC). The DIA Consultant in this role will:
Drive collection to identify and answer intelligence gaps.
Work closely and effectively with collectors in all phases of the intelligence cycle.
Conduct research and analysis of data, information, and intelligence to produce a wide range of finished all-source intelligence products for senior U.S. defense department and government officials, U.S. Combatant Commands (CCMDs) that are in accordance with the Office of the Director of National Intelligence (ODNI) and DIA Analytical Standards.
Produce in-depth strategic and operational analysis of transnational terrorist networks and activities.
Create finished intelligence products that include, standard and nonstandard DIA products as well as briefings for the tactical and strategic customers.
Coordinate all products within DIA and with other Intelligence Community (IC) partners.
Support DoD field collectors and determine the best methodology to prepare and produce integrated intelligence products including targeting products in direct support of special operations.
Provide analytical support for special operations and c:onventional activities to include deployed, detailed, and temporary duty (TDY) support to partner nations.
Provide support to national and DoD/CCMD level planning efforts to include contingency and crisis planning.
Support daily coordination and dissemination of products with DCTC's Warning and Fusion Center (WFC), IC, and DoD, through attendance at IC coordination meetings.
Meet formatting, classification, and dissemination guidelines when producing written and graphic products.
Support the development and implementation of emerging terrorism intelligence research and/or reporting requirements using available IC databases.
Attend and participate in meetings, conferences, and working groups in support of the DCTC and IC missions.

Required:
Active TS/SCI Security Clearance
Demonstrate comprehensive knowledge of the concepts involved in strategic and operational analysis
Be able to communicate understanding from information that may be incomplete, indirect, highly complex, seemingly unrelated, and/or technically advanced
Be able to work independently with minimal oversight and direction
Be able to lead teams in researching multifaceted or critical problems.
Demonstrate proficiency using Microsoft Office tools (e.g. Excel, Work, PowerPoint)

Desired:
Current CI Polygraph
Experience relevant to strategic and operational analysis
Bachelors degree in Security Policy Studies with a recommended focus in Transnational Security Threats or U.S. National Security Policy.

Total yearly compensation: $73,000.00-$78,000.00

Candidates meeting the minimum qualifications for this position can expect a starting salary at $73,000.00. Candidates who possess additional desired qualifications can expect a higher starting salary, up to a maximum of $78,000.00.
A 10% shift differential is provided for hours worked outside of core working hours (before 6am and after 6pm).
In addition, hired analysts are eligible for either a $1,000.00 sign-on bonus OR $2,000.00 cost-reimbursable relocation bonus.",3804,Washington
67,Health Program Analyst,Mitre Corporation,"McLean, VA",None,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.
MITRE is seeking experienced analysts with consulting and management skills and the ability to develop expertise in public health, quality improvement, performance measures, policy development, care delivery process improvement, health IT, stakeholder engagement, or program implementation to support agencies within The Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) through all phases of healthcare modernization and transformation. The candidate best suited for the position will thrive in a highly dynamic environment, easily performing independent work, as well as working comfortably in team settings. The position will include strategic and tactical planning, interfacing with customers, project management, and interactions with both public and private sector entities in advising Federal health agencies. This position requires experience interacting with senior level leaders and the ability to develop general subject matter expertise in health policy, public health, health information technology, and other health-related government initiatives. The position provides an exciting opportunity to make a substantive impact in the areas of health care quality, federal policy, and public health.
Key Functions:
Work collaboratively with federal government sponsors, industry stakeholders and MITRE colleagues to shape project initiatives and deliver project work
Apply specific subject matter knowledge to achieve project objectives and to contribute to impactful outcomes
Assist HHS with analysis in support of federal health program implementations
Develop products such as research papers, briefing papers, and recommendations to support program administration
Deliver strategic advice and counsel to HHS, and potentially other healthcare entities for the advancement of health outcomes
Basic Qualifications:
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances
BS degree in a related field
2 years related experience
Required Qualifications:
Ability to obtain and maintain HHS Suitability clearance
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including the ability to clearly communicate analyses and findings to various stakeholders
Strong leadership, including the executive presence needed to work directly with federal government representatives
Strong project management experience, track record of successful execution
Ability to juggle multiple projects simultaneously in a fast-paced environment and work collaboratively with multi-disciplinary teams
Demonstrated strategic and analytical thinking skills and ability to work successfully in ambiguous situations
Ability to create high quality work products with excellent attention to detail
Expert skills in Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint and ability to master new technology tools as needed
Preferred Qualifications:
Master's degree in public health, medicine or healthcare, healthcare policy, public policy, economics, business or related field
This requisition requires the following clearance(s):
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.
Copyright © 1997-2021, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3804,Washington
68,USAID/AFR Operations Program Assistant,Dexis Consulting Group,"Washington, DC",None,"About Us:

Dexis Professional Services (DPS) is a professional services firm that solves the most pressing social challenges in complex environments, paving the way for a more secure and prosperous world.
DPS embraces diversity, equity, and inclusion and strives to build and maintain a safe environment where we celebrate diverse backgrounds, treat everyone with respect, and value the unique lived experiences each person brings based on their race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, disability, military or veteran status, national origin, age, marital status or family status and related conditions.
At DPS, you will experience a corporate culture of inclusiveness, fairness, and trust. You will be given the means and mentorship needed to succeed, and your creativity will be rewarded.
About the Position:

Global Solutions Ventures (GSV) — a joint-venture partnership between ZemiTek, LLC and Dexis Consulting Group — is seeking a Public Relations Specialist in support of upcoming work with the United States Agency for International Development (USAID) Bureau for Africa (AFR)
USAID/AFR works with its partners to improve access to and delivery of health services, to support more accountable and democratic institutions, to start businesses and foster an environment attractive to private investment, and to stave off conflict and strengthen communities. In Fiscal Year 2020, USAID and the U.S. Department of State provided $8.5 billion of assistance to 47 countries and 8 regional programs in sub-Saharan Africa.
The Operations Program Assistant (OPA) will work closely with the program management team to rpovide adminsitrative, logisitcal, and operational support for the team. The OPA will have the opportunity to support mission-critical work across USAID/AFR's portfolio of technical areas.
This position is contingent upon award.
Responsibilities:

The Operations Program Assistant (OPA) will cover the reception area and overall office space.
S/he will report to the SPM and work closely with the Deputy Program Manager and Financial Analyst, and provide overall administrative, recruitment, and travel support.
The OPA will provide support to the contract by performing a variety of both complex and routine administrative and analytical duties.
These duties range from administrative-type tasks such as scheduling briefings and meetings, arranging travel and maintaining program files, to more complex analytical-type tasks such as collecting, compiling, and analyzing data for various program documents and designing and maintaining spreadsheets in support of tracking systems.
The OPA ranks tasks in order of importance and impending deadlines and handles several tasks simultaneously.
The individual must develop a working knowledge of USAID policies and guidelines, as well as corporate practices and procedures.

Qualifications:

Minimum Requirements:
The position requires a bachelor’s degree and 1 year of relevant experience.
Requires proficiency in the use of Microsoft Office, Internet, Google Drive and e-mail applications.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, ability to work with high-level/senior officers at USAID.
Experience in the use of database applications is recommended.
Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for a Secret-level security clearance.
Preferred Requirements:
Background in African economic development, trade, public health, or similar
Second language
At Dexis Professional Services (DPS) we align ourselves with the core values of our parent company, Dexis Consulting Group (Dexis).
Dexis is on a mission to help solve today’s most pressing global political, social, and economic challenges and create a world where all people are safe and prosperous. As a Dexis employee, you will be challenged, empowered, and mentored. Our motto is “find a way or make a way” — that’s how Dexis goes “all in.” How will you?
If you are passionate about this opportunity, apply now!
Only those applicants who meet the above criteria will be contacted for interview.
Dexis is an Equal Opportunity Employer, and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, sex, national origin, religion, pregnancy, disability, age, genetic information, military service, veteran status, ethnicity, citizenship, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, childbirth and related medical conditions, including lactation, or any other protected class under applicable law.",3804,Washington
69,Senior Analyst II,"JRC Integrated Systems, Inc.","Washington, DC 20003 (Capitol Hill area)",None,"JRC is currently seeking a Senior Analyst II. This position will have primary responsibility assist the SP32 Nuclear Weapons Surety program team with various program level focus areas such as Risk Management, Process and Procedures reviews to include content development and staff organization. The Senior Analyst II will assist the government with Root Cause Analysis (RCA) events as required. This position will work closely with SP320, SP321, SP322, SP324. This position reports to David Quinton. The position requires a SECRET security clearance.JRC offers competitive salaries and a very comprehensive benefits package.Description: The Senior Analyst II will assist the project managers with Risk Management and support studies and analysis of the Integrated Navy Nuclear Weapons Security System (INWSS) vulnerabilities and performance gaps against stated adversaries based on performance, effectiveness, and return on investment.Key Duties: Risk Management and RCA/CA support.Risk Management support based on Defense Acquisition University (DAU) training and industry best practices.Maintain program-specific and internal documentation within SSP systems such as LiveLink, SWSNet, SIPRNET, etc.Develop and maintain Integrated Master Schedules (IMS), Plans of Action and Milestones (POA&M) associated with the NWS.Program status updates for external program reporting.Program briefs, status reports, memorandums, formal letters, proposed revisions to ordnance documents (OD), Strategic Systems Programs Instructions (SSPInst), and other documentation as required.Assist as needed with systems-engineering-related tasks for the programGeneral Skills/Attributes: Risk Management and RCA/CA support.Risk Management support based on Defense Acquisition University (DAU) training and industry best practices.Maintain program-specific and internal documentation within SSP systems such as LiveLink, SWSNet, SIPRNET, etc.Develop and maintain Integrated Master Schedules (IMS), Plans of Action and Milestones (POA&M) associated with the NWS.Program status updates for external program reporting.Program briefs, status reports, memorandums, formal letters, proposed revisions to ordnance documents (OD), Strategic Systems Programs Instructions (SSPInst), and other documentation as required.Assist as needed with systems-engineering-related tasks for the programMust be able to obtain and maintain a government security clearanceSpecific Skills/Qualifications: Preferred Skills and QualificationsRisk Management and RCA/CA support.Risk Management support based on Defense Acquisition University (DAU) training and industry best practices.Maintain program-specific and internal documentation within SSP systems such as LiveLink, SWSNet, SIPRNET, etc.Develop and maintain Integrated Master Schedules (IMS), Plans of Action and Milestones (POA&M) associated with the NWS.Program status updates for external program reporting.Program briefs, status reports, memorandums, formal letters, proposed revisions to ordnance documents (OD), Strategic Systems Programs Instructions (SSPInst), and other documentation as required.Assist as needed with systems-engineering-related tasks for the program.Job Type: Full-time",3804,Washington
70,Senior All-Source Intel Analyst,"Salient CRGT, Inc","McLean, VA 22102",None,"Job Description:

Are you looking for a new and exciting career opportunity?
Join our award-winning organization and work with some of the most talented minds within our Enterprise Technology and Innovation teams. As a Salient CRGT employee, you get to be part of a best performing team supporting our nation’s most critical missions.
Why Salient CRGT?
We’re passionate about the inspirational missions of our customers and we entrust our employees and teams to deliver exceptional performance to enable the safety, security, health and well-being of our nation. We provide the tools and resources to help you be successful, and our culture fosters an environment in which idea sharing and collaboration is essential. Are you ready to make a difference?
We are seeking a Senior All-Source Intel Analyst to fill a postion in the Washington, D.C. metro area.
#cjpost
Required Qualifications:

The following are minimum requirements for the role:
10+ years of experience
MA/MS degree
Experience briefing and providing written summaries to senior officials
Experience working jointly with IC departments and agencies
Knowledge of the ODNI mission, operations, tradecraft, capabilities, and requirements
Familiarity with a variety of IC databases, networks, and environments
Ability to work rotating shifts of 12 hours in a fast-paced demanding environment, including weekends and holidays
Interpersonal and organizational skills, including the ability to manage competing priorities under strict guidelines while maintaining customer service
Ability to work effectively independently and in a team or collaborative environment
TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance
 #super6
#muncyreqs
#crgt456
Desired Qualifications:
The ideal candidate will be responsible for identification of key intelligence traffic for maintaining situational awareness of global and worldwide national security events that drives intelligence production.
Salient CRGT is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, disability, genetic information, or any other factor prohibited by applicable anti-discrimination laws.",3804,Washington
71,Senior Data Analyst,GEICO,"Chevy Chase, MD 20815",None,"The Data Consumption team of Data, Security & Infrastructure (DSI) department is seeking a highly motivated Senior Data Analyst to start or continue an IT career at GEICO on the Big Data project.
Teaming up with software engineers, scrum masters, leads, managers and directors, you will work in an Agile environment to make application data ingested from various partner systems consumable on the Big Data Atomic Layer.
In this role, you will coordinate with a variety of IT departments to elicit and translate high level business requirements into detailed system requirements. You will participate in the entire software development lifecycle by writing and executing test plans, finding solutions to issues during development and after deployment. You should be intellectually curious, have a solutions-oriented attitude and enjoy learning new tools and techniques.
Requirements Qualifications:
5+ years knowledge of Data transformation, Data management & ETL processes
5+ years’ experience documenting business and system requirements, processes, workflows and test plans
5+ years’ experience with Relational Database (Snowflake, Hive, Microsoft SQL, Oracle or DB2)
3+ years’ experience on writing queries using SQL
3+ years’ working knowledge of Data Vault modelling, Azure DevOps, Hadoop, Hive, Microsoft Power BI, and Python
3+ years’ working knowledge of Big Data and the Azure/Snowflake ecosystem
Strong SQL, data mapping, and data profiling skills
Assists developers with more complex and detailed projects including root cause analysis, gap analysis etc.
Excellent time management skills and attention to detail is required
Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
Strong problem-solving ability, critical thinking skills, creative/innovative thinking
Ability and desire to learn new skills and techniques
Ability to thrive while working on ambiguous or challenging projects
A Bachelor's degree in a computer or information technology or currently enrolled in a degree program
Desirable Qualifications:
Proficient in SQL and be able to extract & validate data using SQL query
Ability to work independently while supporting multiple projects in a dynamic environment
Understanding of software development, web technologies, and testing approaches
Ability to discern data inaccuracies through technical experience and knowledge.
Develop an understanding of the business and the data needed to promote success
Ability to query, organize and interpret large amounts of data
Research data from key business systems, assess data quality, and map data to requirements for analysis and reporting
Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.
As a Senior Data Analyst, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:
Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**
Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
Tuition Reimbursement
Paid Training and LicensuresBenefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
**Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.
The equal employment opportunity policy of the GEICO Companies provides for a fair and equal employment opportunity for all associates and job applicants regardless of race, color, religious creed, national origin, ancestry, age, gender, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, familial status, disability or genetic information, in compliance with applicable federal, state and local law. GEICO hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.
GEICO reasonably accommodates qualified individuals with disabilities to enable them to receive equal employment opportunity and/or perform the essential functions of the job, unless the accommodation would impose an undue hardship to the Company. This applies to all applicants and associates.
GEICO also provides a work environment in which each associate is able to be productive and work to the best of their ability. We do not condone or tolerate an atmosphere of intimidation or harassment. We expect and require the cooperation of all associates in maintaining an atmosphere free from discrimination and harassment with mutual respect by and for all associates and applicants.
#LI-AA1
#LI-AA3
#DI-AA",3804,Washington
72,Senior EHS Analyst,EATON,"Beltsville, MD",None,"Eaton’s Fluid Electrical Distribution division, a part of our Aerospace group, is currently seeking a Senior EHS Analyst to join our team. This position is based at our Beltsville, MD office. Position Overview: The Senior EHS Analyst is responsible for environmental, health, safety and security at the Beltsville, MD manufacturing facility. Responsibilities include supporting EHS activities at the site; performing risk assessments; compliance inspections; design and/or implementation of EHS solutions; internal reporting of EHS performance; communication of federal, state, and local regulatory requirements; closure of MESH and regulatory findings in a timely manner; completion of training for required EHS personnel; and creating a strong zero incident EHS culture that engages employees throughout the site in EHS teams and processes. Making what matters work at Eaton takes the passion of every employee around the world. We create an environment where creativity, invention and discovery become reality, each and every day. It’s where bold, bright professionals like you can reach your full potential—and where you can help us reach ours. In this function you will: Supports EHS Manager and site for all OSHA compliance programs, including, but not limited to; PPE, Hearing Conservation, Respiratory Protection, Machine Guarding, Lock Out Tag Out, Confined Space, Industrial Powered Trucks, Contractor safety, and Hazard communication. Supports EHS Manager in development, maintenance, and achievement of goals in support of corporate and business group EHS strategic initiatives. Including the development of goals for site manager, leadership team, and front line supervisors to drive EHS culture, compliance, and result. Responsible to the tracking of appropriate leading and lagging indicators to track EHS performance. Supports EHS Manager with developing and conducting required training. Develop campaigns to promotes zero incident EHS culture throughout site. Coordinate the annual MESH self-assessment (evaluation of compliance for EHS country, state, and local regulations ) with EHS Manager and MESH element champions. Supports efforts for third party recognition for programs that establish the site and Eaton’s EHS program as world class. Responsible for using established EHS data processes such as MESH Prism to manage data. Supports identification, design, implementation of improved safety or environmental measures for work stations, equipment, or other operations in support of continuous improvement. Supports and oversees EHS related capital projects through coordination and review of cost proposals, engineering designs for compliance with regulations, and management of contractors. Supports work station risk assessments, ergonomic assessments, and job safety analysis. Work with the EHS Manager and Department Managers to ensure that all plant activities are in compliance with safety, health and environmental rules and regulations. #LI-UH1 Qualifications Required (Basic) Qualifications: Bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution. Must have minimum 2 years of EHS related experience. Must be able to work in the United States without corporate sponsorship now and within the future. This position requires use of information or access to hardware which is subject to the International Traffic in Arms Regulations (ITAR). All applicants must be U.S. persons within the meaning of ITAR. ITAR defines a U.S. person as a U.S. Citizen, U.S. Permanent Resident (i.e. 'Green Card Holder'), Political Asylee, or Refugee. No relocation benefit is being offered for this position. Only candidates within a 50-mile radius of Beltsville, MD will be considered. Active Duty Military Service member candidates are exempt from the geographical area limitation. Perferred Qualifications: 2 years of manufacturing experience. Associate Safety Professional (ASP) or Graduate Safety Professional (GSP) Experience with environmental permitting and regulatory compliance Comprehension of Eaton, industry, state, and country EHS&S requirements. Understanding of ISO 14001 standards and internal auditor Lean Fundamentals Understanding. We are committed to ensuring equal employment opportunities for all job applicants and employees. Employment decisions are based upon job-related reasons regardless of an applicant's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability, marital status, genetic information, protected veteran status, or any other status protected by law. We make what matters work. Everywhere you look—from the technology and machinery that surrounds us, to the critical services and infrastructure that we depend on every day—you’ll find one thing in common. It all relies on power. That’s why Eaton is dedicated to improving people’s lives and the environment with power management technologies that are more reliable, efficient, safe and sustainable. Because this is what matters. We are confident we can deliver on this promise because of the attributes that our employees embody. We’re ethical, passionate, accountable, efficient, transparent and we’re committed to learning. These values enable us to tackle some of the toughest challenges on the planet, never losing sight of what matters. Job: Environmental Health & Safety Region: North America – US/Puerto Rico Organization: AER FED Fluid Electrical Distribution Job Level: Individual Contributor Schedule: Full-time Is remote work (i.e. working from home or another Eaton facility) allowed for this position?: No Does this position offer relocation?: No Travel: No",3804,Washington
73,Principal/Senior Principal Cyber Network Security Analyst,Northrop Grumman,"Arlington, VA",None,"Category: Information Technology
Location: Arlington, Virginia
US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes
Clearance Type: Top Secret
Telecommute: No –Teleworking not available for this position
Shift: 1st Shift
Travel Required: Yes, 10 % of the Time
Positions Available: 1

Peraton drives missions of consequence spanning the globe and extending to the farthest reaches of the galaxy. As the world’s leading mission capability integrator, we are a trusted provider of highly differentiated national security solutions and technologies that keep people safe and secure. Peraton serves as a valued partner to essential government agencies, including the Intelligence Community, Department of Defense, Department of Health and Human Services, and NASA. Every day, our 10,000 employees do the can’t be done, solving the most daunting challenges facing our customers.

The Principal/Senior Principal Cyber Network Security Analyst position will be located in Arlington, VA or Fair Lakes, VA.

Position Description:
Perform technical analysis on a wide range of cybersecurity issues, with a focus on network activity and data; this includes, but is not limited to: network flow (i.e. netflow) or related forms of session summary data, signature-based IDS alert/event data, full packet capture (PCAP) data, proxy and application server logs (various types).Triage IDS alerts, collect related data from various network analysis systems, review available open and closed source information on related threats & vulnerabilities, diagnose observed activity for likelihood of system infection, compromise or unintended/high-risk exposure. Prepare analysis reports detailing background, observables, analysis process & criteria, and conclusions.Analyze large volumes of network flow data for specific patterns/characteristics or general anomalies, to trend network activity and to correlate flow data with other types of data or reporting regarding enterprise-wide network activity.Leverage lightweight programming/scripting skills to automate data-parsing and simple analytics.Document key event details and analytic findings in analysis reports and incident management systems.Identify, extract and characterize network indicators from cyber threat intelligence sources, incident reporting and published technical advisories/bulletins.Assess cyber indicators/observables for technical relevance, accuracy, and potential value/risk/reliability in monitoring systems.Recommend detection and prevention/mitigation signatures and actions as part of a layered defensive strategy leveraging multiple capabilities and data types.Develop IDS signatures, test and tune signature syntax, deploy signatures to operational sensors, and monitor and tune signature and sensor performance.Fuse open-source threat & vulnerability information with data collected from sensors across the enterprise into cohesive and comprehensive analysis.Provide technical assessments of cyber threats and vulnerabilities.Communicate and collaborate with analysts from other SOC organizations to investigate cyber events.Produce final reports and review incident reports from junior analysts.
• Monitor and report on trends and activity on network sensor platforms. • Produce and update technical analysis documentation (processes, procedures, analysis criteria, report templates, etc.). This position may be filled at either the Principal or Senior Principal grade levels.

Basic Qualifications - Principal Cyber Network Security Analyst
Bachelor’s Degree and a minimum of 5 years related technical experience required. An additional 4 years of experience may be substituted in lieu of degree.
Working knowledge of security concepts, protocols, processes, architectures and tools (vulnerabilities, threats and exploitation, authentication & access control technologies, threat intelligence data and sources, WHOIS and DNS referential data and sources, intrusion detection/prevention capabilities, network traffic analysis, SIM technology, incident handling, media/malware analysis, etc).
Working knowledge of networking concepts, protocols and architectures (OSI-model, TCP/IP, major application protocols such as DNS/HTTP/SMTP, LAN/WANs, VPNs, routers/routing, addressing, etc).
Detailed knowledge of intrusion detection engines, capabilities and signature formats in general, with a specific focus on Snort/Sourcefire variations and regular expressions (REGEX).
Knowledge of cyber policy & issues, the global cyber community, roles of major organizations how they interrelate and interact, and challenges in these structures.
Awareness of the common cyber products and services, an understanding of their limitations, and a comprehensive understanding of the disciplines of cybersecurity.
Ability to produce results in a fast-paced environment with the ability to meet iterative deadlines.
Active Top Secret Security Clearance with SCI eligibility is required. In addition, selected candidate must be able to obtain and maintain a favorably adjudicated DHS background investigation (EOD) for continued employment.
Preferred Qualifications • Experience working within the Federal government technology community a plus.
DODD 8570 Level II certification (SANS certifications, CISSP).Experience leading and managing within SOC/NOC operations.Familiarity with Kill Chain for incident response.Familiarity with incident response products and best practices.Experience with database (e.g. MS Access, SQL) and/or portal administration (e.g. SharePoint). Basic Qualifications - Senior Principal Cyber Network Security Analyst
Bachelor’s Degree and a minimum of 9 years related technical experience required. An additional 4 years of experience may be substituted in lieu of degree.
Working knowledge of security concepts, protocols, processes, architectures and tools (vulnerabilities, threats and exploitation, authentication & access control technologies, threat intelligence data and sources, WHOIS and DNS referential data and sources, intrusion detection/prevention capabilities, network traffic analysis, SIM technology, incident handling, media/malware analysis, etc).
Working knowledge of networking concepts, protocols and architectures (OSI-model, TCP/IP, major application protocols such as DNS/HTTP/SMTP, LAN/WANs, VPNs, routers/routing, addressing, etc).
Detailed knowledge of intrusion detection engines, capabilities and signature formats in general, with a specific focus on Snort/Sourcefire variations and regular expressions (REGEX).
Knowledge of cyber policy & issues, the global cyber community, roles of major organizations how they interrelate and interact, and challenges in these structures.
Awareness of the common cyber products and services, an understanding of their limitations, and a comprehensive understanding of the disciplines of cybersecurity.
Ability to produce results in a fast-paced environment with the ability to meet iterative deadlines.
Active Top Secret Security Clearance with SCI eligibility is required. In addition, selected candidate must be able to obtain and maintain a favorably adjudicated DHS background investigation (EOD) for continued employment.


Preferred Qualifications
Experience working within the Federal government technology community a plus.DODD 8570 Level II certification (SANS certifications, CISSP).Experience leading and managing within SOC/NOC operations.Familiarity with Kill Chain for incident response.Familiarity with incident response products and best practices.Experience with database (e.g. MS Access, SQL) and/or portal administration (e.g. SharePoint). We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, marital status, veteran status, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or membership in any other group protected by federal, state, or local law.",3804,Washington
74,Senior Principal Intelligence Analyst,Northrop Grumman,"McLean, VA 22102",None,"Category: Technical Support
Location: McLean, Virginia
US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes
Clearance Type: Polygraph
Telecommute: No –Teleworking not available for this position
Shift: 1st Shift
Travel Required: Yes, 10 % of the Time
Positions Available: 25

Peraton drives missions of consequence spanning the globe and extending to the farthest reaches of the galaxy. As the world’s leading mission capability integrator, we are a trusted provider of highly differentiated national security solutions and technologies that keep people safe and secure. Peraton serves as a valued partner to essential government agencies, including the Intelligence Community, Department of Defense, Department of Health and Human Services, and NASA. Every day, our 10,000 employees do the can’t be done, solving the most daunting challenges facing our customers. Peraton is seeking a motivated professional Senior Principal Intelligence Analysts for our client’s operational requirements on a mission focused program within a challenging, dynamic setting located in the Northern Virginia Area. Successful candidates in this position will collaborate with a diverse group of individuals across the intelligence community and directly contribute to processes that shape government policy. You will conduct in-depth research, perform rigorous time sensitive analysis, and distill this analysis into actionable insights. You will collaborate with peers and partners worldwide in support of operational activity related to your research.

Basic Qualifications: •Bachelors of Arts or Bachelors of Science – from an accredited college or university – with 7 years of relevant professional experience -OR- High School Diploma and 12 years of relevant professional work experience (within the sponsor's organization or other relevant Intel Community organization) in lieu of degree. •7 years of experience conducting intelligence analysis and reporting. •7 years of experience simultaneously manipulating multiple sets of data to derive inputs for intelligence packages. •Availability for TDY travel, if necessary. •Ability to support 24/7 operational efforts, on an as-needed basis. •Current TS/SCI clearance with Polygraph. Preferred Qualifications: •Understanding of the Intelligence Community, their partners, and supporting/driving intelligence operational activities. •Experience and understanding of research and analysis methodologies in support of the intelligence lifecycle. •Extensive use of tools specific to the end customer. •Experience of customer’s report writing standards and through various reporting methods. •Ability and willingness to be a mentor supporting mission dynamics. •Ability to work independently and as a team member. We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, marital status, veteran status, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or membership in any other group protected by federal, state, or local law.",3804,Washington
75,Senior Force Development Analyst,"GC Associates USA, LLC","Washington, DC 20310","$95,000 - $105,000 a year","A Senior Analyst is required to support the Headquarters Department of the Army, G-8, Force Development Directorate. The Force Development Directorate (FD) requires an interdisciplinary skill set of budgeting, DOD acquisition processes and procedures (DoDI 5000.2) as well as expertise with materiel and /or force structure requirements development and validation (JCIDS). The mix of these skills will vary at echelons of command. Force Development experience is critical to applying force development skills across the domains of Doctrine, Organization, Training, Materiel, Leadership, Education, Personnel and Facilities (DOTML-PF) in a fiscally constrained environment. Examples of force development experience range from programming materiel and force structure requirements at the highest Army echelons such as HQDA, down to integrating new equipment into units at battalion levels.DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: The Senior Analyst responsibilities include:- Perform analysis in support of products presented to senior leadership for decisions or information purposes in support of briefings, working groups, or other decision forums.- Shall provide programming data analysis for the Program Objective Memorandum build, program reviews, Strategic Planning Assessment Review (SPAR), and senior leader briefs.- Shall assist with quality control of Director Reviews.- Shall conduct quality control checks of Portfolio briefings and provide reports of analysis. Analysis shall include recommendation for changes to any and all briefings and presentations formats.- Shall provide reviews and analysis of Army Requirements Review Board (AR2B) issues and assist with briefing and preparation of senior leaders for AR2B discussions.- Pprovide support in analysis and recommendations to DOM Hardware Divisions in support of Strategic Planning Assessment Reviews (SPAR).- Perform the duties as required by an Analyst.Educational and Position Requirements: Bachelor’s degree in Business or Public Administration, Management, Economics, Math, Science, Engineering, History or English. A Master’s degree in one of these areas will be accepted if Bachelor’s degree does not meet the criteria. Have a minimum of eight (8) years of experience and expertise in Force Development duties. Experience may be obtained at varying levels of Army organizations but candidates must have experience at most senior levels of the Army such as HQDA, MACOMs, or Army Service Component Commands.Job Type: Full-timePay: $95,000.00 - $105,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offRetirement planVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:Army Force Development: 8 years (Required)HQDA, MACOMs, or Army Service Component Commands: 2 years (Required)Security Clearance:Secret (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",3804,Washington
76,Senior CPIC Analyst,Chevo Consulting,"Washington, DC 20005 (Logan Circle area)",None,"Chevo is currently hiring an experienced Senior CPIC Analyst, to join our expanding Portfolio Management practice. This position is primarily located on-site with our client in the Washington, DC Metro Area. The ideal candidate will demonstrate versatility in understanding and performing work related to program/project management, portfolio management, capital planning and investment control (CPIC), program governance, and system development life cycle management activities.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Providing hands on strategic and tactical advisory services to improve the efficacy of the Agency’s CPIC process while reducing complexity and burden
Making recommendations for improvements to the project and portfolio management policies, procedures, and processes using industry best practices in CPIC and portfolio management.
Serve as primary point of contact between Agency and Components regarding Component CPIC Activities to ensure effective communication between both sets of organizations
Provide directed advisory and coaching support to Components CPIC staff and key stakeholders on CPIC processes and programmatic issues;
Review, assessment and recommendations and Agency scoring process for Annual Major Business Case submissions and Non-Major Business Cases for quality and completion as needed;
Review of monthly submissions for quality and completion; approve Baseline Change Requests
Participate in bi-monthly Agency CPIC meetings
Review and update Agency CPIC guidance as changes occur from OMB and other oversight bodies.
Perform various ad hoc analysis.
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree
7+ years total experience
Knowledge of the DHS Department level CPIC process
Experience in managing investments from a portfolio perspective
Ability to pass client security clearance requirements
Desired Qualifications:
Strong consulting (4+ years consulting experience), writing, and client handling skills
Prior experience in a Federal Government Consulting role
Strong oral and written communication skills and the ability to present a polished, professional, and diplomatic image to clients
Strong analytical skills – assertive and inquisitive manner that allows the individual to take indirectly related and orally communicated information and transform it into actionable information
Experience at DHS Headquarters or Component
Chevo offers a comprehensive benefits package including medical, dental and vision coverage, paid leave, 401K plan with matching, monthly SMART card employer contribution for commuting expenses, tuition assistance and more!
Chevo ranks on the 2020 Washington Technology Fast 50 list and is a winner of the 2012 through 2020 Alliance for Workplace Excellence (AWE) Seal of Approval!
Chevo Consulting, LLC is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, disability, military status, national origin or any other characteristic protected under federal, state, or applicable local law",3804,Washington
77,Senior Analyst,INCA Engineering,"Arlington, VA 22202 (Aurora Highlands area)",None,"Senior Acquisition AnalystWe are seeking a team member with a passion for applying their experience and knowledge to distributed networked systems security. You will become a part of a flexible and dynamic team of technology experts and project leaders.As a Senior Acquisition Analyst you will assess, maintain and improve technology systems including a geographically distributed sensor system for border security.Key ResponsibilitiesAnalyze broadly stated project requirements and, through research and meeting with stakeholders, provide recommendations for improving key performance parameters, key system attributes, and additional requirements.Review requirement documentation to establish and maintain a streamlined systems acquisition process.Organize, lead, and attend integrated product team meetings for robust and open communications about requirements, acquisition strategies, Government-contractor team performance, and to provide information to Government decision makers.Monitor and evaluate the progress of assigned projects throughout a highly tailored and streamlined acquisition process to ensure projects meet requirements, budgetary goals, and schedule milestones.Prepare periodic and ad hoc reports and briefings highlighting progress against performance metrics, key events, budgetary performance, testing, and schedule milestones.Participate in all phases of the systems engineering process including requirements development, systems requirements reviews, design reviews, test readiness reviews, and acceptance testing.Basic Qualifications: 5 years or more experience related to engineering.Bachelor of Science in Engineering, Physical Science, Computer Science, Information Science, Mathematics or a related fieldUS CitizenDHS Suitability clearance or DoD Secret ClearancePreferred Experience: Previous experience with Department of Homeland SecurityPrevious experience in Systems Engineering, acquisition, test and evaluationUnderstanding of Systems acquisition lifecycle (e.g., ALF and MD-102).Familiarity with IEEE standard 1012, IEEE Standard 829-1998, and the DHS SELC.Excellent writing, communications and briefing skills. · Certifications from DAU and DAWIA in Acquisition or test and evaluation are desired.About INCA Engineering : INCA Engineering is a Veteran Owned small business providing research and technology development solutions that deliver positive impact on our world through creative innovation. Since 2008, we have combined a passion for our work with deep technical expertise to tackle our clients' greatest challenges.INCA Engineering offers an excellent benefits package, professional development, and fosters a highly skilled workforce while maintaining a healthy work-life balance. Benefits include personal time off, medical Insurance and 401k plan.INCA Engineering is an equal opportunity employer that values diversity at all levels. (EOE – Minorities/Females/ Protected Veterans Status/Disability Status/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity)Job Location: Arlington VirginiaJob Type: Full-timeJob Type: Full-timeBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceFlexible scheduleHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridaySupplemental Pay:Bonus payCOVID-19 considerations:All work is currently being performed remotely and may allow work from home going forward.Education:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:project management: 5 years (Preferred)Security Clearance:Secret (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",3804,Washington
78,Climate Risk Assessment Analyst,Logistics Management Institute,"Tysons, VA",None,"Overview:

The Climate Risk Assessment Analyst will work at the LMI Tysons, VA facility and support various government clients throughout the National Capital Region.
LMI is a consultancy dedicated to powering a future-ready, high-performing government, drawing from expertise in digital and analytic solutions, logistics, and management advisory services. We deliver integrated capabilities that incorporate emerging technologies and are tailored to customers’ unique mission needs, backed by objective research and data analysis. Founded in 1961 to help the Department of Defense resolve complex logistics management challenges, LMI continues to enable growth and transformation, enhance operational readiness and resiliency, and ensure mission success for federal civilian and defense agencies. We believe government can make a difference, and we seek talented, hardworking people who share that conviction.
Responsibilities:
Providing technical climate science expertise across integrated project teams, assessing climate risk in a diverse array of near and long term strategic planning activities including, but not limited to, master planning, facility design, construction, and operations, fleet management, national security, workforce planning, supply chains, and mission critical infrastructure.
Conducting technical research on a broad range of climate hazards, risks, and risk mitigation strategies as well as environmental and sustainability topics including, but not limited to, sustainable building technologies, energy and water efficiency, climate change adaptation and mitigation, environmental remediation technologies, and analytical methods.
Compiling, analyzing, and managing large, complex data sets and translating into succinct presentations, reports, and policy recommendations for diverse federal stakeholders.
Preparing climate adaptation plans and risk assessments and working with subject matter experts to develop well-informed risk mitigation strategies.
Tracking and assessing impact of climate and environmental policies, procedures, and processes at the federal government, state government, and federal intra-agency level.
Demonstrating LMI capabilities to current and potential federal clients to support capability and business development goals. Scheduling, managing, and documenting client engagements.
Supporting LMI Mid-level and Senior Consultants with day-to-day program activities including, but not limited to:
Developing and updating strategic/long-term plans, environmental plans, and sustainability plans.
Documenting and maintaining procedures and guidance for tracking client projects and program performance.
Preparing technical training manuals, Microsoft (MS) Power Point presentations, project briefs, blog posts, and climate related technical documents.
Qualifications:
Undergraduate degree in environmental science, engineering, geology, chemistry, or other physical science.
0-3 years’ experience in climate assessment, energy, and facilities
Demonstrated personal and professional interest and leadership in climate change risk management and a strong ability to translate complex scientific data relevant to a client’s specific mission, portfolio, and/or assets.
Strong skills in MS Office applications. Advanced analytical abilities in MS Excel required. Experience with Tableau and Access preferred.
Demonstrated creative problem-solving skills and ability to develop climate risk solutions including development of decision support frameworks and analytic tools that integrate within existing LMI and/or client systems, processes, and protocols.
Strong technical reading, writing, and proofreading skills in performing quality assessment/quality control.
Demonstrated professionalism in client settings, including interpersonal and presentation skills.
Ability to work independently. Must be able to prioritize tasks, meet deadlines with minimal supervision, and efficiently manage time across multiple tasks.
Working knowledge of current federal and state climate and environmental policy/regulations.
Ability to contribute to a professional work environment by demonstrating integrity, promoting teamwork and fostering positive communication. Ability to develop and maintain professional relationships in LMI’s multidisciplinary environment.
Availability for travel as required. Limited local travel to client sites in Washington, DC is typical.
Applicants selected for this position may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. For this position, LMI will only consider applicants with current security clearances or applicants who are eligible for security clearances. Please note that only U.S. Citizens are eligible for a security clearance.",3804,Washington
79,"Policy Analyst/Senior Policy Analyst, International Climate Policy",American Progress,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)",None,"The Policy Analyst/Senior Policy Analyst will work with the Energy and Environment Policy team to conduct policy research and analysis on international climate change and energy policy. Successful applicants will have expertise in climate change mitigation, resilience policy, and international climate policy issues as well as possess strong analytical, organizational, written, and verbal communication skills.
The Policy Analyst/Senior Policy Analyst will report to the Director for International Climate Policy and work closely with the Senior Fellows on the Energy and Environment Policy and National Security and International Policy teams. They will also work with members of other policy teams, such as Economic Policy, to identify and develop American Progress initiatives, programs, and research opportunities to advocate for an ambitious U.S. posture in international climate diplomacy. A substantial portion of that work focuses on partnerships and programs with foreign counterparts, both in government and in research and policy advocacy fields.

Responsibilities:
Perform and support research and analysis on international energy and climate policy issues, including conducting literature reviews, proofreading, fact-checking, and editing documents.
Draft policy reports, columns, and articles to influence the policy debate on key energy, diplomacy, and international climate issues.
Support the work of the Senior Fellow for International Climate Policy and Director for International Climate Policy to develop American Progress’ international climate outreach program, including through policy dialogues, public programs, and joint research with international counterpart organizations. This may include substantial outreach and engagement with the National Security and International Policy team and with outside partners.
Serve as the primary liaison between American Progress’ Energy and Environment Policy and National Security and International Policy teams.
Engage in rapid response to policy developments, including drafting articles, op-eds, blog posts, and social media posts and shareables on quick turnaround times.
Coordinate and plan meetings and events as needed.
Represent American Progress in meetings with Capitol Hill staff, coalition partners, and on-the-record media to advance the team’s work.
Develop expertise in assigned areas of responsibility.
Perform other duties as assigned.

Requirements and qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience in public policy, environmental policy or management, or a related field.
Three to four years of professional experience in international relations, climate or energy policy, or a related field are required for the Policy Analyst role; five or more years of experience to be considered for Senior Policy Analyst. Equivalent education, such as a master’s degree, or advocacy work may account for a portion of this experience.
Demonstrated interest in the intersection between climate and foreign policy.
Ability to prioritize work, balance multiple projects, and meet deadlines in both an individual capacity and in a team setting.
Excellent research and analytical skills; quantitative skills are a plus.
Proficient in written and verbal communication, including the ability to communicate technical policy matters for a nontechnical audience.

This position is part of a bargaining unit represented by IFPTE Local 70.

To Apply

Please follow the link below to the online application. When completing the application, be sure to combine your cover letter and resume/CV into one Word or PDF file and upload this combined document. The system does not allow for multiple files.

This announcement will remain posted until the position is filled. No phone calls, please.
Please note that only those individuals whose qualifications match the current needs of this position will be considered applicants and will receive responses from American Progress.
Thank you for your interest in American Progress.",3804,Washington
80,Sr. Information Security Analyst,General Dynamics Information Technology,"Washington, DC 20003 (Navy Yard area)","$135,360 - $203,040 a year","Travel Required: None
Requisition Type: Regular
This position is not yet funded.
GDIT is currently looking for a Sr. Information Security Analyst. The Information Assurance Analyst, Senior shall serve as a lead for the team responsible for information assurance posture of networks and systems and support system certification and accreditation. This support would include analysis of networks/systems; development of secure networks/systems; and integration, testing, and maintenance of the networks/systems. Lead the development of system IA documentation to support certification of compliance to applicable standards including RMF, DCID 6/9, and ICD 503.
This is a Telecommuting Position.
It is required that the Information Assurance Analyst, Senior has the following qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree within a field similar to the scope of this requirement, i.e. computer science, computer engineering, systems engineering
Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP) ISC2 or Certified Information Systems Manager (CISM).
At least five years of practical computer security experience in secure network and system design, analysis, procedure/test generation, test execution and implementation of computer/network security mechanisms
At least five years of experience providing Information Assurance and cybersecurity for efforts of similar size and scope to those identified in the task order.
Top Secret Clearance
The likely salary range for this position is $135,360 - $203,040, this is not, however, a guarantee of compensation or salary; rather, salary will be set based on experience, geographic location and possibly contractual requirements and could fall outside of this range.
View information about benefits and our total rewards program.
We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3804,Washington
81,Human Resources Analyst,Central Intelligence Agency,"Washington, DC 20505 (Foggy Bottom area)","$70,150 - $127,885 a year","Human Resources Analysts provide workforce metrics, reports, and analysis to broaden leadership understanding of the workforce and help inform their decision-making.

Full time
Starting salary: $70,150 - $127,885*

Higher starting salary possible depending on experience level

Bachelor’s degree

About the Job

As a Human Resources (HR) Analyst CIA, you’ll contribute to the Agency mission at every level by providing workforce metrics, reports, and analysis to broaden senior leadership and management’s understanding of the workforce and inform their decision-making. Analysts go beyond structuring data and descriptive reporting to produce highly analytic, actionable assessments, and apply data visualization methodologies and software. You will also play a critical role in strengthening HR’s strategic business partnerships by collaborating with customers and serving as workforce analytics and strategy experts.

Who You’ll Work With

At the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA), we recognize our Nation’s strength comes from the diversity of its people. People from a broad range of backgrounds and viewpoints work at CIA, and our diverse teams are the reason we can keep our country safe.

Read more about diversity and inclusion

What You’ll Get

Our benefits support every aspect of a working professional’s life, including health and wellness, time off, family, finances, and continuing education. Our programs include highly sought-after government health benefits, flexible schedules, sick leave, and childcare. In some cases, we also offer sign-on incentives and cover moving expenses if you relocate.

As a CIA employee, you’ll also get the satisfaction of knowing your work is part of something bigger than yourself. Our work is driven by one mission: to keep our Nation safe. Every day is an opportunity to enhance U.S. national security.

Learn more about working at CIA

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in one of the following fields or related studies with emphasis on statistical analysis:
Business Administration
Psychology
Human Resources
Statistics
Behavioral Data Science
Mathematics
Economics
Computer Science
Social Science
Physical Science or relevant field
Experience working with HR data and analytics
At least a 3.0 GPA on a 4-point scale
Strong analytic and problem-solving skills
Ability to apply information maintained in HR systems to address organizational issues and questions
Ability to analyze workforce data and identify relationships between and among datasets and draw conclusions about the data
Ability to write clearly and concisely
Ability to develop and deliver briefings on complex or sensitive issues to managerial level audiences
Exceptional customer service skills
Excellent organizational and time management skills, including the ability to multi-task and prioritize to meet business deadlines
Strong attention to detail
Ability to work both independently and on teams
Ability to meet the minimum requirements for joining CIA, including U.S. citizenship and a background investigation
Desired Qualifications

Experience in one or more of the following areas:
Human Resources processes and data
Data analysis, research methods and ability to prepare analytic reports
Project management
Quantitative and qualitative analysis
Data visualization
Interpreting, presenting and explaining data
Working with large data sets and analyzing data from various sources
Familiarity with analytic tools and languages such as: SPSS, Tableau or other relational databases, Cognos, SQL, Python, R and Excel
What You’ll Need to Apply
Resume
Unofficial transcripts for all degrees
Cover letter in which you specify your qualifications for this position. Please address why you want to work in this role and what differentiates you from other applicants.",3804,Washington
82,"IT Project Senior Analyst, English Language Programs - Georgetown University CIED",Georgetown University,"Washington, DC 20007 (Georgetown area)",None,"Located in a historic neighborhood in the nation's capital, Georgetown offers rigorous academic programs, a global perspective, exciting ways to take advantage of Washington, D.C., and a commitment to social justice. Our community is a tight knit group of remarkable individuals interested in intellectual inquiry and making a difference in the world.

Requirements

The IT Projects Senior Analyst is a key member of the English Language Programs (ELP) team. The primary responsibility of this position is to monitor the efficient, effective, and secure functioning of the IT systems supporting the work of the four ELP units: Outreach, Fellow Program, Specialist Program, and Virtual Educator Program. This position is part of a two-person IT Projects unit, serving ELP's many stakeholders, with direct accountability to the funding agency, the U.S. Department of State (DOS), and ELP senior management at Georgetown University.

The IT Projects Senior Analyst oversees, in close collaboration with the ELP management and the second IT Projects Senior Analyst, the development of new IT projects, annual IT updates, system enhancements, ongoing maintenance, and provides quick response problem-solving for all ELP IT systems, which include but are not limited to: the proprietary online portal housing application, proposal, and participant information systems for all three programs, program website, Community of Practice (COP), Learning Management System (LMS), and Salesforce CRM.

English Language Programs, funded by the U.S. Department of State (DOS), offers short- and long-term in-country and virtual exchanges for experienced U.S. TESOL professionals at educational institutions in all regions of the world. ELP participants promote English language learning and mutual understanding through cultural exchange. The Center for Intercultural Education and Development (CIED) at Georgetown University (GU) is the current administrator of English Language Programs.

English Language Programs IT Systems Management

Performs project management duties, as assigned, for all ELP IT projects, including, but not limited to, the application/proposal portal, COP, LMS, website, and Salesforce CRM, to support and engage ELP applicants, participants, alumni, institutional partners, GU/CIED staff, and DOS stakeholders.

Facilitates the formulation and definition of systems' scope and objectives through research, fact finding, and user needs, applying throughout a deep understanding of ELP requirements.

Gathers, analyzes, maps, defines, and documents requirements for data, workflow, logical processes, and interfaces.

Monitors digital activity to ensure the efficient and effective functionality of all areas of the system, for all user roles.

Works closely with GU/CIED team managers and directors, DOS officers, and IT vendors in identifying needs, establishing project specifications, and finding creative and cost-effective solutions, in particular to develop and implement ideas for 1) ELP Outreach (recruitment, alumni engagement, and program visibility), and 2) Vetting and Implementation processes and data collection and accessibility to multiple stakeholders.

Administers the Salesforce CRM, planning and executing 1) ongoing data migration from ELP's applications and proposal portal, 2) ongoing data clean up and maintenance, 3) infrastructure design revisions, and 4) user training for DOS and GU stakeholders, to optimize the system performance and user experience and ensure data security.

Acts as project manager or co-project manager, for annual updates, ongoing maintenance, and ad hoc enhancements, for all IT systems, as assigned, communicating program requirements to the contracted system developer, facilitating meetings with stakeholders, ensuring timely and effective delivery, and performing other project management duties, as needed.

As part of scheduled enhancements and to meet ad hoc needs, designs and builds pages on ELP's website and COP, both built on WordPress.

To meet DOS and GU stakeholder requirements, designs and builds user interface features, site animation, and special effects elements; researches, selects, and installs plug-ins.

Maintains the integrated LMS on the COP to ensure its effective and smooth operation for all user stakeholders, with a strong focus on the user front-end experience.

Exercises a comprehensive knowledge of information technology, with an eye on emerging online learning modalities, to ensure the website, COP, and LMS utilize the most current best practices and services, collaborating closely with ELP's contracted IT development vendors.

Trains ELP staff in the use of the website, COP, and LMS, researching options for functionality and design, and troubleshooting any problems that arise.

Facilitates the testing of updates and enhancements, coordinating with project stakeholders for their approval, following their own testing.

Performs platform changes that can be made by staff users, or facilitates this work by ELP colleagues (e.g. new page creation, relabeling of objects, periodic system updates, etc.)

Ensures that system documentation, written by IT vendors and staff, is kept current and is easy to access and use.

Manages help desk email accounts and processes, assisting users (GU/CIED staff, applicants, DOS officers, U.S. Embassy staff, etc.) with questions and problems.

Prepares periodically scheduled and ad hoc reports, as directed, utilizing all available and relevant analytics, regarding the development and functional effectiveness of ELP IT systems.

Cybersecurity, continuity, and compliance

Maintains and reviews IT/cybersecurity policies and practices for vendor and user relationships to identify risk and to ensure systems are secure, protecting systems from intentional or inadvertent access or destruction.

Maintains situational awareness and understanding of current cybersecurity threats, in particular those that relate to the DOS relationship with users and key stakeholders.

Monitors University-wide IT requirements to keep staff and vendors informed of policies to ensure compliance for all systems.

Works directly with GU Information Security to troubleshoot any issues on ELP admin email accounts, including security breaches and spamming and leads risk assessment efforts.

Maintains current knowledge of all requirements for federal grants regarding IT projects, including design and branding guidelines.

Develops, documents, and conducts Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) for creating new user accounts, operating program IT systems, training staff, and other key functionalities.

Maintains up-to-date super-admin and end-user level familiarity with all the IT platforms utilized by the ELP IT projects, including, but not limited to Symfony, WordPress, and Salesforce.

Leads the creation and maintenance of a disaster recovery and business continuity plans.

Vendor Contracts, Accounts, and Relations

Implements vendor maintenance, quality control management and oversight of change control, at the direction of the ELP managers and directors.

Manages contracts with IT vendors selected for the development and maintenance of the IT platforms.

Creates, reviews, and scores RFPs/bids to mitigate security risks introduced by new technology relationships.

Maintains all the subscriptions needed to run the program systems.

Processes all invoices from IT vendors.

Monitors all vendor accounts to update security certificates, perform periodic upgrades, etc.

Other Duties

Facilitates operation of ELP laptops and tablets.

Backstops team members while they are out of the office.

Takes on temporary duties when team members leave their positions.

Participates in the onboarding and training process of new team members.

Performs other duties as assigned.

Work Interactions

The IT Projects Senior Analyst works closely with a second IT Projects Senior Analyst, ELP managers and the ELP director, and reports to the ELP Associate Director.

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree required

3-5 years of relevant experience required

Experience with IT project management and strategic planning

Experience designing, building, and maintaining WordPress websites

Experience designing, building, and maintaining a database management system such as Salesforce or other CRM platform

Experience working with teams to create new processes and procedures

Ability to work in a fast-paced and changing environment

Ability to understand, synthesize, and conceptualize input and requests from multiple stakeholders

Ability to independently establish objectives, plan, direct, and evaluate all aspects of work projects

Outstanding interpersonal oral and written communications skills with ability to interact and communicate technical concepts in a positive manner with a diverse clientele, including universities, membership organizations, ELP candidates and government employees

Demonstrated effort to improve operations, decrease turnaround times, streamline work processes, and work cooperatively and jointly to provide quality seamless stakeholder service

Proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite and Google software applications

Preferred qualifications

Preference for alumnus or alumna of the U.S. Department of State English Language Fellow or Specialist Programs

Experience working with federally funded exchange programs and/or educational programs

Experience working with vendors and reviewing their security practices

Experience working with IT governance documentation including identifying gaps between policy/procedure and current practice

Knowledge of technology trends and developments

Current Georgetown Employees:
If you currently work at Georgetown University, please exit this website and login to GMS ( gms.georgetown.edu ) using your Net ID and password. Then select the Career worklet on your GMS Home dashboard to view Jobs at Georgetown.

Submission Guidelines:
Please note that in order to be considered an applicant for any position at Georgetown University you must submit a cover letter and resume for each position of interest for which you believe you are qualified. These documents are not kept on file for future positions.

Need Assistance:
If you are a qualified individual with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application and hiring process, please click here for more information, or contact the Office of Institutional Diversity, Equity, and Affirmative Action (IDEAA) at 202-687-4798 or ideaa@georgetown.edu .

Need some assistance with the application process? Please call 202-687-2500. For more information about the suite of benefits, professional development and community involvement opportunities that make up Georgetown's commitment to its employees, please visit the Georgetown Works website .

EEO Statement:
Georgetown University is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer fully dedicated to achieving a diverse faculty and staff. All qualified applicants are encouraged to apply and will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity and expression, and sexual orientation), disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law .

Benefits:
Georgetown University offers a wide variety of comprehensive and competitive benefits. Benefits packages include comprehensive health, dental and vision plans, disability and life insurance coverage, retirement savings programs, tuition assistance, voluntary insurance options (including group legal, accident, and critical illness), and much more. Whatever your need, the Office of Faculty and Staff Benefits will be standing by to support you. You can learn more about the benefits offered to eligible faculty and staff at https://benefits.georgetown.edu or view the online interactive benefits guide for more information.",3804,Washington
83,"All Source Network Development Analyst, Mid",Booz Allen Hamilton,"Washington, DC",None,"The Challenge:
Critical decisions are made every single day in our government and military. What if you could use your analytical skills to help them make informed decisions? With all the information available today, it takes a skilled analyst to know how to find and interpret the best data to give their clients the right answers. As an intelligence analyst, you use your specialized regional and functional experience and your attention to detail to develop intelligence products and analytic assessments to give your client the actionable intelligence and context they need. If you have strong analytical skills and a problem-solving mindset, we have an opportunity to use those skills to support our warfighters, protect our national security, and inform our nation’s leaders.
As an intelligence analyst on our team, you’ll help your client understand the operational landscape. Using your understanding of various collection platforms, you’ll explore new data sources, build effective queries, and combine information from disparate sources, including SIGINT, GEOINT, HUMINT, and open source. You’ll validate information and apply client tradecraft as you build assessments for warfighters, senior policymakers, and the US Intelligence Community. As the authority on your portfolio, your client will look to you for time-critical recommendations, often under pressure. This is a chance to grow your expertise, develop new skills, and share your methodologies with other analysts. We focus on growing as a team to deliver the best support to our customers, so you’ll have resources for mentoring and learning new skills and tools. Join us as we provide the right information at the right time to support the critical needs of our warfighters and our nation's leaders.
Empower change with us.
You Have:
1+ years of experience with targeting or network development analysis and US government all-source analysis production within the US Intelligence Community or Combatant Command environments
Knowledge of Boolean logic and high side reporting tools, such as TAC, RMT, Palantir, Analyst Notebook, DataXplorer, or VOLTRON
Ability to develop high-quality deliverables tailored to clients who range from tactical to strategic levels, including actionable leads, complex written products, and formal or informal briefings
Active TS/SCI clearance required; willingness to take a polygraph exam
BA or BS degree
Nice If You Have:
Experience in working with collection managers and crafting requirements, conducting order of battle analysis, or implementing technical solutions for big data problems
Knowledge of the targeting life cycle
Ability to speak and read a critical foreign language at a professional level
BA or BS in International Affairs, Political Science, Foreign Area Studies or National Security Studies preferred; MA or MS in International Affairs, Political Science, Foreign Area Studies, National Security Studies, or a related research field a plus
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information; TS/SCI clearance is required.
Build Your Career:
At Booz Allen, we know the power of analytics and intelligence. When you join Booz Allen, we’ll help you develop the career you want.
Challenging projects – Whether training analysts on military equipment through VR technology; developing a simulation capability to allow teams to rehearse missions together; or integrating RFID tags into mobile devices to enable data access within a geo parameter, you’ll get to solve some of the world’s toughest problems
Meaningful work – Use your skills to empower change. Your work will keep citizens and warfighters safe and well both at home and abroad
State-of-the-art technology – Broaden your intelligence capabilities with digital forensics, telematics, precision navigation, secure mobile operations, and advanced analytics
New skills – In-house experts and partnerships with tech leaders, like Nvidia and Splunk, mean you can get practical experience with advanced GPU technologies, cybersecurity, and data science
Room to grow – You’ll be inspired to grow your career while making your ideas a reality thanks to new opportunities across the US and abroad, encouraging mentors, and collaborative colleagues
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or veteran status—to fearlessly drive change.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",3804,Washington
84,Security Analyst – Senior,CACI,"Chantilly, VA 20151",None,"Job Description
What You’ll Get to Do:
Reviews a case file to determine what additional security processing, if any, needs to be performed.
Creates written products documenting case processing, such as Memorandum for the Record and E-mail.
Advises the Sponsor of the need for additional security processing in order to render adjudicative decision and schedule or conduct additional processing at the direction of the Sponsor.
Reviews the results of all security processing to glean necessary facts and data relevant to the final recommendation.
Interviews the subject in person, by telephone, or through written correspondence to elicit clarifying information after consultation and approval of the Sponsor.
Discusses with the Senior Case Manager (SCM), Expert Adjudicators, Adjudications Board members, Polygraph Examiners, Background Investigators, Case Processing Personnel, Managers, Office of Medical Services, Customers, and other as needed to resolve information discrepancies or gaps.
Analyzes the information and indicate a nexus between the behavior of the subject and the ICD 704 issues sufficient to support a final recommendation.
Provides a final written recommendation, in sufficient detail to permit the Sponsor to make an informed, independent decision to grant, disapprove or revoke a security clearance or approval.
Maintains each security file by purging duplicate copies of SF86, unofficial notes, page flags, and other extraneous materials prior to forwarding file to the SCM. Information contained on handwritten notes shall be formalized in a Memorandum for the Record and included in the file; the information is pertinent to the adjudication, prior to removal of the handwritten note. This may require that the adjudicator accurately upload official documents into electronic file records.
Makes oral presentations to SCMs, Program Managers, Adjudication Boards, and/or other Senior Agency officials, as required.
Administers notification to the customer, identity and recommend codes of conduct issues for the Sponsor to address, input of closing information in the Office of Security (OS) data base or other tracking software/applications as needed, and/or perform other follow-up actions resulting from the disposition of the case.
Protects all information and data acquired during the preparation of the analysis from unauthorized release, employing the “need to know” principle, and return all adjudicative notes to the Sponsor.
Returns to the contractor’s point of contact cases that may give rise to an actual or potential conflict of interest, organizational or otherwise.
Responds in a timely manner to inquiries from the Sponsor on the status of pending cases or any other information pertaining to adjudicative support tasks
Manages case load effectively to meet the productivity standards set by the Sponsor.
Meets the adjudicative quality standards established by the Sponsor.
Attends meetings required for all adjudicative personnel and mandatory training courses required by the Sponsor for individuals with staff-like access.
Track cases throughout the processing stages to ensure investigative information is reviewed for relevance as it comes to completion; and capable of preparing and providing the Statement of Reasons, investigative files, executive case summaries, and First Level Review recommendations. All new information generated throughout the adjudication process is scanned and/or electronically uploaded to the electronic file.
You’ll Bring These Qualifications:
High school diploma or GED
(Advanced degree may be substituted for upwards of six months of experience) An associates or B.A./B.S. degree in English or related field of study (Degree examples include, but are not limited to Criminal Sciences, Cybersecurity, Behavioral Sciences, Management, Financial or Auditing, etc.) which has a central theme/focus related to writing in a clear, concise manner and ability to articulate and defend a logical well-reasoned conclusion based on available and/or discovered/developed information. In summary, any formally approved B.A./B.S. course of study with a related emphasis which demonstrates well developed and honed critical thinking and analysis skills.
Must possess demonstrated analytical ability and the ability to handle a large, complex workload.
Must demonstrate a high level of personal integrity and the ability to discreetly handle sensitive, personal and classified case information.
Must have excellent writing skills, with the ability to comprehend complex and multi-source data into succinct and supportable final reports.
Must possess strong organizational skills and good judgment. In addition, must be able to operate various corporate and customer specific automated systems for case tracking and status reporting.
Must have a thorough understanding of the federal rules and regulations that encompass the clearance process.
Knowledge of and ability to use standard office equipment (e.g., computers, facsimile machines, printers, scanners, reproduction machines, etc.).
Demonstrated ability to produce analytic documents that require minimal editing, unitize software tools (e.g., MS Word/Excel/Power Point).
Demonstrated understanding of the federal rules and regulations that encompass the clearance process.
Demonstrated ability to manage and prioritize multiple task assignments to meet deadlines.
Ability and skill to elicit information during an interview with minimal direction and work effectively with a variety of individuals.
Ability to adapt to changing work requirements.
Ability to provide on-the-job training to colleagues.
Must have an active TS / SCI Full Scope Polygraph Clearance.
Considerable knowledge and application of the principles of the ICD 704-Personnel Security Standards and Procedures and Governing Eligibility for Access to Sensitive Compartmented Information and Other Controlled Access Program Information as mandated through the issuance of the Presidents Executive Order (EO) 13467 Reforming Processes Related to Suitability for Government Employment, Fitness for Contractor Employees and Eligibility for Access to Classified National Security Information and endorsed by Director of National Intelligence.
Knowledge and experience may include verifiable experience in conducting background investigations, consolidating and/or processing investigative inputs, creating a comprehensive applicant profile, and/or preparing and adjudicative analysis and recommendation for the USG, or on behalf of a USG customer. While all of the above examples of ICD 704 experience are relevant, the strongest candidates will be those with prior adjudicative experience.
A minimum of 5 years of adjudicative experience in a Federal or Contractor role with the Federal Government or equivalent year(s) of experience in a related field or internship as delineated below.
Equivalent experience in a related field may include, but is not limited to the following:
Broad experience analyzing, interpreting and applying personnel security policies, standards, procedures or regulations.
Experience conducting personalized as well as secondary/final reviews of more junior level staff to ensure the accuracy, completeness and quality of final reports in compliance with ICD 704 requirements and guidelines.
Demonstrated experience in conducting pre-employment security interviews or background investigations for Federal Government job applicants, contractors and employees.
Successful completion of additional training (coaching, on the job training, training courses) to develop, enhance and/or mature personal analytical and critical thinking skill sets.
Involvement in designing or teaching a training offering aimed at developing or refining individuals analytical or critical thinking skills.
Contributions to the development and updating of Standard Operating Practices (SOPs) documenting best practices at in-depth knowledge of the organization.
Successful academic record that reflects demonstrated analytical and critical thinking skills (see Education requirements section below).
Demonstrated experience conducting interviews and subsequently summarizing and verbally presenting results to senior audiences.
Will be required to complete the ODNI Intro to National Security Adjudications Course within 30 days of deployment.
Must be able to organize and assess investigative file material against required coverage for all case types specific to the assigned program.
Ensure routine background investigation coverage, polygraph, and National Agency Checks are completed according to standards for the level of access requested, and can identify cases that meet outlined thresholds and investigative results that may warrant review of case material by Subject Matter Experts outside of customer organization.
Present case facts, analysis, and recommendations to the Adjudication Board in the presence of Government Program Managers, Senior Case Managers, and peers.
Must be capable of preparing products that capture relevant case details and present facts in a logical manner.
Must be able to compose and formalize adjudicative closing documents utilizing all investigative and/or polygraph results required to render a decision based on ICD 704 standards for access to national security information.
Must be able to submit analysis and recommendations with clear nexus between issues and/or non-issues according to ICD 704 standards. This analysis and recommendation will include identifying, supporting, and implementation of appropriate risk-mitigation strategies when appropriate.
Must be able to identify, as early as possible, any significant derogatory information that may alter the course of routine processing or warrant immediate action, and be capable of clarifying facts, able to elicit new or additional information and, if necessary, further investigate questions relevant to final adjudication.
Also, specifically required training / knowledge:
The Sponsor’s clearance adjudicative process;
Application of ICD 704 and EO 12968 to adjudicative issues.
Effective interview and briefing techniques.
pe3
BITS3
What We Can Offer You:
We’ve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nation’s highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACI’s unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
Job Location
US-Chantilly-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN


CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3804,Washington
85,Senior Information Security Analyst (Cyber Security Analyst),GW MFA,"Arlington, VA",None,"Position Summary
The Senior Information Security Analyst (Cyber Security Analyst) supports day to day information security operations such as access control, security events analysis, vulnerability management, incident response and handling, documentation, audit support, and internal/external vendors security testing. Expertise in Microsoft Windows, virtual technologies, SIEM technologies, security testing, log management and incident response are key to the role. This role will be part of the Information Security team responsible for cyber security operations.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following. To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. Other duties may be assigned.
Participate in access management activities including account provisioning, roles and permission assignment, deactivation and periodic reviews.
Consultation with users to provide SME guidance on information security, incident analysis, and problem resolution.
Perform security testing and analysis to identify security gaps and propose remediation steps
Adhere to and improve upon company policies and procedures on incident management
Operate, optimize and maintain information security tools
Maintain current knowledge of information security trends, threats and responses
Participate in all aspects of Information Security Operations including on-call duties.
Knowledge and experience in vulnerability management, and security events analysis
Familiarity with the following technologies: SIEM, Active Directory, Microsoft Windows, Linux, Juniper/Cisco firewalls, network protocols, IDS/IPS
Qualifications
Education
Preferred: Bachelor, Other Education: Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems, Math or Business or technical equivalent.
Experience
5+ years’ experience in an information security analyst/engineer role
Experience with information security best practices and security frameworks.
Technical security experiences are needed in this role.
Must be able to demonstrate the ability to provide guidance on incident analysis, and technical problem resolution.",3804,Washington
86,Federal - Business Analyst,Accenture,"Arlington, VA",None,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services Location: Chantilly, VAWe are:Accenture Federal Services, bringing together commercial innovation with the latest technology to unleash the potential for our federal clients. Every day we bring bold thinking and diverse disciplines to solve problems in new ways. Through our diverse culture, workforce, and inclusive thinking, we embrace our employees' ideas, taking them from concept to practical solutions. Ready to learn as much as you can We'll give you numerous opportunities of formal and informal training sessions to keep your tech smarts sharp.You are: The Business Analyst. Working with senior client front office leadership and other senior stakeholders to define, deploy, and execute strategic and tactical initiatives to define the future state of HR IT systems. Client imperatives may include:- Define and visualize technology strategy- Evaluate and analyze data to support technology strategy- Communicate strategy to leadership team and workforce- Evaluate uptake and execution of strategy- Assess business processes impacts to technology- Define and execute change management initiatives in support of strategy to include stakeholder assessments, communications, and end user training- Facilitate discussions in order to collaborate and obtain concurrence- Analyze technology impacts and/or technology alternatives for proposed strategy- Collect and assemble system requirements

Here's what you need:- Bachelor's degree- Minimum of 1 year of business or management consulting experience- Minimum of 1 year of proven experience using Microsoft PowerPoint to articulate and visualize messages- Minimum of 1 year of experience using Microsoft Excel to analyze raw dataThe extras:- US citizenship requiredBonus points if you have:- Good written, communication, negotiation with client, organizationImportant Information:Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States and with Accenture Federal Services.Accenture Federal Services is an EEO and Affirmative Action Employer of Females/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.Equal Employment Opportunity:All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.Accenture Federal Services is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.An active security clearance or the ability to obtain one may be required for this role.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",3804,Washington
87,Senior Counterterrorism Analyst (S/SE Asia) - TS/SCI,Assertive Professionals,"Reston, VA 20191","$95,000 - $100,000 a year ++","Assertive Professionals is in search of multiple Counterterrorism / Insurgency (CT/IA) Analysts to support the Defense Intelligence Agency's (DIA) Defense Combating Terrorism Center (DCTC). The DIA Consultant Tasks include: open source and classified research, predicative analysis, opportunities analysis and warning intelligence production, and oral presentations, in accordance with Office of the Director of National Intelligence (ODNI) Analytical Standards and in compliance with the DIA Writing Guide, and using standard DIA product lines and briefings. Customers will include senior U.S. DoD and other government officials.

Required:
Active TS/SCI Security Clearance
Demonstrate comprehensive knowledge of the concepts involved in strategic and operational analysis
Have a minimum of ten years of experience conducting strategic analysis on non-state Violent Extremist Organizations (VEO)
Have three years of experience on the South/Southeast Asia region
Possess an understanding of ODNI Analytic Standards, Sourcing Requirements for Disseminated Products, and for Writing for Maximum Utility
Be able to communicate understanding from information that may be incomplete, indirect, highly complex, seemingly unrelated, and/or technically advanced
Be able to work independently with minimal oversight and direction
Be able to lead teams in researching multifaceted or critical problems.
Demonstrate proficiency using Microsoft Office tools (e.g. Excel, Work, PowerPoint)

Desired:
Current CI Polygraph
Experience relevant to strategic and operational analysis
Bachelors degree in a relevant area from a college or university accredited by an agency recognized by the US Department of Education

Total yearly compensation: $95,000.00-$100,000.00

Candidates meeting the minimum qualifications for this position can expect a starting salary at $95,000.00. Candidates who possess additional desired qualifications can expect a higher starting salary, up to a maximum of $100,000.00.
A 10% shift differential is provided for hours worked outside of core working hours (before 6am and after 6pm).
In addition, hired analysts are eligible for either a $1,000.00 sign-on bonus OR $2,000.00 cost-reimbursable relocation bonus.",3804,Washington
88,NDMS Junior Business Analyst,ICON GPHS,"Washington, DC",None,"ICON Government and Public Health specializes in preclinical through phase IV support of clinical research and clinical trial services for biologics, drugs, and devices. We help our customers get their products to market faster with a wide array of research, regulatory, and sponsor services both within the US and around the globe and respond rapidly to global health crises.
Position Summary:
The Office of the Assistant Secretary for Preparedness and Response (ASPR) is a public health preparedness and emergency response organization in the Office of the Secretary at the United States Department of Health and Human Services. ASPR was created under the Pandemic and All Hazards Preparedness Act in the wake of Hurricane Katrina to lead the nation in preventing, preparing for, and responding to the adverse health effects of public health emergencies and disasters. The National Disaster Medical System is a Division (NDMS) within the Office of Emergency Management (OEM) who reports to the ASPR. This position will support NDMS in various aspects.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Ability to work within short and specific timelines for task distribution and completion· -Perform Data entry within the NDMS business system (Response Management System)
Create, develop, and modify reporting metrics for senior leadership review
Develop and maintain various tracking mechanisms using MSOffice suite products
Download, scan, file and search documents for additional actions in support of hiring and training initiatives
Various other administrative responsibilities as necessary to achieve the mission of NDMS
Participate in meetings/conference calls at the direction of the government project lead/Branch Chief; create agendas and take minutes
Background in developing educational and training curriculum including Points of Instruction documents and a background in education for adult learners
Create documents for training events
Complete all personnel training activities required to support contract requirements (e.g. security, records management, database applications, etc.
Reasonable Accommodation Statement:
To accomplish this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform, with or without reasonable accommodation, each essential function satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to help enable qualified individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Laboratory/office environment; may require working evenings and weekends. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to manipulate objects, tools or controls; reach with hands and arms; climb stairs; balance; stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl; talk or hear. Work may involve long periods of standing and handling of numerous chemicals and/or hazardous biological material. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.
Experience
Required
Ability to obtain Public Trust clearance
MS Office expertise
Preferred
Public Health Preparedness and Response experience
Ability to work efficiently in a fast-paced environment
Experience with creating training resources, leadership briefings/metrics, and additional resources
Education
Required
Bachelors or better
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3804,Washington
89,Cyber Threat Intelligence Analyst,BAE Systems,"Reston, VA 20190 (Sunset Hills area)",None,"BAE Systems has a job opening for a Senior Cyber Intelligence Analyst in Reston, VA.


Function as a senior-level intelligence analyst for the BAE Global Security Operations Center. Work with a team of Security Analysts and Engineers to support a global security operations capability. Lead the cyber threat intelligence effort on a team of cyber analysts. You will be responsible for pro-active threat intelligence gathering from open and closed sources.

Required Education, Experience, & Skills

Understanding of cyber threat indicators and how they are used to identify cyber attacks.
Understanding of indicator enrichment process.
Ability to write threat reports for senior management.

Preferred Education, Experience, & Skills

-Requirements-Experience using large data sets to conduct research, discover relationships, and correlate threat data from various sources - including whois data, passive DNS, and open source malware repositoriesPossess a strong understanding of analytic tradecraft, deductive reasoning, and critical thinking skillsKnowledge of incident handling and incident response. Experience providing intelligence analysis support as part of a team that performs in-depth technical analysis of network intrusion incidentsAbility to write threat intelligence briefings for senior management.
Ability to task other towers with content creation based on threat intelligence reporting.Experience working in a Security Operations Center (SOC), Managed Security Service (MSS), or enterprise network environmentStrong interpersonal and communication skills

-Responsibilities-Directly support SOC operations, malware analysis and network/endpoint threat hunting teams with actionable intelligence productsIdentify emerging threat actors and track existing actors as their tactics, techniques and procedures evolve over timeCollect and analyze all source intelligence products and generate strategic and tactical-level threat intelligence productsDevelop a sophisticated understanding of actor capabilities and intentions. Prioritize and routinely brief team members and senior decision makers on threat actors targeting the corporate network.Create and share incident reports for external partners
About BAE Systems, Inc.
BAE Systems is a premier global defense and security company with approximately 90,000 employees delivering a full range of products and services for air, land and naval forces, as well as advanced electronics, security, information technology solutions and customer support and services. People are the greatest asset in any Company. BAE Systems is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce.",3804,Washington
90,Data Analyst,ID.me,"McLean, VA",None,"Overview

ID.me is a digital identity network with a mission to make the world a more trusted place by facilitating transparent and efficient interactions between people and organizations. We are looking for a Data Analyst to join our growing data team and support our G&A functions by quickly delivering insights, reviewing and developing metrics, and contributing to the improvement of business processes to support our explosive growth.

The ideal candidate must be interested in supporting various areas of the company including Human Resources, Recruiting, Legal, Finance, and pitching in where needed.
Responsibilities

Collect, analyze, and explain data to key stakeholders and executive leadership
Run reports and gather valuable insights from various HR tools (Greenhouse, Ultipro, etc)
Identify trends across data and make recommendations to senior management
Be a data evangelist: collaborate with both technical and non-technical teammates to supplement decisions with quantitative evidence
Always be auditing: build and maintain processes to track data and troubleshoot errors
Build and automate tools to surface key data to stakeholders across a broad range of data literacy levels
Provide ad hoc analysis and forecasting as needed across a diverse set of teams

Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field such as Accounting, Economics, Engineering, Finance, Math, Statistics or similar
Data-driven, detail-oriented nature with excellent analysis and problem-solving abilities
Previous experience using data to communicate results to key stakeholders
Excellent verbal and written communication skills: the ability to present complex data in a digestible format to stakeholders of all data literacy levels
Fluency with SQL data manipulation and experience with building models in Excel
Comfortable creating dashboards in a BI framework such as Tableau, Looker, Google Data Studio, or comparable tools
Ability to handle multiple projects simultaneously: superb time management and prioritization ability
Ability to work independently and autonomously, as well as part of a team

Vision: To be the world's leading digital identity network empowering people to control their own information and to prove their credentials across all channels: online, call center, and in-person.

Mission: To make the world a more trusted place by delivering the highest level of security with the least amount of friction at the lowest possible cost.

People: We have an audacious mission. We aim to fix the identity layer of the internet. Billions of people will live better lives with more trust and convenience thanks to ID.me. We are like Special Forces. We take on the most difficult challenges with amazing teammates.

ID.me Core Values: *Don't be a jerk. *Always compete. *Ask questions like a 5-year old. *Inspire people with your passion. *Make something better every day. *Treat each customer like your favorite family member. *Own your mistakes so you can learn from them. *Details are everything. *Communicate like a scientist. *Be truthful (even when it's hard). *Reflect ID.me's values in your actions. *Act like an owner.

ID.me Career Site & Culture Deck: https://www.id.me/careers

ID.me maintains a work environment free from discrimination, where employees are treated with dignity and respect. All ID.me employees share in the responsibility for fulfilling our commitment to equal employment opportunity. ID.me does not discriminate against any employee or applicant on the basis of age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. ID.me adheres to these principles in all aspects of employment, including recruitment, hiring, training, compensation, promotion, benefits, social and recreational programs, and discipline. In addition, ID.me's policy is to provide reasonable accommodation to qualified employees who have protected disabilities to the extent required by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances where a particular employee works. Upon request we will provide you with more information about such accommodations.

Please review our Privacy Policy, including our CCPA policy, at id.me/privacy. If you provide ID.me with any personally identifiable information you confirm that you have read and agree to be bound by the terms and conditions set out in our Privacy Policy.

ID.me participates in E-Verify.",3804,Washington
91,"Administrative Analyst, Junior – Navy Programs",Strategic Insight LTD,"Washington, DC",None,"Strategic Insight, Ltd. is seeking a Junior Administrative Analyst with experience in the Navy Enlisted Surface Warfare Specialty (ESWS) or US Marine Corps Administrative MOS for Navy program management and administrative services support to our Navy client from our office located in S.E. Washington, D.C.Strategic Insight, Ltd., established 1985, is committed to sustaining excellence and quality growth across our workforce as we strive to improve our clients services and products. Strategic Insight staff members enjoy opportunities for growth and are provided with robust benefits from healthcare and 401K, to merit bonuses. This position will give you the opportunity to make a positive impact within a collaborative team environment.**SummaryThis position requires working 43 hours a week at our office located at 300M Street S.E., Washington, D.C., in support of our Navy client located at the Washington Navy Yard, in routine 8.5-hour day within a 0800-1800 operating environment.**Responsibilities include but are not limited to: Provided Government administrative support to include Schedule/Calendar ManagementProvide Action item tracker supportDeveloping and briefing PowerPoint presentations to mid/senior staff.Conducting Navy program related research as directed by staff.Drafting, editing, and proof-reading documents and correspondence.Responsible for correspondence management.Assists with maintenance of records management systems to ensure records are accurately documented and stored.Generate records management reports.Success for working in this position requires: Proficiency with MS Office (Outlook, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint), to include the ability to create spreadsheets, presentations, and prepare specialized reports.Knowledge of DoD processes and organizations.Digital office experience a plusNAVSEA MAC/SAAR experience desiredExcellent understanding of data and records management.High degree of attention to detail and accuracy in completing assignments, including good sense of design, proof reading, grammar, and analytical skills.Ability to effectively communicate and work with others at all levels, as a team member.Ability to work with sensitive and confidential information.Self-starter, goal-oriented individual who provides timely feedback on progress made on assignments.Excellent organizational skills; ability to prioritize and coordinate multiple tasks, handle complex assignments, and work in a fast-paced environment.Excellent oral and written communication skills.Education and ExperienceHS diploma; any college is a plus.Navy enlisted shipboard experience either in a technical or administrative rating strongly desired.Enlisted Surface Warfare Specialist (ESWS) qualification desired.US Marine Corps Admin MOS also acceptable.Mandatory Requirement:  Applicants selected for this position may be subject to a Government Security Investigation and must meet eligibility for access to classified information at the Secret clearance level. Can start with Interim Secret clearance.The above information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees in this classification. It is not designed to contain or to be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of the employee assigned to this job.Strategic Insight, Ltd. is an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to providing equal opportunity to all applicants and employees in full compliance with all applicable state and federal laws prohibiting discrimination on the basis of race, color, age, gender, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other class protected by applicable state or federal law.Job Type: Full-time",3804,Washington
92,Senior FMS Program Analyst,The Columbia Group,"Washington, DC 20003 (Capitol Hill area)",None,"The Columbia Group (TCG), is a technical services support company which has a successful 50+ year history of providing the United States Military with acquisition, logistics management, engineering, design, fabrication, test and evaluation, information technology and financial management support services. As a full-time employee of The Columbia Group, you will receive a comprehensive benefits package to include a quality health insurance program (medical, drug, vision and dental) for you and your family, group life insurance, group short and long-term disability insurance, a 401K Profit Sharing Retirement Plan, Flexible Spending Account, and professional development opportunities. You will accrue 'Paid Time Off' (PTO) to be used towards vacation or sick leave, in addition to receiving ten (10) paid Federal holidays.
Upon award, we are hiring several Senior Foreign Military Sales (FMS) Program Analysts to join our team in Washington, DC. The ideal candidates will:
Research and provide analysis for the development of Price and Availability (P&A) and Letters of Offer and Acceptance (LOA).
Prepare documentation for implementation, execution, reconciliation, and closure of FMS cases.
Prepare briefs and reports including case, Record Serial Number (RSN), Program Directive Line Item (PDLI) summaries, Program Management Review (PMR) documentation and presentation materials/briefs, and country correspondence.
Gather, analyze, and provide data compiled from a variety of sources in preparation for reviews and meetings; then produce this data in the form of various exhibits, reports, letters, schedules, studies, charts, and presentation material.
Provide support for development of FMS cases in Defense Security Assistance Management System (DSAMS) .
Assist in updating P&A, LOA, Amendment, Modification, and Obligational Authority (OA) Revision data packages in DSAMS.
Interact with Navy International Programs Office (NIPO) for resolution of case development issues
Compile, analyze data, provide feedback, and maintain data/files related to development of FMS cases.
Attend meetings, Continental United States (CONUS) or Outside Continental United States (OCONUS), to prepare agendas, presentations and documents, take and track minutes, and maintain records of these meetings
Provide FMS case execution efforts to include market research for alternative solutions as well as requisition/procurement processing and tracking through the ordering, manufacturing, and delivery processes.

Required Education, Skills, and Experience:
Bachelor's Degree from an accredited institution.
A minimum of 10 years of FMS experience. (US Navy FMS experience preferred but not required)
An active Secret security clearance.
US citizenship is a prerequisite.

*This position is contingent upon award*",3804,Washington
93,Associate,Ankura,"Washington, DC",None,"Ankura is a team of excellence founded on innovation and growth.
ABOUT
Ankura: Ankura Consulting Group is recognized as one of the five fastest growing consulting companies, with 1,500 employees across 32 offices in 4 continents. The Company provides services to its client on expert witness, bankruptcy and corporate restructuring, litigation support, forensic accounting, geopolitical risk assessment, and general management consulting services. Ankura Consulting Group headquarters is based in Washington, USA.
Practice: The Managed Data Protection Services is part of the Global Cyber Security and Privacy vertical.
ROLE OVERVIEW
Cyber Security Analysts are the first line of defense at our Security Operations Center (SOC). The Cyber Security Analyst is an associate role that provides expert Network Security analysis for Ankura's portfolio of clients in a 24x7 operational setup and reports to a senior member of the Network Traffic Analysis team. Analysts actively review alerts and reported behaviors from a variety of security performs. Analysts conduct the deeper investigation of events and other data elements for possible threats. Analysts work directly with clients in an incident response lead or support role. Analysts make determinations of threat potential from network and host events, building an understanding of risk and helping Ankura, and its clients understand those risks as well as mitigation strategies.
TECHNICAL
Elastic, Logstash, Kibana.
Traditional SIEM ArcSight ESM, Splunk.
Lucene, Python, and/or other similar programming/query/scripting languages
Emerging SIEM such as SNYPR, Exabeam, Empow.
Snort / Surricata / Zeek / Wireshark.
Endpoint awareness for Carbon Black, CrowdStrike, Cylance, Cybereason.
Security platforms such as Proofpoint, BlueCoat.
Open-source frameworks like Security Onion.
Experience of conducting research analysis and data gathering requirements to present in a report format.
Comfortable working in a cloud-based work environment including web-based team management and collaboration applications, and time keeping systems e.g., Slack, Microsoft Teams, Intapp, Workday.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Duties include monitoring Security Information Event Management (SIEM) platforms for correlated events and working with the client to take action. Analysts leverage events to determine the impact, document possible causes and provide useful information to clients. A deep understanding of various commercial and open-source network sensors, intrusion detection systems and event log correlation engines is required. Analysts are expected to deliver enhanced threat awareness and knowledge through research and continuous improvement of use cases, signatures, and metrics. Analysts are also expected to maintain open communication and visibility with their team members, Senior Analysts, Directors, and Clients. Ordinarily employees will be office based; however due to the pandemic employees will remain working from home until permitted to return to the office in line with government recommendations and Ankura’s posture.
REQUIRED SKILLS
CAPABILITIES
Should have some formal training or experience in delivering Managed Security or Managed Detection and Response Services.
Should have a sound understanding and up to date knowledge of common security threats, attack vectors, vulnerabilities, exploits, and Network Architecture / Protocols (such as OSI, TCP/IP, P2P, etc.) and Packet Analysis.
Should have the Hands-on experience to correlate and analyze information from a wide variety of enterprise technologies including but not limited to SIEM, UEBA, ETDR, IDS, IPS, Proxy, Firewall, DLP, and other Threat intelligence tools for anomalous activity and items of interest.
Should have the necessary experience to conduct initial triage of security events and incidents; determine the priority, criticality, and impact; facilitate communication within the SOC, escalate to the client for containment and remediation, and document/journal progress throughout the Incident Response Lifecycle within the respective service level objectives.
Familiarity with Python and/or other similar programming/SCRIPTING languages is preferred.
Should be able to develop/follow standard processes and complete documentation as needed.
Detail-oriented and able to work independently and communicate effectively both verbally and in writing.
Must be flexible enough to work in both 12hrs x 4days / 9hrs x 5days a week rotational shift setup, including overnight, weekend, and National holidays.
INDIVIDUAL & TEAMWORK
Must be able to effortlessly switch between independent and team-based work
Understands that the work product is dependent on team efforts and remains responsive to internal and external deadlines
Able to share expertise and experience with team members to encourage growth and shared success
Able to maintain focus and attention to detail for sustained periods of time
Engaged in supporting development and growth of all team members
COMMUNICATION
Ability to communicate complex ideas effectively, both verbally and in writing in English and the local office language(s)
Able to provide reports showing progress or achievement of assigned goals and responsibilities as required.
Must be an active listener and ask questions of others when clarity is needed
Ability to gain understanding of client needs and apply an analytic reasoning
Demonstrates proactive engagement in meetings and process discussions
Fluent in English, verbally and written.
GROWTH MINDSET
Can receive and provide feedback in a constructive manner that leads to the growth of self and others.
Displays perseverance of effort and passion for a long-term goal and end state.
Works well under timelines and puts in extra effort as required to meet timelines.
Self-motivated to identify areas for team & process improvement and collaborate with others to develop creative solutions.
LEADERSHIP TRAITS
Able to advance and supervise and encourage development of junior staff.
Willing to adapt leadership skills to support larger and more complex projects.
Work product for self and team is consistently of excellent quality and efficiency.
Respectful and professional in all interactions with team members, clients, and other professionals.
Maintains composure and calm disposition under high-pressure or stressful circumstances.
EDUCATION, TRAINING & CERTIFICATIONS
Preferred to have a degree in CS/IT with relevant security certifications or a Diploma in the field of Security or Network from specialized schools like CDAC.
KEY PERFORMANCE INDICATORS
Deliver client reports based on analysis that are timely, high quality, and accurate.
Improved reporting works to avoid ‘analysis paralysis’.
Client satisfaction and becoming a client lead analyst.
#LI-Remote
#LI-AE1
Ankura is proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to fostering a diverse and inclusive environment where mutual respect and collaboration is paramount. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, disability, protected veteran status, national origin, or any other legally protected status.",3804,Washington
94,Regional Analyst,Geographic Services,"McLean, VA 22102",None,"Geographic Services, Inc., located in McLean, VA, is recruiting qualified Regional Analyst-Human Geographer candidates to fulfill the duties and responsibilities described in the Position Description below. This is a full-time position for task orders under a newly awarded contract.
Description: The successful candidate will be a member of an integrated government-contractor team providing direct support to U.S. National Security objectives. The regional analyst-human geographer will serve as a regional subject matter expert on issues related to human geography, socio-cultural analysis, and geospatial analysis in support of the Intelligence Community (IC). Specifically, the Regional Analyst-Human Geographer will leverage their advanced knowledge and experience with digital cartography, computer technology, Geographical Information Systems (GIS), Cartographic and Geospatial production techniques, remote sensing, photogrammetry, and digital data formats to extract relevant information and develop geospatial intelligence reports and products for the customer.
Required Skills:
Knowledge and experience with digital cartography, computer technology, Geographical Information Systems (GIS), Cartographic and Geospatial production techniques, remote sensing, photogrammetry, and digital data formats.
Knowledge and experience with cross-platform, commercial and government exploitation tools such as ArcMap, ERDAS IMAGINE, MapInfo, Remote View, Arc View, FoxPro, Arc INFO, Arc IMS, Dynamo, GeoMedia Professional, and e-mail and common office software to include spreadsheets and word processing.
Demonstrated MS Word, PowerPoint, and graphic design skills.
Demonstrated participation in and/or directing the activities of highly skilled technical and analytical teams responsible for developing solutions to highly complex analytical/intelligence problems.
Demonstrated oral and written communication skills.
Demonstrated customer support skills.
Be a self-starter, be able to work alone, yet be able to share information with team members and customers in a timely manner.
Understanding of NGA’s Geospatial Policies like International Policy, Co-Production, and dissemination of data.
Collaborating effectively with NGA regional analysts, geospatial analysts, imagery analysts, military officers, cartographers, intelligence analysts, engineers, technicians, managers, vendors, or other customers.
Knowledge gained through cartographic experience, regional accounts, imagery tasks, program management, or geospatial tasks.
Qualifications:
U.S. Citizenship is required
Active Top Secret/SCI security clearance required. Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information; Top Secret clearance is required.
Bachelor’s degree and 1+ years as an Apprentice, 3+ years as a Journeyman, 11+ years as a Senior, and 15+ years as an Expert Regional Analyst-Human Geographer. A bachelor’s degree in a GIS, scientific or equivalent discipline is desired.
Geographic Services, Inc. is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action-Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. U.S. Citizenship is required.",3804,Washington
95,"Senior Analyst, Facility Operations",Sony Corporation of America,"Herndon, VA",None,"Sony Corporation of America , located in New York, NY, is the U.S. headquarters of Sony Group Corporation, based in Tokyo, Japan. Sony's principal U.S. businesses include Sony Electronics Inc., Sony Interactive Entertainment LLC, Sony Music Entertainment, Sony Music Publishing and Sony Pictures Entertainment Inc. With some 900 million Sony devices in hands and homes worldwide today, a vast array of Sony movies, television shows and music, and the PlayStation Network, Sony creates and delivers more entertainment experiences to more people than anyone else on earth. To learn more: www.sony.com/en .

Sony Corporation of America (SCA), is seeking a Senior Analyst, Facility Operations to join the Global Information Security Department organization in Herndon, Va. This position will report to the Vice President and General Manager of Operations and is responsible for overseeing facilities, reception, and security functions; logistics and site requirements planning; establishing office process and protocols; and organizing employee events as a key part of the Global Information Security Department (GISD).

Responsibilities:
Oversee the office management functions to include, the office manager, reception and security operations
Coordinate and manage project tasks to ensure project delivery within allotted budget and timelines.
Develop facility requirements and plans to support the workforce
Manage site COVID protocols and ensure adherence
Assist with site support vendor management
Maintain business continuity plans
Provide support for audio/visual (A/V) equipment to support meetings and conferences
Communicate workplace safety precautions to employees, as needed
Coordinate and assist with in-office logistics including, A/V and catering needs for large meetings and events
Plan and organize Volunteer Day and annual Holiday Party activities
Handle logistics for offsite events (conference space and hotel negotiations, etc.)
Perform other duties as assigned
Qualifications:
3-5 years’ experience as in facility management or front office management
Knowledge of general operational requirements. safety precautions related to facilities management
Ability to develop plans and procedures with limited oversight
Experience with event planning
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to prioritize multiple tasks and formulate responses/recommendations to customers and team members
Sound problem resolution, judgment, negotiating and decision-making skills
Strong work ethic and commitment to accomplish assigned tasks
All candidates must be authorized to work in the USA
Sony is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religious creed, sex (including pregnancy), gender, national origin, citizenship, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, military status, status as a veteran or disabled veteran, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital or family status, genetic information, medical condition, or any other basis protected by applicable federal, state, or local law, ordinance, or regulation.
Disability Accommodation for Applicants to Sony Corporation of America
Sony Corporation of America provides reasonable accommodation for qualified individuals with disabilities and disabled veterans in job application procedures. For reasonable accommodation requests, please contact us by email at careers@sonyusa.com or by mail to: Sony Corporation of America, Human Resources Department, 25 Madison Avenue, New York, NY 10010. Please indicate the position you are applying for.
EEO is the Law
EEO is the Law Supplement
Right to Work (English/Spanish)
E-Verify Participation (English/Spanish)",3804,Washington
96,Senior Program Analyst - Healthcare Transformation,Aptive,"Washington, DC",None,"Join Aptive as a Program Analyst supporting the delivery of health system transformation and innovation, implementation and operations support, and healthcare business enabling services to the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) Veterans Health Administration (VHA).

This position is ideally suited for a mid-career consultant interested in applying demonstrated experience in a large-scale, integrated Health Care System to similar programs and projects in the Federal Government. Prior work in substantive programs focused on Veterans health care and outreach is equally sought after in this role.

The Program Analyst shall also assist VHA in the identification of program resources and assist in the development of program reports. The Senior Program Analyst shall have proven and extensive experience in a large-scale integrated Health Care System and with substantive programs focused on Veterans health care and outreach, preferred.
In this role, you will analyze, measure and evaluate the effectiveness, quality and outcomes of current and future VHA healthcare programs to deliver informed improvement solutions. Your critical input on program organization and management will increase productivity and program performance within projects at various levels in VHA. You'll also identify program resources and be a key player in developing program reports. As you work with your client and project team to establish goals and objectives based on those solutions, you will also assist in operational program delivery and execution.

You'll use critical and analytical thinking to help achieve goals, drive growth and measure success. Prior experience in management consulting, including areas such as data analytics, project management, process engineering, business analysis, or change management are strongly encouraged to apply.
This full-time work is located in Washington, DC. There are multiple positions available. These positions are primarily telework until COVID-19 social distancing restrictions are lifted.
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS.
8+ years of experience in general management consulting, including areas such as healthcare administration, data analytics, project management, process engineering or change management.
Bachelor's degree in healthcare administration, business, communications, management, statistics, analytics, finance or a related field.
Experience supporting the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA), Veterans Health Administration (VHA) and/or similar Federal organization required.
An active VA security clearance strongly preferred.
Ability to work in Washington, DC at least 3 days per week.
Legal authorization to work in the U.S.
JOB DUTIES.
Engage in research to measure, govern and evaluate performance.
Conduct detailed analyses to draw conclusions and develop pertinent and insightful recommendations.

Utilize critical and analytical thinking skills to assist in determining clients' projects and programs requirements.
Ensure clear communication, organization and coordination between multiple stakeholders.
Present content that addresses client needs in solutioning sessions to drive toward a decision and/or validate decisions with client leadership to drive growth and progress.
Create business case decision models, customer financial models, or execute process mapping to optimize clients' operational productivity, forecasting and budgeting processes.

Provide administrative support, event planning, and other ad-hoc tasks as needed.
DESIRED SKILLS.
Strong organization, prioritization, teamwork, critical thinking and analytical skills.

Capability to work independently and manage multiple tasks and assignments.
Ability to work effectively as part of a multidisciplinary and geographically dispersed team.
Desire to work in a fast-paced, rapidly evolving environment; ability to get up to speed quickly on complex issues.
Capable self-starter with a drive to get all types of work done and high attention to detail.
Outstanding written and verbal communications skills; demonstrated capability to communicate thoughts, ideas and solutions logically in any situation.
ABOUT THE CLIENT.
The U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) Veterans Health Administration (VHA) delivers integrated, coordinated healthcare to Veterans nationwide across a variety of areas, including high reliability, electronic health records management, healthcare modernization and transformation, healthcare financial management business transformation, healthcare human resources, healthcare regulatory compliance, healthcare analytics, mental health and suicide prevention, access to care and population health.

ABOUT APTIVE.
Aptive is a modern federal consulting firm focused on human experience, digital services and business transformation. Our employees receive competitive compensation, along with company-paid health care and short-term disability plans. We also offer a 401K plan with company match, paid time off, flexible savings accounts, commuter benefits and company-sponsored professional education opportunities.

Our work inspires people, fuels change and makes an impact. Join our team to be part of positive change in your community and our nation.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER.
Aptive is an equal opportunity employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, parental status, veteran status, age, disability or any other protected class.
Veterans, members of the Reserve and National Guard, and transitioning active-duty service members are highly encouraged to apply.",3804,Washington
97,Senior/Principal Language Analyst,Raytheon Intelligence & Space,"Herndon, VA 20170",None,"Businesses Raytheon Intelligence & Space
Clearance type Secret - Current
Relocation eligible No
Ability to Telecommute Temporary telecommuting - during COVID-19
Job ID 176430BR
Date posted 03/01/2021
City Herndon
State VA
Country United States
Raytheon Technologies is seeking a motivated and experienced Linguistic Analyst for a legacy language based project with a native level fluency in one of the following languages: Arabic, Turkish,Swahili, Somali, Tuareg, Hausa, African French, Bahasa/Indonesian, Pashto, Uzbek or Urdu. You will be part of a linguistic analytical team providing operational language/translation support to in a highly fluid and fast paced environment for a commercial client in Herndon, VA.


You must be proficient at reviewing and analyzing complex foreign language source material for content and significance; transcribing/translating advanced graphic and/or voice language material into modern American English or a targeted language in either verbatim or gisted format; providing detailed assessments of current events based on the collection, research and analysis of open source information foreign language material; providing quality control of transcripts and translations; preparing and providing quality control of reports; preparing and presenting detailed and unique technical briefings; and sharing language expertise. You should be adept in multiple social media platforms.

You may also perform activities across analytical linguistic disciplines including but not limited to: linguistic review, analysis and reporting; all-source analytic research, training and reporting; analytic methodology development, training and application; employment of various analytic capabilities. You may assist in developing and maintaining relationships and partnerships with customers, stakeholders, peers, and partners.

You must be able to adapt when facing changes in the work environment while maintaining effectiveness. Seek new areas for learning while creating and taking advantage of those opportunities. As a member of a team participate in the completion of goals. Provide an individual or groups with clear information or ideas through a variation of media. With any work situation be open to try unique ways to deal with problems.

Primary responsibilities include:
Reviews and analyzes foreign language source material for content and significance
Transcribes/translates advanced graphic and/or voice language material into modern American English or a targeted language in either verbatim or gisted format
Prepares assessments of current events based on the collection, research, analysis and interpretations of classified and open source information foreign language material
Provides quality control of transcripts, translations and reports
Develops and implements translation methodology and quality control procedures and standards
Drafts and presents technical briefings
Shares language expertise
Operates transcription equipment.
This position requires an active (or ability to obtain) U.S. Security Clearance, for which the US Government requires US Citizenship. This position is contingent upon program/customer concurrence. Candidates must be willing to undergo a rigorous background check.

Required Skills:
Must be fluent (written and verbal) in one of the following languages:
Arabic, Turkish,Swahili, Somali, Tuareg, Hausa, African French, Bahasa/Indonesian, Pashto, Uzbek or Urdu
5 or more years of experience with Open Source Technology
Willing and able to obtain a U.S. Government security clearance
Desired Skills:
Adept with multiple Social Media platforms
Current US Secret Clearance or higher preferred
Required Education (including Major):
Bachelor's degree or 8 years experience in lieu of degree.
This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.
176430

Raytheon Technologies is An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status, age or any other federally protected class.",3804,Washington
98,Senior Program Analyst,"Orbis, Inc.","Washington, DC 20003 (Navy Yard area)",None,"Senior Program Analyst
Washington, DC
Responsibilities:
The Analyst will directly support the Program Manager and Deputy Program Manager for the CVN 78 Program Office (PMS 378) in the execution of the program.
Assist in drafting, editing, proofreading and formatting a variety of communication materials to include briefing materials, awards, manuals, procedures, plans, and official Dept of Navy documents to ensure consistent tone, format and standard of excellence.
Provide front office administrative support by performing other administrative duties as assigned. This position is a high visibility, customer facing position, and will frequently meet with senior members of the PMS 378 leadership team.
Requirements:
Ideal candidate should have 5-10 years relevant or specialized experience in NAVSEA program office support. In particular, pertaining to the following areas:
Must be independent, highly organized and able to work on multiple projects with competing deadlines at the same time.
Must be resourceful, take initiative, and be able to execute high-quality, high-visibility products in accordance with deadlines.
Strong written and verbal communication skills. Ability to produce content independently, using correct spelling and grammar.
Team player able to work with government and contractor technical and administrative teams.
Expertise with Microsoft Office (Word, PowerPoint, Excel in particular).
Familiarity with Aircraft Carrier construction, overhaul, or sustainment a plus.
Bachelor’s Degree or higher strongly preferred
US Citizen with Secret Security Clearance

ORBIS offers an excellent benefits package and competitive salary in a professional atmosphere.",3804,Washington
99,Security Researcher,Rapid7,"Arlington, VA",None,"Do you enjoy information security research and threat intelligence? Do you have experience developing detections? Would you like the opportunity to research the latest threats and techniques used by attackers?
Rapid7 Managed Detection and Response operate around-the-clock to identify vulnerabilities, detect breaches, respond and investigate attacker activity, and help our customers improve their ability to deal with threats.
We are looking for a Senior Security Researcher to research and develop detections set to power Rapid7's detection and response products and services.
This position is on our Threat Intelligence and Detection Engineering (TIDE) team and is located in our flagship SOC in Arlington, Virginia. The TIDE team is responsible for threat intelligence, detection engineering and malware analysis at Rapid7. Our mission is to curate threat intelligence and maintain visibility in order to create alerting worthy of human review through applied research and observation of malicious actor behavior. Our vision is to know when, by whom and why. We work across the incident lifecycle to build detections and identify patterns of activities to better understand an adversary's actions, expedite response, and constantly update the collective understanding of threats. In addition to leveraging this knowledge to arm our analysts and incident responders, we also provide actionable threat intelligence to Rapid7 customers in the form of security advisories and quarterly threat reports.
Responsibilities:
Research to develop detections for Rapid7 products and services.
Write advanced and multistage detections for various systems.
Create tools using scripting (Python) and various web services (REST API's)
Track detections along the intelligence lifecycle, identifying when they need to be updated or retired.
Be an escalation point for junior TIDE team members and Rapid7 internal customers.
Requirements:
5+ years of threat intelligence, detection writing or malware analysis (creating/tuning network IDS signatures, analyzing netflow/firewall traffic, building SIEM alerting rules).
Prior experience with Endpoint Detection & Response (EDR).
Expert knowledge of common operating systems, services, networking protocols, logging, attacker techniques and tools.
Expert knowledge of what visibility exists and how best to alert on attacker activity.
Prior operational experience leveraging threat intelligence to detect and respond to adversaries.
A strong understanding of the current threat landscape including the latest tactics, tools, and procedures, common malware variants, and effective techniques for detecting this malicious activity.
Malware analysis and reverse engineering (sandboxing and disassemblers like IDA Pro)
Strong written and verbal skills.
Differentiators:
Prior MSSP experience.
Scripting/development experience (Python).
Detection writing (Snort/Suricata, YARA, Cuckoo, etc)
#LI-MM2",3804,Washington
100,Senior Intelligence Analyst- Open Source,"Bluehawk, LLC","Reston, VA",None,"Overview:

Bluehawk is seeking a Senior Open Source Analyst to work in Reston, VA.
Responsibilities:

Conducts all-source analytic production on sources and products of information available from public, private, and U.S. and foreign Government open source materials within established security protocols.
Analyzes foreign and domestic-based publicly available information to identify trends, patterns, and relationships that provide unique insights to address defense intelligence requirements.
Qualifications:
Demonstrates in-depth knowledge and understanding of the labor category activities required to meet mission requirements.
Demonstrates mastery of qualitative and quantitative analytic methodologies and pursue developments in academia or other fields that affect tradecraft methodology.
Demonstrates ability to define comprehensive, new, or unique research approaches that enable rigorous assessments to address and contribute to high-level tasks.
Demonstrates in-depth analysis of analytic operations and knowledge management issues across organizational and intra-IC boundaries and clearly articulates key findings.
Demonstrates ability to work independently and with minimal oversight.
Demonstrates ability to review analytic products for cogent arguments, tradecraft standards, and adequate support for conclusions; routinely tests analytic rigor of analytic products.

Desired Education:

Master’s degree in an area related to the labor category from a college or university accredited by an agency recognized by the U.S. Department of Education; or have Bachelor’s degree related to the labor category from a college or university accredited by an agency recognized by the U.S. Department of Education and an additional 5 years of related senior experience, for a total of 17 years, as a substitute to the Master’s degree.
Bluehawk, LLC. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
EOE Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity",3804,Washington
101,"Policy Analyst, Health Program",Bipartisan Policy Center,"Washington, DC 20005 (Downtown area)",None,"The Bipartisan Policy Center is a Washington, DC-based think tank that actively fosters bipartisanship by combining the best ideas from both parties to promote health, security, and opportunity for all Americans. Our policy solutions are the product of informed deliberations by former elected and appointed officials, business and labor leaders, and academics and advocates who represent both sides of the political spectrum. BPC prioritizes one thing above all else: getting things done.
BPC is currently seeking a Policy Analyst to support activities for BPC’s Health Program. The specific portfolio includes a wide array of issues including COVID-19, obesity & federal nutrition programs, opioid epidemic, behavioral health, rural health, and digital health. BPC’s Health Program brings together political leaders and experts to produce reports and policy recommendations and works with stakeholders from other organizations to advance our policy objectives.
ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
The position of Policy Analyst at BPC is a versatile one, involving a variety of tasks, often simultaneously. The analyst will be expected to learn about new and evolving policy issues and will interact with policy experts and political leaders. Responsibilities include:
Conducting research on new or existing legislation, regulations, policies, and practices;
Drafting and editing reports, policy briefs, blog posts, fact sheets, and op-eds;
Engaging with stakeholders, senior fellows, and project principals;
Supporting outreach and communications activities including briefings for policy makers;
Working with the project director and the development department to draft grant proposals, grant report, and support other donor management needs.
Planning and executing project meetings and roundtables.
QUALIFICATIONS
Experience conducting policy research related to federal public health legislation, regulations, policies, and practices required;
Familiarity with CDC programs, the U.S. public health system, SNAP, child nutrition programs and behavioral health programs;
Familiarity with Medicare, Medicaid, and/or private insurance a plus;
Previous grant-writing experience a plus;
Demonstrated ability to communicate clearly and effectively, particularly in writing;
Demonstrated ability to multi-task on numerous projects, large and small, in both collaborative and independent situations;
Strong organizational skills;
Relevant degree in public health, health policy, public policy, or similar;
Bachelor’s degree and 3+ years of relevant experience OR relevant advanced degree and 2+ years of relevant experience
BPC offers a highly competitive salary and provides generous benefits. Individuals interested in this position should submit resume, cover letter, writing sample, and references. Please submit materials as one file. Candidates must be authorized to work in the United States. BPC does not sponsor employment visas.
BPC is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace dedicated to pursuing and hiring a diverse workforce.
This position is budgeted at 65,000. Commensurate with experience.",3804,Washington
102,(2 POS) INTELLIGENCE ANALYST SR EAS,United States Postal Service,"Washington, DC 20260 (Southwest Federal Center area)","$81,470 - $118,170 a year","United States Postal Service
External Publication for Job Posting 10589071

If this job requires qualification on an examination, the number of applicants who will be invited to take or retake the

examination may be limited.

Branch

Headquarters

Job Posting Period

06/09/2021 - 07/12/2021

Job Title

INTELLIGENCE ANALYST SR (INSP SRV)

Facility Location

US Postal Inspection Service

Analytics/Cyber Group

475 L’Enfant Plaza SW
Washington DC 20260

Position Information

TITLE: INTELLIGENCE ANALYST SR (INSP SRV)

GRADE: EAS - 23

FLSA DESIGNATION: Exempt

OCCUPATION CODE: 2335-0013

NON-SCHEDULED DAYS: Saturday/Sunday

HOURS: 08:00 A.M. to 04:30 P.M.

SALARY RANGE: 81,470.00 - 118,170.00 USD Annually

FINANCE NUMBER: 102708

BENEFIT INFORMATION: The salary will be based on previous experience, salary history, and current postal pay policies.

We offer excellent benefits including health and life insurance, retirement plan, savings/investment plan with employer

contribution, flexible spending, flextime scheduling of core work hours, annual and sick leave.

Background Check

The Inspection Service criminal background check is conducted using United States information resources only (e.g., FBI
fingerprint check, state and county checks). A criminal background check involves a 5-year inquiry for any location where
the individual has resided, worked or gone to school within the United States or its territories. As a result of this limitation,
the criminal background checks of individuals who have not resided in the United States or its territories for the preceding
5-years may not be considered complete. The Inspection Service may be able to process inquiries for U.S. Citizens only,
but only if their time spent out of the country was spent as: a trailing spouse or dependent of someone working for the U.S.
government (military or civilian), a missionary, a student attending school in a foreign country, a Peace Corps participant, or
as an employee of a U.S.-based employer/company. If the Inspection Service is unable to perform a complete background
check because of residency outside the United States, such individuals will be ineligible for Postal employment.

Functional Purpose
Performs oversight, coordination, training, and evaluation of headquarters intelligence development, investigative analyses,

and audit activities; develops methods and practices governing the development and distribution of strategic and tactical

analytic services and products. Oversees investigative analyst training programs, including monitoring and evaluation of

career progression program, and the development of performance standards and certification processes.

DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES

1. Collaborates with headquarters and field personnel in the development of quantitative and qualitative standards for use in

the collection, evaluation and reporting of intelligence data and investigative analyses.

2. Provides direction to field analytic units for the development of data gathering methods, analytic product metrics, and

procedures for the dissemination of information and intelligence.

3. Monitors and evaluates investigative analyst initiatives, programs, and projects to ensure appropriate utilization and

allocation of analytical resources at the field and headquarters level.

4. Develops and implements analytic performance indicators, targets in support of strategic planning, forecasting, training,

and operational performance.

5. Participates in the planning, coordination, and implementation of comprehensive special studies, national criminal forecast

and profiles, and inter-agency intelligence research to support decision making.

6. Designs and develops formal communications related to national and global strategic trends, forecasts of investigative

and audit activities, and emerging criminal patterns and networks.

7. Oversees the development of headquarters and field information technology system requirements for data collection,

research, and intelligence formulation and validation.

8. Oversees the planning and coordination of analyst training and development initiatives, and develops procedures to

monitor and assesses the effectiveness of internal and external training and development programs.

9. Provides technical advice, program guidance, and testimonial services to federal, state, and local law enforcement

communities on intelligence development and analytic initiatives; serves on inter-agency, national, and global task groups

addressing current and emerging criminal trends and recommend solutions.

10. Develops intelligence data and analysis through the use of software or data mining tools.

SUPERVISION

Manager of unit to which assigned.

Notes: SPECIAL CONDITIONS: Willingness to submit to a Tier 2 Moderate Background Investigation (MBI). This

investigation requires, among other things, completion of a questionnaire and fingerprinting for a criminal records check. The

investigation may require a drug test. The successful applicant will be required to meet and maintain the requirements of this

level of background investigation while holding this position.

DESIRABLE QUALIFICATIONS: Experience with conducting cryptocurrency analysis; Experience with internet

investigations, including open source intelligence, dark web, TOR and cryptocurrencies; Technical Certifications: Network+,

Security+, CySA+, CEH, CISSP; Experience in providing presentations to various levels of leadership and audiences to

include Executive Leadership; Experience with using SQL or scripts to analyze data and draw conclusions from that data.

**This position requires a MBI clearance. This process can take up to 6 weeks from the date the offer letter is returned**

This is a two-step application process requiring you to create a profile and submit an application for the position you are

applying for.

You will receive two email confirmations:

1. An email confirming your profile is complete.

2. After submitting your application you will receive a second email confirming your application has been successfully

submitted.
For information, please contact Vanessa Brown at Talent@usps.gov.

The United States Postal Service has the following excellent and challenging employment opportunity for highly motivated
and innovative individuals. Successful candidates must demonstrate through a combination of education, training, and
experience the following requirements:

Requirements

1. Knowledge of information technology sufficient to research and communicate with internal and external secure electronic

databases.

2. Ability to design quantitative and qualitative evaluative methods to ensure integrity, quality, and reliability of intelligence

data and analytic products.

3. Ability to implement analytic performance indicators, targets, and metrics related to organizational strategies, information

technology requirements, and inter-agency intelligence regulations.

4. Ability to effectively communicate both orally and in writing to clearly convey information, findings, and recommendations to

varied audiences, both internal and external about strategic trends, patterns, and networks.

5. Ability to plan, coordinate, and implement special studies, national criminal forecast and profiles, and inter-agency

intelligence research to increase organizational effectiveness and decision-making.

6. Ability to plan, coordinate, and analyze training initiatives and programs.

7. Ability to oversee and coordinate the work of others to achieve program or project objectives, including monitoring

performance, facilitating the flow of work-related information, and providing technical guidance.

8. Knowledge of investigative, security, and preventative activities relating to the mission, role and various jurisdictions of law

enforcement.

Qualified applicants must successfully pass a pre-employment drug screening to meet the U.S. Postal Service's requirement
to be drug free. Applicants must also be a U.S. citizen or have permanent resident alien status.

IMPORTANT INFORMATION:

Applications must be submitted by 11:59 p.m., Central Time, of the posting's closing date. Applicants claiming veterans'
preference must attach a copy of member copy 4 (only) of Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty (DD Form
214) or other proof of eligibility if claiming 10-point veterans' preference. The United States Postal Service (USPS) is an
equal opportunity employer. The USPS provides reasonable accommodation for any part of the application, interview, and/or
selection process, please make your request to the examiner, selecting official or local manager of Human Resources. This
request can also be made by someone on your behalf. Explain the nature of your limitations and the accommodation
needed. The decision on granting reasonable accommodation will be on a case-by-case basis.

SPECIAL NOTE: Current career Postal Service employees are ineligible to apply to this posting.",3804,Washington
103,OPNAV N72 Junior Analyst Support - Navy - Pentagon,"Synchron, LLC","Pentagon, DC",None,"Action Officer – Chief of Naval Operations (OPNAV-N721) - Navy Analytics OfficeBackground: Synchron is seeking a qualified candidate to support the Navy Analytics Office. The Action Officer will assist the N721 Branch Head with program management, financial management, briefing support, and administrative support.The Action Officer shall: Provide a wide array of analytical, professional, and administrative services in support of the Navy Analytics Office mission.Have a positive attitude, be flexible if plans and directions change, be comfortable working with tight deadlines on occasion, and be able to communicate professionally with stakeholders.Assist the N721 staff with the development and implementation procedures to collect, evaluate, and devise strategies to meet the programmatic priorities of the DoD, Secretary of the Navy, Chief of Naval Operations (CNO), the Fleet, and Fleet Combatant Commanders.The Action Officer will work closely with the N721 Branch Head in the following actions: Assist with meeting setups and taking meeting minutes when required, Briefing and Powerpoint development, Assist with the creations of White Paper and MS Word documents, Assist with the PBIS database and analyzing financial data as appropriate.Support analytical studies and strategic guidance that enable senior Navy leadership to allocate limited resources to expansive requirements and comprehend complex relationships between funding and programmed outputs.Provide analyses with the most accurate, current and historical data programmed both for specific programs and at the broader appropriation level.Able to walk approximately ¼ mile during the work day for client visits and to attend meetings. Able to travel by commercial airline and rental vehicle if needed for Government travel requirements. Ability to lift and carry up to 25 lbs.Program Analyst Education and Experience Requirements: Education: Bachelor’s Degree.Minimum Experience: A minimum of 2 years professional experience. Experience within the Navy or on the OPNAV staff is highly desired. Substantive knowledge of Microsoft Office products, including Word, Excel and PowerPoint.Security Clearance – Secret / Ability to obtain a Secret clearanceSYNCHRON, LLC provides technical support services to the Department of Defense, Government Contractors, and select partners. Our mission is to combine Subject Matter Expertise with innovative technology applications to provide highly effective and efficient solutions to government and commercial clients.It is the policy of Synchron, LLC to provide equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or any other applicable federal or state-protected classification.XJ6Job Type: Full-time",3804,Washington
104,"Analyst, Regulatory Review and Disclosure, CRED",Finra,"Rockville, MD 20850",None,"The Analyst performs a variety of specific duties depending on the core function to which assigned. Core functions in Regulatory Review and Disclosure include but not limited to disclosure review of Uniforms Form U4, U5, U6, BD, and BDW, Public Records Review, Criminal History Record Information (CHRI), Statutory Disqualification, Expungements, Formal Disciplinary Actions (FINRA, SEC, and other SROs) and review of related Court Documents. Includes applying basic analytical skills to help support RR&D processes and supporting functions, and utilizing applicable systems. This is a junior-level professional work in which incumbents are learning their assigned roles, attaining newly-learned skills and working under direct supervision.
Essential Job Functions:
This position will review a caseload, as trained and assigned, of specific RR&D functions. The Analyst is learning his/her assigned functions and performing essential functions with increasing independent analysis, judgment, and discretion. Case assignments are more basic working towards more complex. This position assumes Analyst is able to develop into a Senior Analyst, once fully trained and demonstrating ability to perform duties required of a Senior Analyst.
Research, review, analyze and process uniform form filings U4, U5, U6, BD, BDW and CHRI to ensure compliance with Web CRD filing requirements, as well as FINRA, SRO, and SEC rules, regulations and statutes. Identify and/or remove individual/firm filing deficiencies with appropriate constituents via Web CRD or other appropriate communication vehicles.
Based on research, review and analysis, determine whether or not an individual or organization is subject to statutory disqualification and/or perform applicable Expungement activities. This includes, among other things, analyzing court documents (e.g., criminal, civil, regulatory) and utilizing Lexis-Nexis, Court Link and/or CCH to research and analyze state and federal statutes. Contact county, state, and federal courts as needed to obtain required documentation when not otherwise available.
Review, identify and analyze disciplinary actions taken against individuals and organizations by FINRA, the SEC and other Federal, State and Self Regulatory authorities, as well as FINRA arbitration statements of claim and awards/final decisions, to determine if they meet uniform form reporting requirements. If so, summarize as appropriate and create Form U6 filing and submit to Web CRD. Determine applicable sanction effective dates and notify respondents and their firms of the sanction dates and regulatory requirements.
Coordinate as well as assist with the preparation of drafts for the disciplinary actions section of the Regulatory Notices and determining information to be provided to the National Adjudicatory Council (NAC) regarding respondents in review before the NAC.
Research, review and handle organization name reservations.
Assist firms and other regulators with Mass Transfer requirements/process. Schedule, process, and execute Mass Transfers.
Research and respond to correspondence and/or Tier II telephone inquiries from FINRA firms, other FINRA departments, regulators and/or other constituents regarding CRD filing requirements, registration related FINRA rules and regulations, and other related matters. Escalate calls to appropriate persons as needed.
Report and escalate, with recommendations for handling, outstanding issues to Senior Analysts. Associate Principal Analysts, and/or Manager(s).
Analysts are able to complete a fair workload across multiple functions and are expected to meet and/or exceed the established goals in performing RR&D reviews at the end of the training period. Analysts also contribute towards RR&D ad-hoc reports or projects, work well with others, model leadership skills when appropriate and continue to learn new functions or skills as needed.
Other Responsibilities:
Uses basic statistical and quantitative techniques to analyze data researched.
Assists in reviewing, documenting, developing, enhancing, and supporting RR&D systems and processes.
Assists in the testing and recommendation of technologies to improve RR&D systems and process efficiencies.
Maintain essential skills by attending training programs and participation in required meetings.
Perform other duties required to maintain the effective operation of the RR &D Units, Credentialing, Registration, Education, and Disclosure (CRED) department, and FINRA.
Education/Experience Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree with a legal and/or business concentration or related field. Paralegal or law background desirable.
One (1) year of directly related experience.
Well-developed interpersonal skills; excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Research and analytical skills.
Demonstrated organizational skills and the ability to multitask; Attention to detail.
Proficiency of Windows PC environment as well as MS Word, Excel, and Access; working knowledge of LexisNexis preferred.
Working Conditions:
Work in an open office environment.
Frequent use of the telephone, PC, and other systems/ software applications (e.g., online research, LexisNexis and/or other FINRA regulatory systems, etc.).
Evening and weekend work occasionally required.
To be considered for this position, please submit an application.
The information provided above has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work of the position. It is not a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities and qualifications required.
Please note: If the “Apply Now” button on a job board posting does not take you directly to the FINRA Careers site, enter www.finra.org/careers into your browser to reach our site directly.
FINRA strives to make our career site accessible to all users. If you need a disability-related accommodation for completing the application process, please contact FINRA’s accommodation help line at 240.386.4865. Please note that this number is exclusively for inquiries regarding application accommodations.
Employees may be eligible for a discretionary bonus in addition to base pay. FINRA also provides a variety of benefits including comprehensive health and welfare benefits, life and disability insurance, paid holidays, vacation, personal, and sick leave. FINRA offers immediate participation and vesting in a 401(k) plan with company match. You will also be eligible for participation in an additional FINRA-funded retirement contribution, our tuition reimbursement program and many other benefits. If you would like to contribute to our important mission and work collegially in a professional organization that values intelligence, integrity and initiative, consider a career with FINRA.
Important Information
FINRA’s Code of Conduct imposes restrictions on employees’ investments and requires financial disclosures that are uniquely related to our role as a securities regulator. FINRA employees are required to disclose to FINRA all brokerage accounts that they maintain, and those in which they control trading or have a financial interest (including any trust account of which they are a trustee or beneficiary and all accounts of a spouse, domestic partner or minor child who lives with the employee) and to authorize their broker-dealers to provide FINRA with duplicate statements for all of those accounts. All of those accounts are subject to the Code’s investment and securities account restrictions, and new employees must comply with those investment restrictions—including disposing of any security issued by a company on FINRA’s Prohibited Company List or obtaining a written waiver from their Executive Vice President—by the date they begin employment with FINRA. Employees may only maintain securities accounts that must be disclosed to FINRA at one or more securities firms that provide an electronic feed (e-feed) of data to FINRA, and must move securities accounts from other securities firms to a firm that provides an e-feed within three months of beginning employment.
You can read more about these restrictions here .
As standard practice, employees must also execute FINRA’s Employee Confidentiality and Invention Assignment Agreement without qualification or modification and comply with the company’s policy on nepotism.
Search Firm Representatives
Please be advised that FINRA is not seeking assistance or accepting unsolicited resumes from search firms for this employment opportunity. Regardless of past practice, a valid written agreement and task order must be in place before any resumes are submitted to FINRA. All resumes submitted by search firms to any employee at FINRA without a valid written agreement and task order in place will be deemed the sole property of FINRA and no fee will be paid in the event that person is hired by FINRA.
FINRA is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, citizenship status, color, disability, marital status, national origin, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status or any other classification protected by federal state or local laws as appropriate, or upon the protected status of the person’s relatives, friends or associates.
FINRA abides by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-741.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified individuals on the basis of disability, and requires affirmative action by covered prime contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities.
FINRA abides by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-300.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified protected veterans, and requires affirmative action by covered prime contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified protected veterans.
©2020 FINRA. All rights reserved. FINRA is a registered trademark of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc.",3804,Washington
105,Budget and Correspondence Analyst,"RER Solutions, Inc","Washington, DC 20585 (Southwest Federal Center area)","$72,600 - $103,000 a year","Do you want to work for a company that cares about you as a person, not just a number? For a company that provides outstanding leadership? For a company that offers exceptional benefits? RER Solutions, Inc., could be your new home.RER Solutions, Inc., is accepting resumes for Budget and Coorespondence Analyst to become a part of our superior workforce in the Washington, DC area. The Budget and Coorespondence Analyst will provide onsite and remote federal program leadership.DESCRIPTIONSupport the federal budgeting team including support in Risk Management, Internal Controls, Audit, Accounting, familiarity with federal Rules and Regulations around budgeting, and associated OMB circularsWork and manage rolling budgets (2 Year Appropriations)Support the Budget Director and other senior program officials so the client-client facing experience is necessaryExecute budget reporting and intermediate financial reporting on fee income generated from federal loan applicants and the program’s portfolioComplete a monthly presentation tracking divisional budget actuals against the OMB approved Spend PlanKeep up with the administrative, departmental, or Congressional events that may impact the program’s budget outlookManage the 2018 budget and submitting 2019 and subsequent budgets for approvalInteract with the Executive Secretariat team to monitor urgent correspondence requiring an immediate responseEnsure comments are updated in the records management systemConduct appropriate internal and external research to substantiate responses to correspondence from private citizens and congressional and other government agencies’ personnelTrack, coordinate, and update the flow of incoming correspondence and responses through a records management system and email to obtain concurrences from other program offices within predetermined deadlinesRespond on an as-needed basis to correspondence and program inquires via phone or emailREQUIREMENTSExperience working in federal budgetingComfortable working across multiple workstreamsExperience in accounting, financial services, or other relevant experience preferredStrong Microsoft Office Excel, Access, and Word skillsStrong written and oral communication skillsStrong problem solving/analytical skills and detailed orientedRequires the ability to exercise sound judgmentPossess a high degree of pride and attention to detail with the work productWell organized, ability to properly prioritize, and adept at time managementIndependent, solution-oriented, self-starter mind individualUnderstanding of government administration in a small programEDUCATION: BA/BS and 4 years experience or a Masters and 2 years experienceCOMPENSATION:Includes competitive wages, paid holidays, vacation, sick leave, 401k matching, life insurance, health, vision, and dental benefits.This position is not available for Corp-to-Corp or 3rd party sourcing.We are an equal opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.Job Type: Full-timePay: $72,600.00 - $103,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceHealth insuranceLife insurancePaid time offTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:Risk Management and Internal Controls: 4 years (Preferred)federal budgeting: 4 years (Preferred)accounting, financial services, or other relevant: 4 years (Preferred)federal Rules and Regulations around budgeting: 4 years (Preferred)Audit and Accounting: 4 years (Preferred)Security Clearance:Confidential (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19",3804,Washington
106,Investment Associate,Citi,"Washington, DC",None,"The Investment Assoc Sr Analyst is a seasoned professional role. Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge, contributing to the development of new techniques and the improvement of processes and work-flow for the area or function. Integrates subject matter and industry expertise within a defined area. Requires in-depth understanding of how areas collectively integrate within the sub-function as well as coordinate and contribute to the objectives of the function and overall business. Evaluates moderately complex and variable issues with substantial potential impact, where development of an approach/taking of an action involves weighing various alternatives and balancing potentially conflicting situations using multiple sources of information. Requires good analytical skills in order to filter, prioritize and validate potentially complex and dynamic material from multiple sources. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Regularly assumes informal/formal leadership role within teams. Involved in coaching and training of new recruits Significant impact in terms of project size, geography, etc. by influencing decisions through advice, counsel and/or facilitating services to others in area of specialization. Work and performance of all teams in the area are directly affected by the performance of the individual.

Responsibilities:
The role of the Investment Associate is to provide a wide variety of service and investment advice to an Ultra High Net Worth client base within the United States. The position focuses on servicing clients of Citi Private Bank by understanding their investment objectives and working in partnership with senior team members to deliver investment solutions.
Help support the senior members of the investment team in their delivery of investment solutions to clients.
Monitor and provide guidance on the markets to internal and external clients, incorporating the views of The Private Bank’s Investment Committee.
Prepare investment policy statements for prospective clients
Analyze economic trends/activities and advise the effects on the investors’ portfolios
Recommend changes to the investors’ holdings after evaluating the economic, financial and market factors and the potential impact on the investors’ portfolios.
Develop relationships and generate ideas with the bankers and clients that will lead to the growth of the asset base
In support of senior team members, engage clients on investment themes and solutions, and assist in the execute of the investment solutions and trades.
Attend internal and external meetings to stay current on financial markets, and products and services offered by Citi Private Bank.
Adhere to a specific prospecting code of conduct, which (1) permits acquiring new private client accounts only by referral or personal contact with an individual seeking to do business and (2) prohibits seminars, mail campaigns, cold calling and any other methods of solicitation.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of experience
Bachelor's degree with concentration of economics, finance or business administration; Professional experience or related occupation.
Ability to communicate with co-workers and clients; excellent written and communication skills, able to work without direction, self-motivated
US: S7, S66 (or S63/S65); NOTE: Securities Industry Exam (SIE is a prerequisite to the S7)
Education:
Bachelor's/University degree or equivalent experience
-
Job Family Group:
Private Client Product Services
-
Job Family:
Investment Counselor
-
Time Type:
-
Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Citigroup Inc. and its subsidiaries (""Citi”) invite all qualified interested applicants to apply for career opportunities. If you are a person with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation to use our search tools and/or apply for a career opportunity review Accessibility at Citi.
View the ""EEO is the Law"" poster. View the EEO is the Law Supplement.
View the EEO Policy Statement.
View the Pay Transparency Posting",3804,Washington
107,Export Policy Analyst,US Bureau of Industry and Security,"Washington, DC","$60,129 - $133,362 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located in the Department of Commerce,Bureau of Industry and Security, Office of the Assistant Secretary for Export Administration (EA), Office of Nonproliferation and Treaty Compliance (NPTC), Washington, District of Columbia. The incumbent will serve as an Export Policy Analyst and will contribute to the export control policy process. Will serve as a liaison with businesses and industries on export control regulations and policy procedures.
Responsibilities
The incumbent will serve as an Export Policy Analyst will serve as a liaison with businesses and industries on export control regulations and policy procedures and perform the following duties:

Assists senior export policy analysts in performing complex business and industry regulatory and associated functions which address mission elements critical to agency priorities and objectives.
Analyzes and processes U.S. export control license applications involving embargoes, special controls, and items that are controlled for crime control reasons in accordance with the Export Administration Regulations (EAR) through the use of electronic databases.
Addresses and provides guidance to the export community on export control policies and regulations for proper submission of license applications.
Assists with proposing options to division leadership which may resolve outstanding interagency issues. - Reviews prior cases for license history, approvals, and denials.
Assists in the preparation of papers for escalation to the Operating Committee (OC) and interagency. - Assists in the completion of license determinations for foreign policy-based export controls.
Assists in the preparation of analytical reports that evaluate foreign policy-based export controls.
May represent the organization in outreach events to government and private research organizations as a facilitator.

Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
12
Job family (Series)
1101 General Business And Industry
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S. citizen to apply for this position.
You must successfully pass a background investigation. This may include a credit check, a review of financial issues, as well as certain criminal offenses and illegal use or possession of drugs.
A probationary period may be required.
Selective Service: Males born after 12/31/59 must be registered or exempt from Selective Service (see http://www.sss.gov/).
This position is subject to pre-employment drug testing and random drug testing thereafter.
If you receive a conditional offer of employment for this position, you will be required to complete an Optional Form 306, Declaration for Federal Employment, and to sign and certify the accuracy of all information in your application.
All Federal employees are required to have Federal salary payments made by direct deposit to a financial institution of their choosing.
Bargaining Unit Position: No
Financial Disclosure: If you are hired, you may be required to complete a Confidential Financial Disclosure Report (OGE Form 450) within 30 days after appointment.
Permanent Change of Duty Station (PCS) Expenses will not be paid.
Qualifications
Applicants must demonstrate that they meet the Minimum Qualification requirements as noted below.

Specialized Experience:
GS-09: You qualify for the GS-09 grade level if you possess one year of specialized experience, equivalent to the GS-07 grade level in the Federal government, performing the following duties:
Identifying and analyzing technologies that are emerging or foundational which are essential to global human rights and our national security;
Preparing analytical reports that evaluate emerging technology development and technology transfer transactions;
Analyzing foreign market data and conducting research on international businesses and foreign trade practices for impact on U.S. companies; and
Providing support concerning the analysis, design, testing, or operation of systems listed in the Export Administration Regulations (EAR) Commerce Control List (CCL).
OR two full years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to a master's degree or master's or equivalent graduate degree; or a combination of the required experience and education for this grade level.


GS-11: You qualify for the GS-11 grade level if you possess one year of specialized experience, equivalent to the GS-09 grade level in the Federal government, performing the following duties:
Identifying and analyzing technologies that are emerging or foundational which are essential to global human rights and our national security;
Preparing analytical reports that evaluate emerging technology development and technology transfer transactions;
Analyzing foreign market data and conducting research on international businesses and foreign trade practices for impact on U.S. companies;
Providing support concerning the analysis, design, testing, or operation of systems listed in the Export Administration Regulations (EAR) Commerce Control List (CCL); and
Consulting on the potential for unwanted technology transfer of emerging or foundational technologies.
OR three full years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to a Ph.D. or Ph.D. or equivalent doctoral degree; or a combination of the required experience and education for this grade level.

GS-12: You qualify for the GS-12 grade level if you possess one year of specialized experience, equivalent to the GS-11 grade level in the Federal government, performing the following duties:
Identifying and analyzing technologies that are emerging or foundational which are essential to global human rights and our national security;
Preparing analytical reports that evaluate emerging technology development and technology transfer transactions;
Analyzing foreign market data and conducting research on international businesses and foreign trade practices for impact on U.S. companies;
Providing support concerning the analysis, design, testing, or operation of systems listed in the Export Administration Regulations (EAR) Commerce Control List (CCL);
Consulting on the potential for unwanted technology transfer of emerging or foundational technologies; and
Advising on the technical portions of complex and sensitive business/industry issues that may impact U.S. export control policy, the U.S. industrial base, critical technologies, and economic and trade issues.
NOTE(s):
Education: You must submit a copy of your college transcripts (official or unofficial) to document education.
Experience: Your resume must support your claim of experience or you may be found ineligible.
All qualification requirements must be met by the closing date of this announcement. Qualification claims will be subject to verification.

NOTE: Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

Career Transition Assistance Program: This program applies to Federal service employees whose positions have been deemed surplus or no longer needed, or employees who have been involuntarily separated from a Federal service position within the competitive service. To receive selection priority for this position, you must: 1) meet eligibility criteria for CTAP or ICTAP; 2) will be eligible if it is determined that they have exceeded the minimum qualifications for the position by attaining at least a rating of 85 out of 100; and 3) submit the appropriate documentation to support your CTAP or ICTAP eligibility. Well-Qualified includes those applicants whose knowledge, skills, and abilities clearly exceed the minimum qualification requirements for the position. For information on eligibility criteria and required documentation, go to: http://www.opm.gov/rif/employee_guides/career_transition.asp
Education
If you are claiming education as any part of your qualifications for this position, you must submit an official transcript, unofficial transcript, or a list including courses, grades earned, completion dates, and quarter and semester hours earned.

Special Instructions for Foreign Education: If you are using education completed in foreign colleges or universities to meet the qualification requirements, you must show that the education credentials have been evaluated by a private organization that specializes in interpretation of foreign education programs and such education has been deemed equivalent to that gained in an accredited U.S. education program; or full credit has been given for the courses at a U.S. accredited college or university. Failure to provide such documentation with your application will result in lost consideration. For further information, visit: https://sites.ed.gov/international/recognition-of-foreign-qualifications/.
Additional information
Promotion Potential: When promotion potential is shown, the agency is not making a commitment and is not obligated to provide future promotions to you if you are selected. Future promotions will be dependent on your ability to perform the duties at a higher level, the continuing need for an employee assigned to the higher level, and administrative approval.

Background Investigation: To ensure the accomplishment of its mission, the Department of Commerce requires each and every employee to be reliable and trustworthy. To meet those standards, all selected applicants must undergo and successfully complete a background investigation for Top Secret security clearance as a condition of placement in this Special Sensitive position. This review includes financial issues such as delinquency in the payment of debts, child support and/or tax obligations, as well as certain criminal offenses and illegal use or possession of drugs.

The physical worksite for this position is located in Washington DC. However, the BIS is currently under a maximum telework posture due to the COVID-19 pandemic; therefore, this position is currently under a 100 percent telework schedule. The position's telework schedule will likely change in the future when BIS moves away from its maximum telework posture. At that time, the incumbent will be expected to report to the physical work site in accordance with the updated status requirements of their supervisor. The nature and scope of future telework opportunities will be subject to the unit's telework policy, any applicable bargaining unit agreements, and supervisory approval. Payment of relocation expenses, as applicable, will be paid in accordance with this Job Opportunity Announcement. Non-compliance with the supervisor's telework-schedule requirement could result in adverse action, including separation.

Veterans' Preference: If you are a veteran with preference eligibility and you are claiming 5-point veterans' preference, you must submit a copy of your DD-214 (Member Copy 4) or an official statement from your command if currently on active duty that certifies you are expected to be discharged or released from active duty service in the armed forces under honorable conditions not later than 120 days after the date the certification is signed. If you are claiming 10-point veterans' preference, in addition to the DD-214, you must also submit a Standard Form 15 (Application for 10-Point Veteran Preference) and the required supporting documents listed on that form. For more information on veterans' preference see http://www.fedshirevets.gov/.

Current or Former Political Appointees: The Office of Personnel Management (OPM) must authorize employment offers made to current or former political appointees. If you are currently, or have been within the last 5 years, a political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee in the Executive Branch, you must disclose this information to the Human Resources Office.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
We will review your resume and supporting documentation to ensure you meet the minimum qualification requirements. If you meet the minimum qualifications, we will use an Assessment Questionnaire to place you in one of three categories based on your experience, education and training. The competencies or knowledge, skills, and abilities needed to perform this job are:
Foreign Market Research, International Business Management, and Oral Communication

If you meet the minimum qualifications, you will be placed in one of three pre-defined categories. These categories are ""gold,"" ""silver,"" and ""bronze."" Your resume and/or optional cover letter must support your responses to the scored occupational questionnaire, or your score may be lowered. Candidates placed in the ""gold"" category will be identified for referral to the hiring manager and may be invited for an interview. To preview the assessment questionnaire, click the following link: https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11137455

The Category Rating Process does not add veteran's preference points but protects the rights of veterans by placing them ahead of non-preference eligibles within each category. Preference eligibles who meet the minimum qualification requirements and who have a compensable service-connected disability of at least 10 percent must be listed in the highest quality category (except in the case of scientific or professional positions at the GS-9 level or higher). For more information on category rating, please go to:hr.commerce.gov/s/groups/public/@doc/@cfoasa/@ohrm/documents/content/prod01_009474.pdf.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Top Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Special-Sensitive (SS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
Credentialing, Suitability/Fitness, National security
Required Documents

Required Documents
To apply for this position, you must submit a complete Application Package which includes:

1. Your resume showing a detailed description of your job-related qualifications that includes beginning and ending dates with the month and year and hours worked per week (if less than 40) for each paid and non-paid work experience job title listed. For work in the federal service, include the grade level for the position(s).
2. Other supporting documents (only submit if applicable to you):

Are you qualifying based on education? Submit a copy of your college transcript (unofficial is acceptable) or a list of coursework with hours completed.
Are you claiming veterans' preference? Submit Member Copy 4 of your DD-214 or other (Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty) or notice form. Those applying for 10-Point preference must fill out the SF-15 and provide an official document dated 1991 or later, from the Department of Veterans Affairs or from a branch of the Armed Forces, and/or any other associated documentation based on your preference. If applying based on eligibility under the Veterans Opportunity to Work (VOW) Act, you must submit certification from the Armed Forces that you will be discharged or released from active duty within 120 days from the date on the certification. This must indicate your dates of service, your rank, and confirm that you will be separated under honorable conditions.
Are you claiming special priority selection rights under the Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP/CTAP)? If so, submit:
A copy of your RIF separation notice, notice of proposed removal for failure to relocate, notice of disability annuity termination, or certification from the National Guard Bureau or Military Department that you are eligible for disability retirement;
A copy of your SF-50 ""Notification of Personnel Action'', documenting your RIF separation, noting your positions, grade level, and duty location, and/or Agency certification of inability to place you through RPL, etc.;
A copy of your latest performance appraisal including your rating; and
Any documentation from your agency that shows your current promotion potential.
Are you a current or former political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee? Submit a copy of your applicable SF-50, along with a statement that provides the following information regarding your most recent political appointment:
Position title;
Type of appointment (Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES, or Presidential Appointee);
Agency; and
Beginning and ending dates of appointment.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
The public
U.S. citizens, nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Clarification from the agency
All U.S. Citizens",3804,Washington
